


Rhodesia - Wikipedia






















 






Rhodesia

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Rhodesian)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the unrecognised state of Rhodesia. For the British colony, see Southern Rhodesia. For other uses, see Rhodesia (disambiguation).


Rhodesia


Unrecognised state






1965–1979










Flag (1968)



Coat of arms





Motto
Sit Nomine Digna (Latin)
"May she be worthy of the name"


Anthem
"Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia" (1974–1979)








Royal anthem
"God Save the Queen" (1965–1970)























Capital
Salisbury


Languages
English (official)
Afrikaans, Shona and Ndebele widely spoken


Government
Constitutional monarchy (1965–70)
Parliamentary republic (1970–79)


Head of State



 • 
Monarch
1965–1970

Elizabeth II (Unrecognised by Elizabeth II)


 • 
President
1970–1975

Clifford Dupont (First)


 • 
1979
Henry Everard (Acting president) (Last)


Prime Minister



 • 
1965–1979
Ian Smith


Legislature
Parliament


 • 
Upper house
Senate


 • 
Lower house
House of Assembly


Historical era
Cold War


 • 
Independence (UDI)
11 November 1965


 • 
Republic declared
2 March 1970


 • 
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
1 June 1979


 • 
Republic of Zimbabwe
18 April 1980


Area


 • 
1978
390,580 km2 (150,800 sq mi)


Population


 • 
1978 est.
6,930,000 


     Density
18/km2 (46/sq mi)


Currency
Rhodesian pound (1965–1970)
Rhodesian dollar (1970–1979)







Preceded by
Succeeded by






Southern Rhodesia






Zimbabwe Rhodesia









Today part of
 Zimbabwe


a. The government recognised Queen Elizabeth II as the official Head of State from 1965 to 1970. The highest official of Rhodesia held the title "Officer Administering the Government" (OAtG) as he acted in lieu of the official Governor, who remained at his post but was ignored. After Rhodesia became a republic in March 1970, the President replaced the OAtG as the highest official and the Governor returned to London.


Rhodesia (/roʊˈdiːʒə/), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe. With its capital in Salisbury (now Harare), Rhodesia was considered a de facto successor state to the former British colony of Southern Rhodesia (which had achieved responsible government in 1923).
During an effort to delay an immediate transition to black majority rule, Rhodesia's predominantly white government issued its own Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965. The UDI administration initially sought recognition as an autonomous realm within the Commonwealth of Nations, but reconstituted itself as a republic in 1970.
Following a brutal guerrilla war fought with two African nationalist organisations (Robert Mugabe's ZANU and Joshua Nkomo's ZAPU), Rhodesian premier Ian Smith conceded to bi-racial democracy in 1978. However, a provisional government subsequently headed by Smith and his moderate colleague Abel Muzorewa failed in appeasing international critics or halting the bloodshed. By December 1979, Muzorewa had replaced Smith as Prime Minister and secured an agreement with the militant nationalists, allowing Rhodesia to briefly revert to colonial status pending elections under a universal franchise. It finally achieved internationally recognised independence in April 1980; the nation was concurrently renamed the Republic of Zimbabwe.
A wholly landlocked area, Rhodesia was bordered by South Africa to the south, Bechuanaland (later Botswana) to the southwest, Zambia to the northwest, and Mozambique (a Portuguese province until 1975) to the east. The state was named after Cecil Rhodes, whose British South Africa Company acquired the land in the late 19th century.



Contents


1 Nomenclature
2 History

2.1 Background
2.2 Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)

2.2.1 Impact of UDI


2.3 The Bush War
2.4 End of the Bush War

2.4.1 Late 1970s
2.4.2 Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas
2.4.3 Security Situation Erodes Rapidly


2.5 End of UDI (1979)
2.6 Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)


3 Politics
4 Military and police
5 Foreign relations

5.1 Britain and the UDI
5.2 Sanctions
5.3 International perspective
5.4 Diplomatic relations
5.5 Results


6 Legacy

6.1 Rhodesian media


7 References
8 External links

8.1 Audio and video





Nomenclature[edit]
The official name of the country, according to the constitution adopted concurrently with the Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) in 1965, was Rhodesia. This was not the case under British law, however, which considered the territory's legal name to be Southern Rhodesia, the name given to the country in 1898 during the British South Africa Company's administration of the Rhodesias, and retained by the self-governing colony of Southern Rhodesia after the end of Company rule in 1923.[1]
This naming dispute dated back to October 1964, when Northern Rhodesia became independent from Britain and concurrently changed its name to Zambia. The Southern Rhodesian colonial government in Salisbury felt that in the absence of a "Northern" Rhodesia, the continued use of "Southern" was superfluous. It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government. Salisbury went on using the shortened name in an official manner nevertheless,[2] while the British government continued referring to the country as Southern Rhodesia. This situation continued throughout the UDI period.[1] The shortened name was used by many people including the British government in the House of Commons.
The British government maintained this stance regarding the June–December 1979 successor state of Zimbabwe Rhodesia, and when Zimbabwe Rhodesia returned to colonial status from December 1979 to April 1980, it was as "Southern Rhodesia". Southern Rhodesia subsequently gained international recognition of its independence in April 1980, when it became the Republic of Zimbabwe.
History[edit]



Part of a series on the



History of Zimbabwe





Ancient history


Mapungubwe Kingdom
c.1075–1220


Zimbabwe Kingdom
c.1220–1450


Mutapa Kingdom
c.1450–1760


Torwa dynasty
c.1450–1683





White settlement pre-1923


Rozwi Empire
c.1684–1834


Matabeleland
1838–1894


Rudd Concession
1888


BSA Company rule
1890–1923


First Matabele War
1893–1894


Second Matabele War
1896–1897


World War I involvement
1914–1918


Colony of Southern Rhodesia
1923–1980


World War II involvement
1939–1945


Malayan Emergency
involvement
1948–1960


Federation with Northern
Rhodesia and Nyasaland
1953–1963


Rhodesian Bush War
1964–1979



Unilateral Declaration of
Independence (UDI)

1965


Rhodesia under UDI
1965–1979


Zimbabwe-Rhodesia
June–Dec 1979



Lancaster House Agreement

Dec 1979


British Dependency
1979–1980


Zimbabwe
1980–present


Gukurahundi
1982–1987


Second Congo War
1998–2003





 Zimbabwe portal





v
t
e





Main article: History of Rhodesia
Background[edit]
Until after World War II, the landlocked British possession of Southern Rhodesia was not developed as an indigenous African territory, but rather as a unique state which reflected its multiracial character.[3] This situation certainly made it very different from other lands which existed under colonial rule, as many Europeans had arrived to make permanent homes, populating the towns as traders or settling to farm the most productive soils.[4][5] In 1922, faced with the decision to join the Union of South Africa as a fifth province or accept nearly full internal autonomy, the electorate cast its vote against South African integration.[6][7][8]
In view of the outcome of the referendum, the territory was annexed by the United Kingdom on 12 September 1923.[9][10][11][12] Shortly after annexation, on 1 October 1923, the first constitution for the new Colony of Southern Rhodesia came into force.[11][13] Under this constitution, Southern Rhodesia was given the right to elect its own thirty-member legislature, premier, and cabinet—although the British Crown retained a formal veto over measures affecting natives and dominated foreign policy.[14][15][16]
The Rhodesian authorities provided compensation when the government nationalised enterprises such as the country's railroads, consistently refused to radically alleviate unemployment, and shied from filling civil service posts with partisan appointees. By colonial standards, public services were well-organised and praised for their efficiency.[3]
In 1953, Southern Rhodesia merged with the two other British Central African states to form the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland – a loose association that placed defence and economic direction under a central government but left many domestic affairs under the control of its constituent territories.[17] As it began to appear that decolonisation was inevitable and indigenous black populations were pressing heavily for change,[3] the federation was dissolved in 1963.[18][19][20]

Numbers of white and black inhabitants before and during the Central African Federation[21]

Year
Southern Rhodesia
Northern Rhodesia
Nyasaland
Total


White
Black
White
Black
White
Black
White
Black


1927
38,200 (3.98%)
922,000 (96.02%)
4,000 (0.4%)
1,000,000 (99.6%)
1,700 (0.13%)
1,350,000 (99.87%)
43,900 (1.32%)
3,272,000 (98.68%)


1946
80,500 (4.79%)
1,600,000 (95.21%)
21,919 (1.32%)
1,634,980 (97.68%)
2,300 (0.10%)
2,340,000 (99.90%)
104,719 (1.84%)
5,574,980 (98.16%)


1955
150,000 (5.88%)
2,400,000 (94.12%)
65,000 (3.02%)
2,085,000 (96.98%)
6,300 (0.25%)
2,550,000 (99.75%)
221,300 (3.05%)
7,035,000 (96.95%)


1960
223,000 (7.30%)
2,830,000 (92.70%)
76,000 (3.14%)
2,340,000 (96.85%)
9,300 (0.33%)
2,810,000 (99.66%)
308,300 (3.72%)
7,980,000 (96.28%)


Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)[edit]
Although prepared to grant formal independence to Southern Rhodesia (now Rhodesia), the British government had adopted a policy of no independence before majority rule, dictating that colonies with a substantial population of European settlers would not receive independence except under conditions of majority rule.[22][23][24] Rhodesian colonials initially balked at the suggestion; some felt they had a right to absolute political control, at least for the time being, despite their relatively small numbers.[17][25] The authorities were also disturbed by the post-independence chaos which was plaguing other African nations at the time.[26] However, once Rhodesia had been introduced as a topic for discussion in international bodies, extension of the status quo became a matter of concern to the world community and a serious embarrassment to the United Kingdom.[5]
After the federal break-up in 1963, then-Prime Minister Alec Douglas-Home insisted that preconditions on independence talks hinge on what he termed the "five principles" – unimpeded progress to majority rule, assurance against any future legislation decidedly detrimental to black interests, "improvement in the political status" of local Africans, moves towards ending racial discrimination, and agreement on a settlement which could be "acceptable to the whole population".[27][28][29][30] Harold Wilson and his incoming Labour government took an even harder line on demanding that these points be legitimately addressed before an independence agenda could be set.[5]
By 1964, growing dissatisfaction with the ongoing negotiations ousted Salisbury's incumbent Winston Field, replacing him with Ian Smith, deputy chairman of the conservative Rhodesian Front party.[31][32][33] Smith, the colony's first Rhodesian-born leader, soon came to personify resistance to liberals in British government and those agitating for change at home.[5] He ruled out acceptance for all five of the proposed principles as they stood,[34] implying instead that Rhodesia was already legally entitled to independence—a claim which was overwhelmingly endorsed by registered voters in a referendum.[35][36][37]
Emboldened by the results of this referendum and the subsequent general election, Rhodesia now threatened to assume her own sovereignty without British consent. Harold Wilson countered by warning that such an irregular procedure would be considered treasonous, although he specifically rejected using armed force against the English "kith and kin" in Africa.[38][39][40] Wilson's refusal to consider a military option encouraged Smith to proceed with his plans. Talks quickly broke down, and final efforts in October to achieve a settlement floundered; the Rhodesian Front remained unwilling to accept what were regarded as unacceptably drastic terms and the British would settle for nothing less – it was a formula doomed to failure.[5]




Ian Smith signs the Unilateral Declaration of Independence.



The mantle of the pioneers has fallen on our shoulders to sustain civilisation in a primitive country.
— Ian Smith, 11 November 1965, upon the announcement of UDI[41]

On 11 November 1965, following a brief but solemn consensus, Rhodesia's leading statesmen issued their country's unilateral declaration of independence (UDI).[3][42][43] This was immediately denounced as an "act of rebellion against the Crown" in the United Kingdom, and Wilson promised that the illegal action would be short-lived.[44][45] However, few seemed to initially realise that Rhodesia was no longer within the Commonwealth's direct sphere of influence and British rule was now a constitutional fiction; Salisbury remained virtually immune to credible metropolitan leverage.[17]
On 12 October 1965, the United Nations General Assembly had noted the repeated threats of the Rhodesian authorities "to declare unilaterally the independence of Southern Rhodesia, in order to perpetuate minority rule", and called upon Wilson to use all means at his disposal (including military force) to prevent the Rhodesian Front from asserting independence.[46] After UDI was proclaimed, UN officials branded Ian Smith's government as an "illegal racist minority regime"[47] and called on member states to sever economic ties with Rhodesia, recommending sanctions on petroleum products and military hardware.[5] In December 1966, these measures became mandatory, extending to bar the purchase of Rhodesian tobacco, chrome, copper, asbestos, sugar, meat, and hides.[5]
Britain, having already adopted extensive sanctions of its own, dispatched a Royal Navy squadron to monitor oil deliveries in the port of Beira in Mozambique, from which a strategic pipeline ran to Umtali in Rhodesia. The warships were to deter "by force, if necessary, vessels reasonably believed to be carrying oil destined for (Southern) Rhodesia".[48][49]
Some nations, such as Switzerland, and West Germany, which were not UN members, conducted business legally with Rhodesia – the latter remained the Smith government's largest trading partner in Western Europe until 1973, when Bonn joined the UN.[5] Japan continued to accept more Rhodesian exports than any other nation, and Iran provided oil.[50] The Portuguese government marketed Rhodesian products as its own, via false certificates of origin and disguised trade channels.[51] South Africa openly refused to observe the UN sanctions.[52][53] A 1971 amendment passed in the United States permitted American firms to go on importing Rhodesian chromium and nickel as normal.[54]
Despite the poor showing of sanctions, Rhodesia found it nearly impossible to obtain diplomatic recognition abroad. In 1970, the US government had made it clear that the UDI would not be recognised "under [any] circumstances".[55] Even Smith's ideological allies in Pretoria, although sympathetic, failed to recognise the new country on an equal level.[56]
Initially, the state retained its pledged loyalty to Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom, recognising her as Queen of Rhodesia.[5] When Smith and Deputy Prime Minister Clifford Dupont called on colonial Governor, Sir Humphrey Gibbs, to formally notify him of the UDI, Gibbs condemned the UDI as an act of treason. After Smith formally announced the UDI on the radio, Gibbs sacked the entire cabinet on orders from Whitehall. However, he was unable to enact any concrete actions to foster a return to legality. Government ministers simply ignored his notices, pointing out that UDI made his office obsolete. Even so, Gibbs continued to occupy his residence in Salisbury until 1970, when he vacated the premises and left Rhodesia following the declaration of a republic.[57] He had effectively been superseded before then; on 20 December 1965, Smith named Dupont as "Officer Administering the Government"; an earlier attempt to have him named as Governor-General of Rhodesia was dismissed out of hand.[5]
In September 1968, the Appellate Division of the Rhodesian High Court ruled that Ian Smith's administration had become the de jure government of the country, not merely the de facto one.[58] To support his decision, Chief Justice Sir Hugh Beadle used several statements made by Hugo Grotius, who maintained that there was no way in which a nation could rightly claim to be governing a particular territory – if it was waging a war against that territory. Beadle argued that due to Britain's economic war against Rhodesia, she could not (at the same point) be described as governing Rhodesia.[59][60] Resulting court decisions held that the rebel government "could lawfully do anything its predecessors could lawfully have done".[61]
A Salisbury commission chaired by prominent lawyer W.R. Waley was appointed to study constitutional options open to the Rhodesian authorities as of April 1968, but reaching a further settlement with the British was ruled out early on.[17][62] Waley, although insistent that "Europeans must surrender any belief in permanent European domination", also testified that majority rule was not desirable immediately.[5]
Talks aimed at easing the differences between Rhodesia and the United Kingdom were carried out aboard Royal Navy vessels once in December 1966 and again in October 1968.[63][64][65] Both efforts failed to achieve agreement, although Harold Wilson added a sixth principle to the five he had previously enunciated: "it would be necessary to ensure that, regardless of race, there was no oppression of the majority by the minority or of [any] minority by the majority." Rhodesian resolve stiffened following a failure to reach a new settlement, with more radical elements of the Rhodesian Front calling for a republican constitution.[5]
During a two-proposition referendum held in 1969, the proposal for severing all remaining ties to the British Crown passed by a majority of 61,130 votes to 14,327.[5] Rhodesia declared itself a republic on 2 March 1970. Under the new constitution, a president served as ceremonial head of state, with the prime minister nominally reporting to him.[66] Some in Rhodesian government had hoped in vain that the declaration of a republic would finally prompt other nations to grant recognition.[67]
Impact of UDI[edit]
The years following Rhodesia's UDI saw an unfolding series of economic, military, and political pressures placed on the country which eventually brought about majority rule, a totality of these factors rather than any one the reason for introducing change.[68] In 2005, a conference at the London School of Economics which discussed Rhodesia's independence concluded that UDI was sparked by an existing racial conflict complicated by Cold War intrigues.[69]
Critics of UDI sought to maintain that Ian Smith intended only to safeguard the privileges of an entrenched colonial elite at the expense of the impoverished African community. According to this logic, UDI created a vacuum of oppression which was eventually filled by Robert Mugabe's present dictatorship.[70] Smith and his supporters continued to defend their actions, however, by claiming that the Rhodesian majority was too inexperienced at the time to manage effectively a developed nation.[26]
At large, the European population's emerging attitude to UDI was tense. Many white Rhodesians had seen themselves as nothing less than fully fledged members of the British Empire, carrying on the same rugged values and frontier spirit of the early Englishmen who had settled in 1890.[42] But such confidence was rudely shaken by Whitehall's refusal to grant independence on their terms. After 1965, there were those who continued to claim that they were collectively upholders of principle and defenders of such values against the twin threats of communism, manifested through the militant black nationalists, and – ironically – the decadence of Britain herself.[42] Often repeated appeals to the Christian heritage of their pioneer ancestors in "defending the free world" reflected these beliefs.[42]
African parties displayed initial horror at Smith's declaration, with one ZANU official stating, "...for all those who cherish freedom and a meaningful life, UDI has set a collision course which cannot be altered. 11 November 1965 [has] marked the turning point of the struggle for freedom in that land from a constitutional and political one to primarily a military struggle."[43] It would, however, be several years before even the most radical nationalists chose to develop a coherent strategy revolving around armed resistance, preferring instead to create opportunities for external intervention.[43]
Because Rhodesian exports were generally competitive and had previously been entitled to preferential treatment on the British market, the former colony did not recognise the need for escalating the pace of diversification before independence. Following the UDI, however, Rhodesia began to demonstrate that she had the potential to develop a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency.[26][71] After the Rhodesian Front began introducing incentives accorded to domestic production, industrial output expanded dramatically. A rigid system of countermeasures enacted to combat sanctions succeeded in blunting their impact for at least a decade.[5] Over the next nine years Rhodesian companies, spiting the freezing of their assets and blocking of overseas accounts, also perfected cunning techniques of sanctions evasion through both local and foreign subsidiaries, which operated on a clandestine trade network.[5]
From 1968 until 1970, there was virtually no further dialogue between Rhodesia and the UK. This altered immediately after the ascension of Edward Heath, who reopened negotiations.[72] Smith remained optimistic that Heath would do his utmost to remedy Anglo-Rhodesian relations, although disappointed that he continued to adhere publicly to the original "five principles" proposed by Alec Douglas-Home, now foreign secretary. In November 1971, Douglas-Home renewed contacts with Salisbury and announced a proposed agreement which would be satisfactory to both sides – it recognised Rhodesia's 1969 constitution as the legal frame of government, while agreeing that gradual legislative representation was an acceptable formula for unhindered advance to majority rule.[5] Nevertheless, the new settlement, if approved, would also implement an immediate improvement in black political status, offer a means to terminate racial discrimination, and provide a solid guarantee against retrogressive constitutional amendments.[73]
Implementation of the proposed settlement hinged on popular acceptance, but the Rhodesian government consistently refused to submit it to a universal referendum.[5] A twenty four-member commission headed by an eminent jurist, Lord Pearce, was therefore tasked with ascertaining public opinion on the subject.[74] In 1972, the commission began interviewing interest groups and sampling opinions – although concern was expressed over the widespread apathy encountered.[26] According to every published finding, whites were in favour of the settlement, and Rhodesians of mixed or Asian background generally pleased, while black reaction was resoundingly negative.[72][75] As many as thirty African chiefs and politicians voiced their opposition, prompting Britain to withdraw from the proposals on the grounds of the commission's report.[74]
The Bush War[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Bush War
As early as 1960, minority rule in Southern Rhodesia was already being challenged by a rising tide of political violence led by African nationalists such as Joshua Nkomo and Ndabaningi Sithole. After their public campaigns were initially suppressed, many believed that negotiation was completely incapable of meeting their aspirations. Petrol bombings by radicals became increasingly common, with the Zimbabwe Review observing in 1961, "for the first time home-made petrol bombs were used by freedom fighters in Salisbury against settler establishments."[76] It was officially noted that between January and September 1962 alone, 33 bombings were carried out, in addition to 27 acts of attempted sabotage on communications. In that same period, nationalists were implicated in arson targeting 18 schools and 10 churches.[43] Nkomo's Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU) subsequently disclosed that it had formed a military wing (Zimbabwe People's Revolutionary Army, ZIPRA), and 'the decision to start bringing in arms and ammunition and to send young men away for sabotage training' had already been made. The Rhodesian authorities responded by banning ZAPU and driving its supporters underground.[77] Frustrated by their repeated failures, nationalists also conducted a campaign of terror against black Africans, murdering those who had either identified with the colonial administration or had simply failed to demonstrate their allegiance to the cause.[43] To protect civilians, emergency laws were imposed, broadening the legal definition of unlawful gatherings and giving the police greater powers to crack down on agitators or subversives.[78] The death sentence was also introduced for terrorism involving explosives and arson.[5]
A crisis of confidence soon resulted across ZAPU, which was already suffering from poor morale, compounded by tribal and ideological factionalism. In 1963, party dissidents rejected Joshua Nkomo's authority and formed their own organisation, the Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU) – which worked out its own strategy for impressing international opinion, undermining white assurance, and achieving a complete breakdown of order. By August 1964, ZANU, which had brutally intimidated neutrals and opponents alike, was outlawed by authorities as well.[79]
ZANU's agenda was inward-looking, leftist, and pan-Africanist in nature. Ndabaningi Sithole and avowed Marxist Robert Mugabe, its most prominent leaders, demanded a one party Zimbabwean state with majority rule and a public monopoly on land.[5] After being forced from Rhodesia, they continued to operate in exile, creating occupation groups representing urban workers, miners, and peasant farmers. ZANU also attracted professionals, students, and feminists to its ranks. While ZAPU theoretically continued to command the allegiance of most Ndebele and Shona activists, Sithole and Mugabe drew their support from the Mashonaland countryside.[5]
After the UDI, ZANU officials mapped an elaborate plan for the "liberation of Zimbabwe" which called for attacks on white farmers, destruction of cash crops, disrupting electricity in urban areas, and petrol bombings.[43] Sithole and Nkomo both insisted on the need for armed struggle, but disagreed on the means to go about it. For example, ZAPU tended to follow Soviet thinking, placing an emphasis on sophisticated weaponry in the hopes of winning a conventional battle like the Viet Minh at Dien Bien Phu. ZANU preferred to politicise populations in areas which they intended to seize.[68] Neither force, however, had acquired basic knowledge of guerrilla warfare. Debate on political theory and insurgent tactics became the obsession of nationalists at this stage.[43]




Soldier interrogates Rhodesian villagers about insurgent activity in late 1977. This photograph became one of the most enduring images of the bush war.


In April 1966, two Zimbabwe African National Liberation Army (ZANLA – the military wing of ZANU) units, having received prior training at Nanjing Military College, crossed into Rhodesia from Zambia. They were armed with SKS carbines, Chinese hand grenades, explosives, and communist pamphlets, having been issued vague instructions to sabotage important installations before killing white persons indiscriminately.[43] At least five guerrillas were simply arrested before getting very far. Another seven hoped to destroy a pylon carrying electricity to Sinoia in the northwest. Their faulty demolitions were uncovered by the Rhodesian Security Forces and the men easily tracked to a nearby ranch on 28 April, where they were shot resisting capture.[68][80][81] This event is considered to have been the first engagement of what came to be known as the "Bush War" in Rhodesia and the "Second Chimurenga" (or rebellion in Shona) by supporters of the guerrillas.[82]
The campaign proper is generally considered to have started in 1972 with the Attack on Altena Farm, despite the minor threat already represented by the nationalist movements in the 1960s.
After unsuccessful appeals to Britain and the United States for military assistance, Robert Mugabe, who was based in Mozambique after that country's independence from Portugal in 1975, led ZANU to seek support from the People's Republic of China and countries of the Soviet Bloc. Joshua Nkomo, based in Zambia and also supported by the Soviet Union, led ZAPU.[83] ZANU and ZAPU together formed 'the Patriotic Front'. Broadly, ZANLA recruited mainly from Mashonaland and Manicaland provinces, whilst the ZIPRA recruited from Mashonaland West, Midlands and Matabeleland provinces of Zimbabwe.
After the collapse of Portuguese rule in Mozambique in 1974–75, it was no longer viable for the Smith regime to sustain white minority rule indefinitely. By this time, even South Africa's Vorster had come to this view. While Vorster was unwilling to make concessions to his own country's blacks, he concluded that white minority rule was not sustainable in a country where blacks outnumbered whites 22:1.[83] In 1978, there were 270,000 Rhodesians of European descent and more than six million Africans.[84]
International business groups involved in the country (e.g. Lonrho) transferred their support from the Rhodesian government to black nationalist parties. Business leaders and politicians feted Nkomo on his visits to Europe. ZANU also attracted business supporters who saw the course that future events were likely to take.[85] Funding and arms support provided by supporters, particularly from the Soviet Union and its allies in the latter 1970s, allowed both ZIPRA and the ZANLA to acquire more sophisticated weaponry, thereby increasing the military pressure that the guerrillas were able to place on Rhodesia.
Until 1972, containing the guerrillas was little more than a police action. Even as late as August 1975 when Rhodesian government and black nationalist leaders met at Victoria Falls for negotiations brokered by South Africa and Zambia, the talks never got beyond the procedural phase.[86] Rhodesian representatives made it clear they were prepared to fight an all out war to prevent majority rule.[87] However, the situation changed dramatically after the end of Portuguese colonial rule in Mozambique in 1975. Rhodesia now found itself almost entirely surrounded by hostile states and even South Africa, its only real ally, pressed for a settlement.

Having let slip one chance after another of reaching an accommodation with more moderate black leaders, Rhodesia's whites seem to have made the tragic choice of facing black nationalism over the barrel of a gun rather than the conference table. The downhill road toward a race war in Rhodesia is becoming increasingly slippery with blood.
— Rand Daily Mail editorial, May 1976[88]

At this point, ZANU's alliance with FRELIMO (the Liberation Front of Mozambique) and the porous border between Mozambique and eastern Rhodesia enabled large-scale training and infiltration of ZANU/ZANLA fighters. The governments of Zambia and Botswana were also emboldened sufficiently to allow resistance movement bases to be set up in their territories. Guerrillas began to launch operations deep inside Rhodesia, attacking roads, railways, economic targets and isolated security force positions, in 1976.[89]




Rhodesian servicewoman takes aim with her Browning Hi-Power 9×19mm semi-automatic pistol; from a 1976 army recruitment poster


The government adopted a 'strategic hamlets' policy of the kind used in Malaya and Vietnam to restrict the influence of insurgents over the population of rural areas. Local people were forced to relocate to protected villages (PVs) which were strictly controlled and guarded by the government against rebel atrocities. The protected villages were compared by the guerrillas to concentration camps. Some contemporary accounts claim that this interference in the lives of local residents induced many of them who had previously been neutral to support the guerrillas.[90]
The war degenerated into rounds of increasing brutality from all three parties involved (ZANU and ZAPU, and the Rhodesian Army fighting off their attacks). Mike Subritzky, a former NZ Army ceasefire monitor in Rhodesia, in 1980 described the war as "both bloody and brutal and brought out the very worst in the opposing combatants on all three sides."[91]
End of the Bush War[edit]









The geographical situation in 1965 (left, on UDI) and 1975 (right, after the independence of Mozambique and Angola from Portugal). Green: Rhodesia; purple: friendly nations; orange: hostile states.


Rhodesia began to lose vital economic and military support from South Africa, which, while sympathetic to the white minority government, never accorded it diplomatic recognition. The South African government placed limits on the fuel and munitions they supplied to the Rhodesian military. They also withdrew the personnel and equipment that they had previously provided to aid the war effort, though covert military support continued.[92]
In 1976, the South African government and United States governments worked together to place pressure on Smith to agree to a form of majority rule. In response to the initiative of US Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, in 1976 Ian Smith accepted the principle of black majority rule within two years.[92] The Rhodesians now offered more concessions, but those concessions, focused on reaching an "internal settlement" with moderate black leaders, were insufficient to end the war.
At the time, some Rhodesians said the still embittered history between the British-dominated Rhodesia and the Afrikaner-dominated South Africa partly led South African government to withdraw its aid to Rhodesia. Ian Smith said in his memoirs that even though many white South Africans supported Rhodesia, South African Prime Minister John Vorster's policy of détente with the Black African states ended up with Rhodesia being offered as the "sacrificial lamb" to buy more time for South Africa. Other observers perceived South Africa's distancing itself from Rhodesia as being an early move in the process that led to majority rule in South Africa itself.[93]

In 1976 South Africa saw settlement of the Rhodesian question as vital on several fronts: to cauterise the wound of the psychological blow … caused by her defeat in the Angolan conflict; to pre-empt possible Cuban intervention in Rhodesia and the possibility of South Africa being sucked into another Cold War regional conflict without the support and endorsement of the western powers
— Dr Sue Onslow, South Africa and UDI[94]


In the latter 1970s, the militants had successfully put the economy of Rhodesia under significant pressure while the numbers of guerrillas in the country were steadily increasing.[95][96] The government abandoned its early strategy of trying to defend the borders in favour of trying to defend key economic areas and lines of communication with South Africa, while the rest of the countryside became a patchwork of "no-go areas".
Late 1970s[edit]
By the late 1970s, Rhodesia's front-line forces contained about 25,000 regular troops and police – backed up by relatively strong army and police reserves.[97] Its mechanised contingent consisted of light armoured cars and improvised mine-protected armoured personnel carriers, complemented by eight tanks (Polish built T-55LD tanks), delivered in the last year of the war. The Rhodesian Air Force operated an assortment of both Canberra light bombers, Hawker Hunter fighter bombers, older de Havilland Vampire jets as well as a somewhat antiquated, but still potent, helicopter arm. These forces, including highly trained special operations units, were capable of launching devastating raids on resistance movement camps outside the country, as in Operation Dingo in 1977 and other similar operations.
Nevertheless, guerrilla pressure inside the country itself was steadily increasing in the latter 1970s. By 1978–79, the war had become a contest between the guerrilla warfare placing ever increasing pressure on the Rhodesian regime and civil population and the Rhodesian government's strategy of trying to hold off the militants until external recognition for a compromise political settlement with moderate black leaders could be secured.
By this time, the need to cut a deal was apparent to most Rhodesians, but not to all. Ian Smith had dismissed his intransigent Defence Minister, P. K. van der Byl, as early as 1976.[98] "PK" had been a hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opposition or the international community since before UDI.

...it is better to fight to the last man and the last cartridge and die with some honour. Because, what is being presented to us here is a degree of humiliation...
— P. K. van der Byl in 1977, commenting on a British peace plan.[99]

Van der Byl eventually retired to his country estate outside Cape Town, but there were elements in Rhodesia, mainly embittered former security force personnel, who forcibly opposed majority rule up to and well beyond the establishment of majority rule.[100] New white immigrants continued to arrive in Rhodesia right up to the eve of majority rule.[101]
Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas[edit]
Main article: Rhodesia and weapons of mass destruction
The program's primary purpose was to kill guerrillas whether they were recruits transiting to camps in Mozambique or guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia. The CBW effort took on the guerrilla threat from three fronts.[102] First, the effort aimed to eliminate guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia through contaminated supplies either provided by contact men, recovered from hidden caches, or stolen from rural stores.[103] Secondly, the effort worked to contaminate water supplies along guerrilla infiltration routes into Rhodesia, forcing the guerrillas either to travel through arid regions to carry more water and less ammunition or travel through areas patrolled by the security forces.[104] Finally, the Rhodesians sought to hit the guerrillas in their camps in Mozambique by poisoning food, beverages, and medicines.
The chemicals most used in the Rhodesian program were parathion (an organophosphate insecticide) and thallium (a heavy metal commonly found in rodenticide).[105] The Rhodesians selected for use also included Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera) and possibly Bacillus anthracis (causative agent of anthrax). They also looked at using Rickettsia prowazekii (causative agent of epidemic typhus), and Salmonella typhi (causative agent of typhoid fever), and toxins—such as ricin and botulinum toxin.[102]
Biological agents, namely Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera), had some impact on the fighting capability of ZANLA.[106] Some former officers of the Rhodesian Security Forces alleged that anthrax was covertly used by Rhodesian psy-ops units during the late 1970s, but these statements are unfounded. Rhodesia never possessed the capability to produce anthrax spores on the scale needed for widespread dissemination.[102] Use of anthracis, ricin, or botulinum toxin would have been confined to assassination attempts.[102] Some more-merited allegations are that the South African government's top-secret chemical and biological weapons program, a progenitor of Project Coast, used Rhodesia as a "laboratory".[106]
Security Situation Erodes Rapidly[edit]
The work of journalists such as Lord Richard Cecil, son of the Marquess of Salisbury, stiffened the morale of Rhodesians and their overseas supporters.[107] Lord Richard produced regular news reports such as the Thames TV 'Frontline Rhodesia' features. These reports typically contrasted the incompetent insurgents with the "superbly professional" government troops.[108] A group of ZANLA fighters killed Lord Richard on 20 April 1978 when he was accompanying a Rhodesian airborne unit employed in Fire Force Operations.[109]
The shooting down on 3 September 1978 of the civilian Vickers Viscount airliner Hunyani, Air Rhodesia Flight RH825, in the Kariba area by ZIPRA fighters using a surface-to-air missile, with the subsequent massacre of its survivors, is widely considered to be the event that finally destroyed the Rhodesians' will to continue the war. Although militarily insignificant, the loss of this aircraft (and a second Viscount, the Umniati, in 1979) demonstrated the reach of resistance movements extended to Rhodesian civil society.[110]
The Rhodesians' means to continue the war were also eroding fast. In December 1978, a ZANLA unit penetrated the outskirts of Salisbury and fired a volley of rockets and incendiary device rounds into the main oil storage depot – the most heavily defended economic asset in the country. The storage tanks burned for five days, giving off a column of smoke that could be seen 130 kilometres (80 mi) away. Five hundred thousand barrels (79,000 m3) of petroleum product (comprising Rhodesia's strategic oil reserve) were lost.[111]
The government's defence spending increased from R$30 million, 8.5% of the national budget in 1971 to 1972, to R$400 m in 1978 to 1979, 47% of the national budget. In 1980, the post-independence government of Zimbabwe inherited a US$500 million national debt.[112]
End of UDI (1979)[edit]




Signing the Rhodesian Internal Settlement (from left: Bishop Abel Muzorewa, Ian Smith, Jeremiah Chirau and Ndabaningi Sithole)


The Rhodesian army continued its "mobile counter-offensive" strategy of holding key positions ("vital asset ground") while carrying out raids into the no-go areas and into neighbouring countries. While often extraordinarily successful in inflicting heavy guerrilla casualties, such raids also on occasion failed to achieve their objectives. In April 1979 special forces carried out a raid on Joshua Nkomo's residence in Lusaka (Zambia) with the stated intention of assassinating him.[113] Nkomo and his family left hastily a few hours before the raid – having clearly been warned that the raid was coming.
In 1979, some special forces units were accused of using counterinsurgent operations as cover for ivory poaching and smuggling. Colonel Reid-Daly (commander of the Selous Scouts) discovered that his phone was bugged and after challenging a superior officer on this issue was court martialled for insubordination. He received the lightest sentence possible, a caution, but he continued to fight his conviction and eventually resigned his commission and left the Army.
By 1978–79, up to 70% of the regular army was composed of black soldiers (though both the army and police reserves remained overwhelmingly white). By 1979 there were also 30 black commissioned officers in the regular army. While there was never any suggestion of disloyalty among the soldiers from predominantly black units (in particular within the Selous Scouts or the Rhodesian African Rifles – RAR), some argue that, by the time of the 1980 election, many of the RAR soldiers voted for Robert Mugabe.[114]
As the result of an Internal Settlement signed on 3 March 1978 between the Rhodesian government and the moderate African nationalist parties, which were not in exile and not involved in the war, elections were held in April 1979. The United African National Council (UANC) party won a majority in this election, and its leader, Abel Muzorewa (a United Methodist Church bishop), became the country's first black prime minister on 1 June 1979. The country's name was changed to Zimbabwe Rhodesia. The internal settlement left control of the country's police, security forces, civil service and judiciary in white hands, for the moment. It assured whites of about one third of the seats in parliament. It was essentially a power-sharing arrangement between whites and blacks which, in the eyes of many, particularly the insurgents, did not amount to majority rule.[115] However, the United States Senate voted to end economic sanctions against Zimbabwe Rhodesia on 12 June.[116]
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU. In spite of offers from Ian Smith, the latter parties declined to participate in an election in which their political position would be insecure and under a proposed constitution which they had played no part in drafting and which was perceived as retaining strong white minority privilege.
Bishop Muzorewa's government did not receive international recognition. The Bush War continued unabated and sanctions were not lifted. The international community refused to accept the validity of any agreement which did not incorporate the main nationalist parties. The British Government (then led by the recently elected Margaret Thatcher) issued invitations to all parties to attend a peace conference at Lancaster House. These negotiations took place in London in late 1979. The three-month-long conference almost failed to reach conclusion, due to disagreements on land reform, but resulted in the Lancaster House Agreement. UDI ended, and Rhodesia temporarily reverted to the status of a British colony (the 'Colony of Southern Rhodesia').[117]
The Lancaster House Agreement further provided for a ceasefire which was followed by an internationally supervised general election, held on February 1980. ZANU led by Robert Mugabe won this election, some alleged,[who?] by terrorising its political opposition, including supporters of ZAPU, through former insurgents that had not confined themselves to the designated guerrilla assembly points, as stipulated by the Lancaster House Agreement. The observers and the newly installed governor Lord Soames were accused of looking the other way, and Mugabe's victory was certified. Nevertheless, few could doubt that Mugabe's support within his majority Shona tribal group was extremely strong. The Rhodesian military seriously considered mounting a coup against a perceived stolen election ("Operation Quartz") to prevent ZANU from taking over the country.[118] The alleged coup was to include the assassination of Mugabe and coordinated assaults on guerrilla assembly points throughout the country. The plan was eventually scuttled, as it was obvious that Mugabe enjoyed widespread support from the black majority despite voter intimidation, as well as the fact that the coup would gain no external support, and a conflagration which would engulf the country was seen as inevitable.
Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)[edit]
Mugabe and the victorious black nationalists were rather less concerned by Operation Quartz than by the possibility that there might be a mass exodus of the white community of the kind that had caused chaos in Mozambique five years earlier. Such an exodus had been prepared for by the South African government. With the agreement of the British Governor of Rhodesia, South African troops had entered the country to secure the road approaches to the Beit Bridge border crossing point. Refugee camps had been prepared in the Transvaal. On the day the election results became known, most white families had prepared contingency plans for flight, including the packing of cars and suitcases.
However, after a meeting with Robert Mugabe and the central committee of ZANU (PF), Ian Smith was reassured that whites could, and should stay in the new Zimbabwe. Mugabe promised that he would abide strictly by the terms of the Lancaster House Agreement and that changes in Zimbabwe would be made gradually and by proper legal process. In a CBS news interview, Mugabe claimed that Rhodesian whites "...are still in control of the economy, the majority being commercial farmers.",[119] Mugabe however, would reverse his commitment to these agreements some years later; the regime began confiscating white owned farm lands. This is widely blamed for leading to the deterioration of the Zimbabwean economy which plagues the country today.[120]
On 18 April 1980 the country became independent as the Republic of Zimbabwe, and its capital, Salisbury, was renamed Harare two years later.
Politics[edit]



Rhodesia






This article is part of a series on the
politics and government of
Rhodesia




Constitutional history



— Overview
1890–1923  BSA Company rule
1923–1980  Southern Rhodesia
1953–1963  Rhodesia–Nyasaland Federation
1965–1979  Rhodesia under UDI
 1979  Zimbabwe Rhodesia (under UDI)









Government


Governor / President
Prime Minister








Legislature



1899–1923  Legislative Council
1924–1970  Legislative Assembly









Elections


General


1924 1928 1933 1934 1939 1946 1948 1954 1958 1962 1965 1970 1974 1977 1979 1980



Legislative Council


1899 1902 1905 1908 1911 1914 1920



Referendums


1922 1934 1953 1961 1964 1969 1979











Political parties


African National Congress
Communist Party
Labour Party
Liberal Party
Rhodesia Party
Rhodesian Action Party
Rhodesian Front
United African National Council
United Federal Party

Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU)


Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU)









Foreign relations



Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI)

Mission in Lisbon
Passport








National symbols


Flag (other flags)
Anthem









Other countries
Atlas








v
t
e





Main article: Politics of Rhodesia




The Presidential flag of Rhodesia.


Although Southern Rhodesia never gained full dominion status within the Commonwealth of Nations, Southern Rhodesians ruled themselves from the attainment of 'Responsible Government' in 1923. Its electoral register had property and education qualifications. Over the years various electoral arrangements made at a national and municipal level upheld these standards. For example, the franchise for the first Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council election in 1899 contained the following requirement:

"voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth £75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of £50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months' continuous residence was also required for qualifications (b) and (c)."

Following Cecil Rhodes's dictum of "equal rights for all civilised men", there was no overt racial component to the franchise. However, the requirement excluded a majority of native blacks from the electorate.
Up until the 1950s, Southern Rhodesia had a vibrant political life with right and left wing parties competing for power. The Rhodesian Labour Party held seats in the Assembly and in municipal councils throughout the 1920s and 1930s. From 1953 to 1958, the prime minister was Garfield Todd, a liberal who did much to promote the development of the Black community through investment in education, housing and healthcare. However, the government forced Todd from office because his proposed reforms were seen by many whites as too radical.
From 1958 onwards, white settler politics consolidated and ossified around resistance to majority rule, setting the stage for UDI. The 1961 Constitution governed Southern Rhodesia and independent Rhodesia up until 1969, using the Westminster Parliamentary System modified by a system of separate voter rolls with differing property and education qualifications, without regard to race. Whites ended up with the majority of Assembly seats.
The 1969 republican constitution established a bicameral Parliament consisting of an indirectly elected Senate and a directly elected House of Assembly, effectively reserving the majority of seats for whites. The office of President had only ceremonial significance with the Prime Minister holding executive power.
The Constitution of the short-lived Zimbabwe Rhodesia, which saw a black-led government elected for the first time, reserved 28 of the 100 parliamentary seats for whites. The independence constitution agreed at Lancaster House watered those provisions down and reserved 20 out of 100 seats for whites in the House of Assembly and 8 out of 40 seats in the Senate. The constitution prohibited Zimbabwe authorities from altering the Constitution for seven years without unanimous consent and required a three-quarters vote in Parliament for a further three years. The government amended the Constitution in 1987 to abolish the seats reserved for whites, and replace the office of Prime Minister with an executive President. In 1990, the government abolished the Senate.
Military and police[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Security Forces
Rhodesian Security Forces consisted of the Rhodesian Army, Royal Rhodesian Air Force, British South Africa Police, Rhodesian Ministry of Internal Affairs (INTAF) and the Guard Force. Despite the impact of economic and diplomatic sanctions, Rhodesia was able to develop and maintain a potent and professional military capability.[121] Time magazine reported in June 1977 that "man for man, the Rhodesian army ranks among the world's finest fighting units."[122]
Foreign relations[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2011) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Throughout the period of its Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965 to 1979), Rhodesia pursued a foreign policy of attempting to secure recognition as an independent country, and insisting that its political system would include 'gradual steps to majority rule.' Ardently anti-communist, Rhodesia tried to present itself to the West as a front-line state against communist expansion in Africa, to little avail. Rhodesia received little international recognition during its existence; recognition only occurred after elections in 1980 and a transition to majority rule.
Rhodesia wished to retain its economic prosperity and also feared communist elements in the rebel forces, and thus felt their policy of a gradual progression to black majority rule was justified. However, the international community refused to accept this rationale, believing that their policies were perpetuating racism. This attitude was part of the larger decolonisation context, during which Western powers such as the United Kingdom, France, and Belgium hastened to grant independence to their colonies in Africa.
Britain and the UDI[edit]
Rhodesia was originally a British colony. Although decolonisation in Africa had begun after World War II, it began accelerating in the early 1960s, causing Britain to negotiate independence rapidly with several of its colonies. During this period, it adopted a foreign policy called NIBMAR, or No Independence Before Majority African Rule, mandating democratic reforms that placed governance in the hands of the majority black Africans. The governing white minority of Rhodesia, led by Ian Smith, opposed the policy and its implications. On 11 November 1965, Rhodesia's minority white government made a unilateral declaration of independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom, as it became apparent that negotiations would not lead to independence under the white regime.
The United Kingdom government immediately brought in legislation (Southern Rhodesia Act 1965) which formally abolished all Rhodesian government institutions. This move made life difficult for Rhodesian citizens who wished to travel internationally as passports issued by Rhodesia's UDI administration were not recognised as valid;[123] in January 1966, the British issued a statement accepting as valid any passport issued before the declaration of independence and allowing six-month United Kingdom passports to be granted when they expired – provided that the bearer declared they did not intend to aid the UDI Rhodesian government.[124]
Until late 1969, Rhodesia still recognised Queen Elizabeth II as head of state, even though it opposed the British government itself for hindering its goals of independence. The Queen, however, refused to accept the title Queen of Rhodesia. Eventually, the Smith government abandoned attempts to remain loyal to the Crown, and in 1969, a majority of the electorate voted in referendum to declare Rhodesia a republic. They hoped that this move would facilitate recognition as an independent state by the international community, but the issues of white minority control remained and hindered this effort, and like the UDI before it, the proclamation of a republic lacked international recognition.
Sanctions[edit]
After the declaration of independence, and indeed for the entire duration of its existence, Rhodesia did not receive official recognition from any state, although it did maintain diplomatic relations with South Africa, which was then under apartheid. South Africa did not recognise Rhodesia to preserve its fragile positions with other nations, but frequently assisted the republic. Portugal maintained informal relations until the Carnation Revolution of 1974. The day following the declaration of independence, the United Nations Security Council passed a resolution (S/RES/216) calling upon all states not to accord Rhodesia recognition, and to refrain from any assistance. The Security Council also imposed selective mandatory economic sanctions, which were later made comprehensive.
Malawi,[125] Israel, South Africa, Portugal, and Iran did not comply with economic sanctions against Rhodesia.[126] The US, despite voting in favor of the sanctions at the UNSC, violated them to buy chrome ore from Rhodesia.[127] Kenneth Kaunda, president of Zambia, also accused western oil companies of violating the sanctions and selling oil to Rhodesia.[128]
International perspective[edit]
Rhodesia's Unilateral Declaration of Independence from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965 was promptly condemned by the international community. The United Nations Security Council Resolution 216 of 12 November 1965 called "upon all States not to recognise this illegal racist minority regime in Southern Rhodesia."[129]
Rhodesia campaigned for international acceptance and invoked the doctrine of non-intervention in internal affairs as justification for rebuking external criticism of its internal policies. However, the emerging doctrine of self-determination in colonial situations meant that most nations regarded Rhodesia as illegitimate.
Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia, took a pragmatic approach towards Rhodesia. Kenneth Kaunda, heavily dependent on access through Rhodesia for his nation's copper ore exports, fuel, and power imports unofficially worked with the Rhodesian government. Rhodesia still allowed Zambia to export and import its goods through its territory to Mozambique ports, despite the Zambian government's official policy of hostility and non-recognition of the post-UDI Smith Administration.
The United States, like all other Western nations, refused to recognise Rhodesia, but unlike others allowed its Consulate-General to function as a communications conduit between the American government in Washington, D.C., and the Rhodesian government in Salisbury. When Rhodesia set up an information office in Washington, D.C., OAS nations loudly protested. The US government responded by saying the Rhodesian mission and its staff had no official diplomatic status and violated no US laws.
Portugal pursued a middle path with Rhodesia. While not officially recognising Rhodesia under Ian Smith, the government of António Salazar did permit Rhodesia to establish a representative mission in Lisbon, and permitted Rhodesian exports and imports through their colony of Mozambique. The Portuguese government in power at that time, authoritarian and ardently anti-communist, gave active behind-the-scenes support in Rhodesia's fight against the guerrilla groups.
South Africa, itself under international pressure as a white minority government, pursued a policy of détente with the black African states at the time. These states wanted South Africa to pressure Ian Smith to accept a faster transition to majority rule in Rhodesia, in return for pledges of non-interference in South Africa's internal affairs. Prime Minister John Vorster, believing majority rule in Rhodesia would lead to international acceptance for South Africa, used a number of tactics to pressure Smith. The South African government held up shipments of fuel and ammunition and pulled out friendly South African forces from Rhodesia. The combined loss of Mozambique and the loss of support from South Africa dealt critical blows to the Rhodesian government.
Diplomatic relations[edit]
After the UDI, Rhodesia maintained several overseas missions, including Pretoria,[130] and until 1975, Lisbon in Portugal and Lourenço Marques (now Maputo) in Mozambique.[131]
Since 1961, Rhodesia had had an "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" with South Africa, heading a "Rhodesian Diplomatic Mission" or de facto embassy.[132] Before South Africa left the Commonwealth that year, the then Southern Rhodesia had exchanged High Commissioners with the then Union of South Africa, but following the change in status, the Republic now had a "South African Diplomatic Mission" in Salisbury.[133]
During 1965, the government of Rhodesia made moves to establish a mission in Lisbon separate from the British Embassy, with its own accredited representative, having previously been able to establish its own consulate in Lourenço Marques, capital of Portuguese Mozambique.[134] This prompted protests from the British government, which was determined that the representative, Harry Reedman, should be a nominal member of the British Ambassador's staff.[135] For their part, the Portuguese authorities sought a compromise whereby they would accept Reedman as an independent representative but deny him diplomatic status.[136]
The Rhodesian Information Office in Washington remained open following UDI, but its director, Ken Towsey, and his staff were deprived of their diplomatic status.[137] Previously, there had been a "Minister for Rhodesian Affairs" operating under the aegis of the British Embassy in Washington,[138] as well representatives in Tokyo and Bonn.[139] Following the country's independence as Zimbabwe, Towsey became chargé d'affaires at the new Embassy.[140]
The High Commission in London, known as Rhodesia House, continued to function until it was closed in 1969 following the decision by white Rhodesians in a referendum to make the country a republic, along with the "British Residual Mission" in Salisbury.[141] Prior to its closure, the mission flew the newly adopted Flag of Rhodesia, considered illegal by the Foreign Office, prompting calls by Labour MP Willie Hamilton for its removal.[142]
In Australia, the federal government in Canberra sought to close the Rhodesian Information Centre in Sydney,[143] but it remained open, operating under the jurisdiction of the state of New South Wales.[144] In 1973, the Labor government of Gough Whitlam cut post and telephone links to the Centre, but this was ruled illegal by the High Court.[145] An office was also established in Paris, but this was closed down by the French government in 1977.[146]
Similarly, the United States recalled its consul-general from Salisbury, and reduced consular staff,[147] but did not move to close its consulate until the declaration of a republic in 1970.[148] South Africa, however, retained its "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" after UDI,[149] which allowed it to continue to recognise British sovereignty as well as to deal with the de facto authority of the government of Ian Smith.[150]
The South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury became the only such mission remaining in the country after 1975,[151] when Portugal downgraded its mission to consul level,[152] having recalled its consul-general in Salisbury in May 1970.[153] After Zimbabwe's independence, the new government closed its missions in Pretoria and Cape Town, only maintaining a trade mission in Johannesburg,[154] while the South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury was also closed.[155]
Results[edit]
Continuing civil war and a lack of international support eventually led the Rhodesian government to submit to an agreement with the UK in 1979. This led to internationally supervised elections, won by Zimbabwe African National Union - Patriotic Front and Robert Mugabe, establishing the internationally recognised Zimbabwe.
Legacy[edit]
In the ten years after independence, around 60% of the white population of Zimbabwe emigrated, most to South Africa and to other mainly white, English speaking countries where they formed expatriate communities. Politically within Zimbabwe, the consolidation of power by Robert Mugabe continued through the 1980s. Following amendments to the country's constitution in 1987, parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished, and an executive presidency was created, held by Mugabe. Many expatriates and some of the whites who stayed in Zimbabwe became deeply nostalgic for Rhodesia. These individuals are known as "Rhodies." Native whites who are more accepting of the new order are known as "Zimbos."
While as Rhodesia, the country was once considered the breadbasket of Africa. Today, Zimbabwe is a net importer of foodstuffs, with the European Union and United States providing emergency food relief as humanitarian aid on a regular basis.[156] The nation has suffered profound economic and social decline in the past twenty years. Recently the agriculture sector has started to do well since the availability of expertise and machines has improved supported mainly by China.[157][158]
Zimbabwe also suffered from a crippling inflation rate, as the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe had a policy of printing money to satisfy government debts, which introduces excessive currency into the economic system which led to the demise of the local currency. This policy caused the inflation rate to soar from 32% in 1998 (considered extremely high by most economic standards) to an astonishing 11,200,000% by 2007. Monetary aid by the International Monetary Fund has been suspended due to the Zimbabwe government's defaulting on past loans, inability to stabilise its own economy, and its inability to stem corruption and advance human rights.[156] In 2009, Zimbabwe abandoned its currency, relying instead on foreign currencies such as the South African rand, the US dollar, the Botswana pula, the euro and the British pound, among others.[159]
In 2008 elections, Mugabe garnered 41%, Simba Makoni 10% and Morgan Tsvangirai 48% of the votes cast for president forcing a runoff election called by the Zimbabwe Electoral Commission (ZEC). In the months leading to the run-off, instances of extreme violence between the two major parties (ZANU PF and MDC) led Tsvangirai to withdraw from the election. In February 2009, a power-sharing accord was reached which resulted in the Zimbabwe Government of National Unity of 2009. The accord was, essentially, to create the position of "Prime Minister" for Tsvangirai, who served in that role from 2009 to 2013. Mugabe retained the title of President.
Rhodesian media[edit]
The main newspapers were the Rhodesia Herald in Salisbury and The Chronicle in Bulawayo. Following UDI, in 1976, the state-run Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation (RBC) took over the privately owned Rhodesian Television (RTV) service, in which it had previously acquired a 51 per cent stake.[160] Among the news magazines published in Rhodesia under UDI were the Illustrated Life Rhodesia, while The Valiant Years by Beryl Salt told the history of Rhodesia from 1890 to 1978 entirely through the medium of facsimile reproduction of articles and headlines from Rhodesian newspapers.[161]
References[edit]


^ a b Rowland, J. Reid. "Constitutional History of Rhodesia: An outline".  in Berlyn, Phillippa (April 1978). The Quiet Man: A Biography of the Hon. Ian Douglas Smith. Salisbury: M. O. Collins. pp. 240–256. OCLC 4282978. 
^

Palley, Claire (1966). The Constitutional History and Law of Southern Rhodesia 1888–1965, with Special Reference to Imperial Control (First ed.). Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 742–743. OCLC 406157. 


^ a b c d Duignan, Peter (1986), Politics and Government in African States 1960–1985, Croom Helm Ltd, ISBN 0-7099-1475-X 
^ Volume V: Africa, Australia, and Southern Islands. Lands and Peoples: The World in Color. The Grolier Society of Canada Ltd 1955. Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 54-11291. p 19-109.
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t Nelson, Harold (1983), Zimbabwe: a country study, The American University (Washington, D.C.), ISBN 0160015987 
^ "Rhodesia – Mzilikaze to Smith". Rhodesia.nl. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "The Cabinet Papers | Rhodesia and the Central African Federation". Nationalarchives.gov.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "History of Zimbabwe". Historyworld.net. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645 - Authority for date of annexation having been 12 September 1923
^ a b Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia by Vera Gowlland-Debbas
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645
^ Southern Rhodesia Constitution Letters Patent 1923
^ "Parliament". Rhodesia.me.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Full text of "Southern Rhodesia 1890–1950; A Record of Sixty Years Progress"". Archive.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbambwe". Sapst.org. 22 December 1987. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Weitzer, Ronald. Transforming Settler States: Communal Conflict and Internal Security in Northern Ireland and Zimbabwe. pp. 1–206. 
^ afrikantraveler (16 May 2012). "Rhodesia: A Failed Attempt to Maintain Racism into the 21st Century". The African File. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Hastings Kamuzu Banda Biography – Detoured on Road to Become a Doctor, Pursued Degrees with Diligence, Spoke Out Against Racism – JRank Articles". Biography.jrank.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Novak, Andrew. "Academia.edu | Sport and Racial Discrimination in Colonial Zimbabwe: A Reanalysis | Andrew Novak". Independent.academia.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Wills, A.J. (1967). "Three Territories". An Introduction to the History of Central Africa (2nd ed.). Durban: Oxford University Press. p. Appendix IV. ISBN 0-620-06410-2. Retrieved 10 September 2012. 
^ "Database – Uppsala Conflict Data Program". UCDP. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "On Board the Tiger". Rhodesia.nl. 9 October 1968. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA PSYOP 1965". Psywarrior.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A brief history of Zimbabwe". Zimembassy.se. 18 April 1980. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Smith, Ian (1997). The Great Betrayal. London: Blake Publishing Ltd. pp. 74–256. ISBN 1-85782-176-9. 
^ "Chronology: Rhodesia UDI: Road to Settlement" (PDF). Lse.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Principled failure: British policy toward Rhodesia, 1971–72 | Assorted Materials: Johnny Ryan". Johnnyryan.wordpress.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA: DEFINITION OF THE FIVE PRINCIPLES (Hansard, 16 December 1970)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 16 December 1970. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Chronology for Europeans in Zimbabwe". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A Brief History of Zimbabwe – Part 1: Early Kingdoms to UDI". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cowell, Alan (21 November 2007). "Ian Smith, Defiant Symbol of White Rule in Africa, Is Dead at 88". The New York Times. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbabwe (country)". Talktalk.co.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Policy For Rhodesia from theTribune Magazine Archive". Archive.tribunemagazine.co.uk. 23 September 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "White referendum in Southern Rhodesia is overwhelmingly in support of Ian Smith's proposal for independence. | South African History Online". Sahistory.org.za. 6 November 1964. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "British South Rhodesia (1964–1980)". Uca.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Elections in Zimbabwe". Africanelections.tripod.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Lunch with Harold Wilson | Pop Theory". Clivebarnett.wordpress.com. 12 September 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia: The Last Thread". TIME. 30 December 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Chris McGreal (13 April 2008). "There are many villains to blame for Zimbabwe's decade of horror | World news | The Observer". London: Guardian. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Mungazi, Dickson. Last Defenders of the Laager: Ian D. Smith and F.W. de Klerk. pp. 1–288. 
^ a b c d Raftopolous, Brian. Becoming Zimbabwe: A History from the pre-colonial period to 2008. pp. 1–298. 
^ a b c d e f g h Raeburn, Michael. We are everywhere: Narratives from Rhodesian guerillas. pp. 1–209. 
^ "Issue 6, Spring 2011". Genocidepreventionnow.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA (Hansard, 21 January 1969)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 21 January 1969. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Question of Southern Rhodesia". undocs.org. United Nations. 12 October 1965. A/RES/2012(XX). Retrieved 17 March 2017. 
^ "Southern Times-Learning From Rhodesia". Southerntimesafrica.com. 12 November 1965. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Resolution 221 (1966) of 9 April 1966". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Gowlland-Debbas, Vera (1990), Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers, ISBN 0-7923-0811-5 
^ "The Secretary of State, Washington" (PDF). Gwu.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Okoth, Assa (2006), A History of Africa: Volume 2: 1915–1995, East African Educational Publishers Ltd, ISBN 9966-25-358-0 
^ "When Sanctions Worked: The Case of Rhodesia Reexamined". Africafocus.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia Unilateral Declaration of Independence 1965 – Online exhibition". Commonwealth.sas.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Meredith, Martin. The Past is Another Country. p. 218. 
^ "1970:Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". BBC News. 2 March 1970. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "Chemistry – Ian Smith". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Chemistry – Humphrey Gibbs". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Herald, Salisbury, 13 to 20 September 1968
^ "Stella Madzimbamuto (Appellant) v Desmond William Lardner Burke and Frederick Phillip George (Respondents)" (PDF). Jurisafrica.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "In re James (an insolvent)". Uniset.ca. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Lauterpacht, Elihu. International Law Reports (Volume 39). pp. 1–78. 
^ http://archive.lib.msu.edu/DMC/African%20Journals/pdfs/Journal%20of%20the%20University%20of%20Zimbabwe/vol3n1/juz003001001.pdf
^ "HMS Tiger". Barrylockyer.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Smock, David R. "The Forgotten Rhodesians". Foreign Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cockram, B. "Rhodesia Rides A Tiger" (PDF). South African Institute of International Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "2 March 1970 – Rhodesia Declared a Republic". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "BBC ON THIS DAY - 2 - 1970: Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". bbc.co.uk. 
^ a b c Clayton, Anthony. Frontiersmen: Warfare in Africa since 1950. pp. 1–260. 
^ Dr. Sue Onslow. "UDI: 40 Years On". LSE. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ Michael Hartnack (2005). "40 years in wilderness after UDI declaration". The Herald. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "What's Wrong With Trade Sanctions". Cato Institute. 23 December 1985. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Brownell, Josiah. Collapse of Rhodesia: Population Demographics and the Politics of Race. pp. 1–255. 
^ "Zimbabwe Rejects Sellout!" (PDF). American Committee on Africa. 1 February 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Zvobgo, Chengetai. A History of Zimbabwe, 1890–2000 and Postscript, Zimbabwe, 2001–2008. pp. 1–410. 
^ "1972: Rhodesia's former leader arrested". BBC. 18 January 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ "Insurgency in Rhodesia, 1957–1973: An Account and Assessment". International Institute for Strategic Studies. 1973. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Shamuyarira, Nathan. Crisis in Rhodesia. pp. 202–203. 
^ Palm Beach Post, Miami, 26 March 1959
^ "The Rhodesian Agreement: Aspects and Prospects". South African Institute of International Affairs. 1978. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Moorcraft and McLaughlin, Peter, Paul (2008). The Rhodesian War: A Military History. pp. 1–200. 
^ "Rhodesian Air Force Anti Terrorist Operations (COINOPS)". rhodesianforces.org. 2012. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Spring, William (1986). The Long Fields: Zimbabwe Since Independence. p. 38. 
^ a b "APF newsletter, "Appraisal of Rhodesia in 1975"". Archived from the original on 31 May 2009. 
^ Ian Beckett. "Report on Bush War, paragraph 10". 
^ The Guardian, 21 April 2000 British Multimillionaire bankrolls Mugabe party
^ Brookings Institution: p156, study on conflict resolution
^ "Peace talks fail". BBC news. 26 August 1975. Retrieved 27 November 2007. 
^ "Rhodesia: A Strike At the Lifeline". Rand Daily Mail via TIME magazine. 1976. p. 2. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ "A Strike at the Lifeline". TIME magazine. 1976. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ APF Newsletter, 1976 :Rhodesia's "Protected" Blacks
^ "Operation Agila, "The British Empire's Last Sunset"". NZ History. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ a b "BBC ON THIS DAY | 24 | 1976: White rule in Rhodesia to end". BBC News. 24 September 1976. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ APF newsletter, 1976: appraisal of Rhodesia in 1976
^ "Cold War Studies Project". lse.ac.uk. 
^ Time magazine, 7 August 1978: Rhodesia faces collapse
^ Time magazine, 1 August 1978: taking the chicken run
^ Major Charles Lohman and Major Robert MacPherson. ""Rhodesia: Tactical Victory, Strategic Defeat" WAR SINCE 1945 SEMINAR AND SYMPOSIUM, US Marine Corps Command and Staff College, June 1983 – See Chapter 3". Scribd.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Worldwide:"PK"
^ The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p 291
^ Newsnet report : saboteurs hit Zimbabwean military, partisan comment
^ Time magazine, October 1977 : The Land of Opportunity
^ a b c d Glenn Cross, "Dirty War: Rhodesia and Chemical Biological Warfare, 1975-1980," Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, 2017
^ Ed Bird. Special Branch War: Slaughter in the Rhodesian Bush Southern Ndebele land, 1976-1980. Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, Ltd. 2014.
^ Jim Parker, "Assignment Selous Scouts: The Inside Story of a Rhodesian Special Branch Officer". Johannesburg, South Africa: Galago Press, 2006
^ Chandré Gould and Peter Folb. "Project Coast: Apartheid’s Chemical and Biological Warfare Programme". Geneva: United Nations Institute for Disarmament Research, 2002.
^ a b Southern African News Feature: the plague wars
^ The Guardian, 15 July 2003: obituary of sixth Marquess of Salisbury
^ Nick Downie report: caution, partisan comment
^ 2nd Lt CJE Vincent BCR who was present when Lord Cecil was killed
^ The Viscount Disasters – The Story
^ The Atlantic Monthly : The Fragility of Domestic Energy, see page 5
^ Selby thesis: ZWNEWS.com, p 88
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War, para 7.
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War.
^ BBC "On this day" report :1 June 1979.
^ Senate Votes Down A Move To Preserve Rhodesia Sanctions; Arms-Bill Veto Threatened White House Says 52-to-41 Margin Shows President Has Support to Prevent an Override, 13 June 1979. The New York Times.
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Allport, R. "Operation Quartz – Rhodesia 1980" (PDF). memoriesofrhodesia.com. 
^ Video on YouTube
^ "Ian Smith's farm seized in Zimbabwe as Robert Mugabe eyes election". BBC News. 7 December 2012. 
^ Rogers 1998, p. 41
^ "The World: The Military: A Mission Impossible". Time. New York. 13 June 1977. Retrieved 3 December 2011. 
^ The Southern Rhodesia (Property in Passports) Order 1965 provided that they were the property of the British government, allowing them to be impounded if presented by anyone arriving at a port of entry. See Hansard, HC 5ser vol 721 col 696.
^ The statement is printed in Hansard HC 5ser vol 723 col 4.
^ http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,836951,00.html
^ http://www.southafricaproject.info/rhodesia_and_south_africa.html
^ https://library.cqpress.com/cqalmanac/document.php?id=cqal75-1214210
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1978/09/22/zambian-to-meet-with-callaghan-on-un-oil-sanction-violations/bdd35f61-e9cb-463f-a319-38981df92cf3/
^ Wikisource:United Nations Security Council Resolution 216
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 52
^ Rhodesians to quit Lisbon, Glasgow Herald, 1 May 1975, page 4
^ Report of the Secretary for Information, Immigration, and Tourism
^ Diplomacy with a Difference: the Commonwealth Office of High Commissioner, 1880-2006, Lorna Lloyd, BRILL, 2007, page 240
^ John Arthur KINSEY, Esq., Consul-General for the Federation at Lourenco Marques, London Gazette, 5th June 1959
^ Rhodesia's Man in Lisbon: Objective Said To Be Achieved, The Glasgow Herald, 22 September 1965. page 9
^ International Diplomacy and Colonial Retreat, Kent Fedorowich, Martin Thomas Routledge, 2013, page 186
^ Goldberg Back British Stand In U.N. Session,Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, November 13, 1965
^ Isolated States: A Comparative Analysis, Deon Geldenhuys, Cambridge University Press, 1990, page 62
^ Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Vera Gowlland-Debbas, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 1990
^ Rhodesia's Lobbyist Back for Mugabe, The Washington Post, June 26, 1980
^ RHODESIA, Hansard, HC Deb 24 June 1969 vol 785 cc1218-27
^ M.P. CALLS FOR REMOVAL OF RHODESIAN FLAG IN STRAND, The Glasgow Herald, January 4, 1969, page 1
^ Rhodesia Office Will Be Closed, The Age, April 3, 1972
^ The Nationals: The Progressive, Country, and National Party in New South Wales 1919-2006, Paul Davey, Federation Press, 2006 page 223
^ [rathall+rhodesia++Minister+of+Finance+and+of+Posts+and+ Telecommunications&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=whitlam Africa Contemporary Record: Annual Survey and Documents, Volume 6], Colin Legum, Africana Publishing Company, 1974
^ US Not Closing Rhodesian Office, The Lewiston Daily Sun, August 27, 1977, page 8
^ US To Restrict Sales To Rhodesia, Reading Eagle, December 12, 1965
^ The Superpowers and Africa: The Constraints of a Rivalry, 1960-1990, Zaki Laïdi University of Chicago Press, 1990, page 55
^ Foreign Affairs for New States: Some Questions of Credentials, Peter John Boyce, University of Queensland Press, January 1977, page 13
^ Confrontation and Accommodation in Southern Africa: The Limits of Independence, Kenneth W. Grundy, University of California Press, 1973, page 257
^ Native Vs. Settler: Ethnic Conflict in Israel/Palestine, Northern Ireland, and South Africa, Thomas G. Mitchell Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000, page 141
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 77
^ Portugal Severs Key Link With Rhodesia, Sarasota Herald-Tribune, April 27, 1970
^ Coming To Terms: Zimbabwe in the International Arena, Richard Schwartz I.B.Tauris, 2001, page 68
^ Salisbury whites queue up to flee, The Age, July 8, 1980
^ a b "The World Factbook". cia.gov. 
^ Published in 2010, research by Ian Scoones on land reform in Masvingo, Zimbabwe.
^ GDP percentage growth 2010 and Tobabcco auctions 2010
^ BBC News, 29 January 2009: Zimbabwe abandons its currency
^ Broadcasting: An Introduction, John R. Bittner, Prentice-Hall International, 1980, page 263
^ Salt, Beryl (1978). The Valiant Years. 


External links[edit]





This article's use of external links may not follow Wikipedia's policies or guidelines. Please improve this article by removing excessive or inappropriate external links, and converting useful links where appropriate into footnote references. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Find more aboutRhodesiaat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Rhodesian Bush War historical research / discussion forum
Rhodesian Bush War Photographs




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rhodesia.



The Viscount disasters of 1978 and 1979
Ironing the lawn in Salisbury – the last days of Rhodesia (The Guardian)
Ian Beckett, an account of the Bush War (in 2 parts)
Rhodesian and South African Military History – An extensive collection of histories and analysis of Rhodesian and South African military operations, to the early 1980s
Window on Rhodesia- An archive of the history and life of Rhodesia.
1975 BBC report on the failure of negotiations between the Rhodesian government and the black nationalists
The Brookings Institution : Managing Ethnic Conflict in Africa – Rhodesia/Zimbabwe
Selby, Angus (2006) "Commercial Farmers and the State: Interest Group Politics and Land Reform in Zimbabwe, 1890–2005", PhD Thesis, Oxford University
Rhodesia Roll of Honour – Those who died in defence of UDI
Constitution of Rhodesia
Rhodesian aviation and comment

Audio and video[edit]

Audio of Ian Smith's radio address announcing UDI
2 years of independence, 1967 Rhodesian MoI film (7 mins) on YouTube
Rhodesia to Zimbabwe, collection of film clips (6 mins) on YouTube
Songs of UDI, 3 songs from 1977 (9 mins) on YouTube







v
t
e


Southern Rhodesia / Rhodesia articles




1890–1923: Company rule; 1923–80: Southern Rhodesia; 1953–63: Federation; 1965–79: Rhodesia under UDI; 1979: Zimbabwe Rhodesia under UDI; 1980–present: Zimbabwe



History



Pre-colonial
Rudd Concession
Company rule

Pioneer Column
First Matabele War
Shangani Patrol
Second Matabele War
Second Boer War
First World War


Southern Rhodesia

colonial history
Second World War
Malayan Emergency involvement
Federation


Unilateral Declaration of Independence

Bush War
1975 Victoria Falls Conference
1976 Geneva Conference
Internal Settlement
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
Lancaster House Agreement


Zimbabwe





Geography







Chimanimani Mountains
Cities and towns
Limpopo River
Zambezi River








Politics







Constitutional history
Districts
Elections
Governor
Mission in Lisbon
Municipalities
Police
Political parties
Central Africa Party
Confederate Party
Dominion Party
Federal Party
Responsible Government Association (RGA)
Rhodesian Action Party (RAP)
Rhodesian Front (RF)
Rhodesia Labour Party (RLP)
Southern Rhodesia African National Congress (SRANC)
Southern Rhodesia Communist Party (SRCP)
Southern Rhodesia Liberal Party (SRLP)
United Federal Party (UFP)
United National Federal Party (UNFP)
United Rhodesia Party
President
Prime Minister
Provinces
Security Forces








Economy







Dollar (currency from 1970)
Pound (currency to 1970)
Reserve Bank
Stock Exchange
Telecommunications
Tourism
Transportation








Society







List of Rhodesians
Public holidays
Rhodesiana





Demographics




Ethnic groups
(diaspora)




Black



Hungwe
Kunda
Lemba
Manyika
Ndebele
Rusape Jews
Shona
Tokaleya
Tonga





White



Afrikaners
British
Greeks
Jews
"Rhodies"





Others



Coloureds (Goffals)
Indians








Languages



Afrikaans
English (South African)
Shona
Sindebele








Symbols



Animal
Anthem
Coat of arms
Emblem
Flags

national


Flower











Category
Portal












v
t
e


Commonwealth realms and dominions



Current



Antigua and Barbuda (monarchy)
Australia (monarchy)
Bahamas (monarchy)
Barbados (monarchy)
Belize (monarchy)
Canada (monarchy)
Grenada (monarchy)
Jamaica (monarchy)
Realm of New Zealand

Cook Islands
New Zealand
Niue


Papua New Guinea (monarchy)
Saint Kitts and Nevis (monarchy)
Saint Lucia (monarchy)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines (monarchy)
Solomon Islands (monarchy)
Tuvalu (monarchy)
United Kingdom (monarchy)





Former



Ceylon
Fiji (monarchy)
The Gambia
Ghana
Guyana
India1
Ireland1 (monarchy)
Kenya
Malawi
Malta
Mauritius
Newfoundland2
Nigeria
Pakistan
Rhodesia3
Sierra Leone
South Africa (monarchy)
Tanganyika
Trinidad and Tobago
Uganda








1 Dominion, became republic before adoption of the term "realm"
2 Dominion, never ratified Statute of Westminster 1931, London-based external government 1934–1949, annexed by Canada in 1949
3 Rhodesia unilaterally declared independence as a realm in 1965, but this was not recognised internationally. Declared itself a republic in 1970.











 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rhodesia&oldid=790867687"					
Categories: Former countries in AfricaStates and territories established in 1965States and territories disestablished in 1979RhodesiaBritish colonisation in AfricaBritish EmpireFormer British colonies and protectorates in AfricaFormer polities of the Cold WarFormer republicsFormer territorial entities in AfricaFormer unrecognized countriesHistory of RhodesiaHistory of ZimbabweOligarchy1965 establishments in Africa1979 disestablishments in Africa1965 establishments in Rhodesia1970s disestablishments in Rhodesia1965 establishments in the British Empire1979 disestablishments in the United KingdomWhite supremacy in AfricaEnglish-speaking countries and territoriesHidden categories: EngvarB from August 2014Use dmy dates from August 2014Use South African English from April 2016All Wikipedia articles written in South African EnglishArticles containing Latin-language textFormer country articles requiring maintenancePages using infobox former country with unknown parametersArticles containing Shona-language textAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2017Articles needing additional references from February 2011All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia external links cleanup from October 2012Wikipedia spam cleanup from October 2012Zimbabwe articles missing geocoordinate dataAll articles needing coordinates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةБеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGalego한국어Bahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიLadinoLatviešuLigureLumbaartМакедонскиमराठीمازِرونیBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 16:58.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rhodesia - Wikipedia






















 






Rhodesia

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Rhodesian)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the unrecognised state of Rhodesia. For the British colony, see Southern Rhodesia. For other uses, see Rhodesia (disambiguation).


Rhodesia


Unrecognised state






1965–1979










Flag (1968)



Coat of arms





Motto
Sit Nomine Digna (Latin)
"May she be worthy of the name"


Anthem
"Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia" (1974–1979)








Royal anthem
"God Save the Queen" (1965–1970)























Capital
Salisbury


Languages
English (official)
Afrikaans, Shona and Ndebele widely spoken


Government
Constitutional monarchy (1965–70)
Parliamentary republic (1970–79)


Head of State



 • 
Monarch
1965–1970

Elizabeth II (Unrecognised by Elizabeth II)


 • 
President
1970–1975

Clifford Dupont (First)


 • 
1979
Henry Everard (Acting president) (Last)


Prime Minister



 • 
1965–1979
Ian Smith


Legislature
Parliament


 • 
Upper house
Senate


 • 
Lower house
House of Assembly


Historical era
Cold War


 • 
Independence (UDI)
11 November 1965


 • 
Republic declared
2 March 1970


 • 
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
1 June 1979


 • 
Republic of Zimbabwe
18 April 1980


Area


 • 
1978
390,580 km2 (150,800 sq mi)


Population


 • 
1978 est.
6,930,000 


     Density
18/km2 (46/sq mi)


Currency
Rhodesian pound (1965–1970)
Rhodesian dollar (1970–1979)







Preceded by
Succeeded by






Southern Rhodesia






Zimbabwe Rhodesia









Today part of
 Zimbabwe


a. The government recognised Queen Elizabeth II as the official Head of State from 1965 to 1970. The highest official of Rhodesia held the title "Officer Administering the Government" (OAtG) as he acted in lieu of the official Governor, who remained at his post but was ignored. After Rhodesia became a republic in March 1970, the President replaced the OAtG as the highest official and the Governor returned to London.


Rhodesia (/roʊˈdiːʒə/), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe. With its capital in Salisbury (now Harare), Rhodesia was considered a de facto successor state to the former British colony of Southern Rhodesia (which had achieved responsible government in 1923).
During an effort to delay an immediate transition to black majority rule, Rhodesia's predominantly white government issued its own Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965. The UDI administration initially sought recognition as an autonomous realm within the Commonwealth of Nations, but reconstituted itself as a republic in 1970.
Following a brutal guerrilla war fought with two African nationalist organisations (Robert Mugabe's ZANU and Joshua Nkomo's ZAPU), Rhodesian premier Ian Smith conceded to bi-racial democracy in 1978. However, a provisional government subsequently headed by Smith and his moderate colleague Abel Muzorewa failed in appeasing international critics or halting the bloodshed. By December 1979, Muzorewa had replaced Smith as Prime Minister and secured an agreement with the militant nationalists, allowing Rhodesia to briefly revert to colonial status pending elections under a universal franchise. It finally achieved internationally recognised independence in April 1980; the nation was concurrently renamed the Republic of Zimbabwe.
A wholly landlocked area, Rhodesia was bordered by South Africa to the south, Bechuanaland (later Botswana) to the southwest, Zambia to the northwest, and Mozambique (a Portuguese province until 1975) to the east. The state was named after Cecil Rhodes, whose British South Africa Company acquired the land in the late 19th century.



Contents


1 Nomenclature
2 History

2.1 Background
2.2 Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)

2.2.1 Impact of UDI


2.3 The Bush War
2.4 End of the Bush War

2.4.1 Late 1970s
2.4.2 Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas
2.4.3 Security Situation Erodes Rapidly


2.5 End of UDI (1979)
2.6 Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)


3 Politics
4 Military and police
5 Foreign relations

5.1 Britain and the UDI
5.2 Sanctions
5.3 International perspective
5.4 Diplomatic relations
5.5 Results


6 Legacy

6.1 Rhodesian media


7 References
8 External links

8.1 Audio and video





Nomenclature[edit]
The official name of the country, according to the constitution adopted concurrently with the Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) in 1965, was Rhodesia. This was not the case under British law, however, which considered the territory's legal name to be Southern Rhodesia, the name given to the country in 1898 during the British South Africa Company's administration of the Rhodesias, and retained by the self-governing colony of Southern Rhodesia after the end of Company rule in 1923.[1]
This naming dispute dated back to October 1964, when Northern Rhodesia became independent from Britain and concurrently changed its name to Zambia. The Southern Rhodesian colonial government in Salisbury felt that in the absence of a "Northern" Rhodesia, the continued use of "Southern" was superfluous. It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government. Salisbury went on using the shortened name in an official manner nevertheless,[2] while the British government continued referring to the country as Southern Rhodesia. This situation continued throughout the UDI period.[1] The shortened name was used by many people including the British government in the House of Commons.
The British government maintained this stance regarding the June–December 1979 successor state of Zimbabwe Rhodesia, and when Zimbabwe Rhodesia returned to colonial status from December 1979 to April 1980, it was as "Southern Rhodesia". Southern Rhodesia subsequently gained international recognition of its independence in April 1980, when it became the Republic of Zimbabwe.
History[edit]



Part of a series on the



History of Zimbabwe





Ancient history


Mapungubwe Kingdom
c.1075–1220


Zimbabwe Kingdom
c.1220–1450


Mutapa Kingdom
c.1450–1760


Torwa dynasty
c.1450–1683





White settlement pre-1923


Rozwi Empire
c.1684–1834


Matabeleland
1838–1894


Rudd Concession
1888


BSA Company rule
1890–1923


First Matabele War
1893–1894


Second Matabele War
1896–1897


World War I involvement
1914–1918


Colony of Southern Rhodesia
1923–1980


World War II involvement
1939–1945


Malayan Emergency
involvement
1948–1960


Federation with Northern
Rhodesia and Nyasaland
1953–1963


Rhodesian Bush War
1964–1979



Unilateral Declaration of
Independence (UDI)

1965


Rhodesia under UDI
1965–1979


Zimbabwe-Rhodesia
June–Dec 1979



Lancaster House Agreement

Dec 1979


British Dependency
1979–1980


Zimbabwe
1980–present


Gukurahundi
1982–1987


Second Congo War
1998–2003





 Zimbabwe portal





v
t
e





Main article: History of Rhodesia
Background[edit]
Until after World War II, the landlocked British possession of Southern Rhodesia was not developed as an indigenous African territory, but rather as a unique state which reflected its multiracial character.[3] This situation certainly made it very different from other lands which existed under colonial rule, as many Europeans had arrived to make permanent homes, populating the towns as traders or settling to farm the most productive soils.[4][5] In 1922, faced with the decision to join the Union of South Africa as a fifth province or accept nearly full internal autonomy, the electorate cast its vote against South African integration.[6][7][8]
In view of the outcome of the referendum, the territory was annexed by the United Kingdom on 12 September 1923.[9][10][11][12] Shortly after annexation, on 1 October 1923, the first constitution for the new Colony of Southern Rhodesia came into force.[11][13] Under this constitution, Southern Rhodesia was given the right to elect its own thirty-member legislature, premier, and cabinet—although the British Crown retained a formal veto over measures affecting natives and dominated foreign policy.[14][15][16]
The Rhodesian authorities provided compensation when the government nationalised enterprises such as the country's railroads, consistently refused to radically alleviate unemployment, and shied from filling civil service posts with partisan appointees. By colonial standards, public services were well-organised and praised for their efficiency.[3]
In 1953, Southern Rhodesia merged with the two other British Central African states to form the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland – a loose association that placed defence and economic direction under a central government but left many domestic affairs under the control of its constituent territories.[17] As it began to appear that decolonisation was inevitable and indigenous black populations were pressing heavily for change,[3] the federation was dissolved in 1963.[18][19][20]

Numbers of white and black inhabitants before and during the Central African Federation[21]

Year
Southern Rhodesia
Northern Rhodesia
Nyasaland
Total


White
Black
White
Black
White
Black
White
Black


1927
38,200 (3.98%)
922,000 (96.02%)
4,000 (0.4%)
1,000,000 (99.6%)
1,700 (0.13%)
1,350,000 (99.87%)
43,900 (1.32%)
3,272,000 (98.68%)


1946
80,500 (4.79%)
1,600,000 (95.21%)
21,919 (1.32%)
1,634,980 (97.68%)
2,300 (0.10%)
2,340,000 (99.90%)
104,719 (1.84%)
5,574,980 (98.16%)


1955
150,000 (5.88%)
2,400,000 (94.12%)
65,000 (3.02%)
2,085,000 (96.98%)
6,300 (0.25%)
2,550,000 (99.75%)
221,300 (3.05%)
7,035,000 (96.95%)


1960
223,000 (7.30%)
2,830,000 (92.70%)
76,000 (3.14%)
2,340,000 (96.85%)
9,300 (0.33%)
2,810,000 (99.66%)
308,300 (3.72%)
7,980,000 (96.28%)


Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)[edit]
Although prepared to grant formal independence to Southern Rhodesia (now Rhodesia), the British government had adopted a policy of no independence before majority rule, dictating that colonies with a substantial population of European settlers would not receive independence except under conditions of majority rule.[22][23][24] Rhodesian colonials initially balked at the suggestion; some felt they had a right to absolute political control, at least for the time being, despite their relatively small numbers.[17][25] The authorities were also disturbed by the post-independence chaos which was plaguing other African nations at the time.[26] However, once Rhodesia had been introduced as a topic for discussion in international bodies, extension of the status quo became a matter of concern to the world community and a serious embarrassment to the United Kingdom.[5]
After the federal break-up in 1963, then-Prime Minister Alec Douglas-Home insisted that preconditions on independence talks hinge on what he termed the "five principles" – unimpeded progress to majority rule, assurance against any future legislation decidedly detrimental to black interests, "improvement in the political status" of local Africans, moves towards ending racial discrimination, and agreement on a settlement which could be "acceptable to the whole population".[27][28][29][30] Harold Wilson and his incoming Labour government took an even harder line on demanding that these points be legitimately addressed before an independence agenda could be set.[5]
By 1964, growing dissatisfaction with the ongoing negotiations ousted Salisbury's incumbent Winston Field, replacing him with Ian Smith, deputy chairman of the conservative Rhodesian Front party.[31][32][33] Smith, the colony's first Rhodesian-born leader, soon came to personify resistance to liberals in British government and those agitating for change at home.[5] He ruled out acceptance for all five of the proposed principles as they stood,[34] implying instead that Rhodesia was already legally entitled to independence—a claim which was overwhelmingly endorsed by registered voters in a referendum.[35][36][37]
Emboldened by the results of this referendum and the subsequent general election, Rhodesia now threatened to assume her own sovereignty without British consent. Harold Wilson countered by warning that such an irregular procedure would be considered treasonous, although he specifically rejected using armed force against the English "kith and kin" in Africa.[38][39][40] Wilson's refusal to consider a military option encouraged Smith to proceed with his plans. Talks quickly broke down, and final efforts in October to achieve a settlement floundered; the Rhodesian Front remained unwilling to accept what were regarded as unacceptably drastic terms and the British would settle for nothing less – it was a formula doomed to failure.[5]




Ian Smith signs the Unilateral Declaration of Independence.



The mantle of the pioneers has fallen on our shoulders to sustain civilisation in a primitive country.
— Ian Smith, 11 November 1965, upon the announcement of UDI[41]

On 11 November 1965, following a brief but solemn consensus, Rhodesia's leading statesmen issued their country's unilateral declaration of independence (UDI).[3][42][43] This was immediately denounced as an "act of rebellion against the Crown" in the United Kingdom, and Wilson promised that the illegal action would be short-lived.[44][45] However, few seemed to initially realise that Rhodesia was no longer within the Commonwealth's direct sphere of influence and British rule was now a constitutional fiction; Salisbury remained virtually immune to credible metropolitan leverage.[17]
On 12 October 1965, the United Nations General Assembly had noted the repeated threats of the Rhodesian authorities "to declare unilaterally the independence of Southern Rhodesia, in order to perpetuate minority rule", and called upon Wilson to use all means at his disposal (including military force) to prevent the Rhodesian Front from asserting independence.[46] After UDI was proclaimed, UN officials branded Ian Smith's government as an "illegal racist minority regime"[47] and called on member states to sever economic ties with Rhodesia, recommending sanctions on petroleum products and military hardware.[5] In December 1966, these measures became mandatory, extending to bar the purchase of Rhodesian tobacco, chrome, copper, asbestos, sugar, meat, and hides.[5]
Britain, having already adopted extensive sanctions of its own, dispatched a Royal Navy squadron to monitor oil deliveries in the port of Beira in Mozambique, from which a strategic pipeline ran to Umtali in Rhodesia. The warships were to deter "by force, if necessary, vessels reasonably believed to be carrying oil destined for (Southern) Rhodesia".[48][49]
Some nations, such as Switzerland, and West Germany, which were not UN members, conducted business legally with Rhodesia – the latter remained the Smith government's largest trading partner in Western Europe until 1973, when Bonn joined the UN.[5] Japan continued to accept more Rhodesian exports than any other nation, and Iran provided oil.[50] The Portuguese government marketed Rhodesian products as its own, via false certificates of origin and disguised trade channels.[51] South Africa openly refused to observe the UN sanctions.[52][53] A 1971 amendment passed in the United States permitted American firms to go on importing Rhodesian chromium and nickel as normal.[54]
Despite the poor showing of sanctions, Rhodesia found it nearly impossible to obtain diplomatic recognition abroad. In 1970, the US government had made it clear that the UDI would not be recognised "under [any] circumstances".[55] Even Smith's ideological allies in Pretoria, although sympathetic, failed to recognise the new country on an equal level.[56]
Initially, the state retained its pledged loyalty to Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom, recognising her as Queen of Rhodesia.[5] When Smith and Deputy Prime Minister Clifford Dupont called on colonial Governor, Sir Humphrey Gibbs, to formally notify him of the UDI, Gibbs condemned the UDI as an act of treason. After Smith formally announced the UDI on the radio, Gibbs sacked the entire cabinet on orders from Whitehall. However, he was unable to enact any concrete actions to foster a return to legality. Government ministers simply ignored his notices, pointing out that UDI made his office obsolete. Even so, Gibbs continued to occupy his residence in Salisbury until 1970, when he vacated the premises and left Rhodesia following the declaration of a republic.[57] He had effectively been superseded before then; on 20 December 1965, Smith named Dupont as "Officer Administering the Government"; an earlier attempt to have him named as Governor-General of Rhodesia was dismissed out of hand.[5]
In September 1968, the Appellate Division of the Rhodesian High Court ruled that Ian Smith's administration had become the de jure government of the country, not merely the de facto one.[58] To support his decision, Chief Justice Sir Hugh Beadle used several statements made by Hugo Grotius, who maintained that there was no way in which a nation could rightly claim to be governing a particular territory – if it was waging a war against that territory. Beadle argued that due to Britain's economic war against Rhodesia, she could not (at the same point) be described as governing Rhodesia.[59][60] Resulting court decisions held that the rebel government "could lawfully do anything its predecessors could lawfully have done".[61]
A Salisbury commission chaired by prominent lawyer W.R. Waley was appointed to study constitutional options open to the Rhodesian authorities as of April 1968, but reaching a further settlement with the British was ruled out early on.[17][62] Waley, although insistent that "Europeans must surrender any belief in permanent European domination", also testified that majority rule was not desirable immediately.[5]
Talks aimed at easing the differences between Rhodesia and the United Kingdom were carried out aboard Royal Navy vessels once in December 1966 and again in October 1968.[63][64][65] Both efforts failed to achieve agreement, although Harold Wilson added a sixth principle to the five he had previously enunciated: "it would be necessary to ensure that, regardless of race, there was no oppression of the majority by the minority or of [any] minority by the majority." Rhodesian resolve stiffened following a failure to reach a new settlement, with more radical elements of the Rhodesian Front calling for a republican constitution.[5]
During a two-proposition referendum held in 1969, the proposal for severing all remaining ties to the British Crown passed by a majority of 61,130 votes to 14,327.[5] Rhodesia declared itself a republic on 2 March 1970. Under the new constitution, a president served as ceremonial head of state, with the prime minister nominally reporting to him.[66] Some in Rhodesian government had hoped in vain that the declaration of a republic would finally prompt other nations to grant recognition.[67]
Impact of UDI[edit]
The years following Rhodesia's UDI saw an unfolding series of economic, military, and political pressures placed on the country which eventually brought about majority rule, a totality of these factors rather than any one the reason for introducing change.[68] In 2005, a conference at the London School of Economics which discussed Rhodesia's independence concluded that UDI was sparked by an existing racial conflict complicated by Cold War intrigues.[69]
Critics of UDI sought to maintain that Ian Smith intended only to safeguard the privileges of an entrenched colonial elite at the expense of the impoverished African community. According to this logic, UDI created a vacuum of oppression which was eventually filled by Robert Mugabe's present dictatorship.[70] Smith and his supporters continued to defend their actions, however, by claiming that the Rhodesian majority was too inexperienced at the time to manage effectively a developed nation.[26]
At large, the European population's emerging attitude to UDI was tense. Many white Rhodesians had seen themselves as nothing less than fully fledged members of the British Empire, carrying on the same rugged values and frontier spirit of the early Englishmen who had settled in 1890.[42] But such confidence was rudely shaken by Whitehall's refusal to grant independence on their terms. After 1965, there were those who continued to claim that they were collectively upholders of principle and defenders of such values against the twin threats of communism, manifested through the militant black nationalists, and – ironically – the decadence of Britain herself.[42] Often repeated appeals to the Christian heritage of their pioneer ancestors in "defending the free world" reflected these beliefs.[42]
African parties displayed initial horror at Smith's declaration, with one ZANU official stating, "...for all those who cherish freedom and a meaningful life, UDI has set a collision course which cannot be altered. 11 November 1965 [has] marked the turning point of the struggle for freedom in that land from a constitutional and political one to primarily a military struggle."[43] It would, however, be several years before even the most radical nationalists chose to develop a coherent strategy revolving around armed resistance, preferring instead to create opportunities for external intervention.[43]
Because Rhodesian exports were generally competitive and had previously been entitled to preferential treatment on the British market, the former colony did not recognise the need for escalating the pace of diversification before independence. Following the UDI, however, Rhodesia began to demonstrate that she had the potential to develop a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency.[26][71] After the Rhodesian Front began introducing incentives accorded to domestic production, industrial output expanded dramatically. A rigid system of countermeasures enacted to combat sanctions succeeded in blunting their impact for at least a decade.[5] Over the next nine years Rhodesian companies, spiting the freezing of their assets and blocking of overseas accounts, also perfected cunning techniques of sanctions evasion through both local and foreign subsidiaries, which operated on a clandestine trade network.[5]
From 1968 until 1970, there was virtually no further dialogue between Rhodesia and the UK. This altered immediately after the ascension of Edward Heath, who reopened negotiations.[72] Smith remained optimistic that Heath would do his utmost to remedy Anglo-Rhodesian relations, although disappointed that he continued to adhere publicly to the original "five principles" proposed by Alec Douglas-Home, now foreign secretary. In November 1971, Douglas-Home renewed contacts with Salisbury and announced a proposed agreement which would be satisfactory to both sides – it recognised Rhodesia's 1969 constitution as the legal frame of government, while agreeing that gradual legislative representation was an acceptable formula for unhindered advance to majority rule.[5] Nevertheless, the new settlement, if approved, would also implement an immediate improvement in black political status, offer a means to terminate racial discrimination, and provide a solid guarantee against retrogressive constitutional amendments.[73]
Implementation of the proposed settlement hinged on popular acceptance, but the Rhodesian government consistently refused to submit it to a universal referendum.[5] A twenty four-member commission headed by an eminent jurist, Lord Pearce, was therefore tasked with ascertaining public opinion on the subject.[74] In 1972, the commission began interviewing interest groups and sampling opinions – although concern was expressed over the widespread apathy encountered.[26] According to every published finding, whites were in favour of the settlement, and Rhodesians of mixed or Asian background generally pleased, while black reaction was resoundingly negative.[72][75] As many as thirty African chiefs and politicians voiced their opposition, prompting Britain to withdraw from the proposals on the grounds of the commission's report.[74]
The Bush War[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Bush War
As early as 1960, minority rule in Southern Rhodesia was already being challenged by a rising tide of political violence led by African nationalists such as Joshua Nkomo and Ndabaningi Sithole. After their public campaigns were initially suppressed, many believed that negotiation was completely incapable of meeting their aspirations. Petrol bombings by radicals became increasingly common, with the Zimbabwe Review observing in 1961, "for the first time home-made petrol bombs were used by freedom fighters in Salisbury against settler establishments."[76] It was officially noted that between January and September 1962 alone, 33 bombings were carried out, in addition to 27 acts of attempted sabotage on communications. In that same period, nationalists were implicated in arson targeting 18 schools and 10 churches.[43] Nkomo's Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU) subsequently disclosed that it had formed a military wing (Zimbabwe People's Revolutionary Army, ZIPRA), and 'the decision to start bringing in arms and ammunition and to send young men away for sabotage training' had already been made. The Rhodesian authorities responded by banning ZAPU and driving its supporters underground.[77] Frustrated by their repeated failures, nationalists also conducted a campaign of terror against black Africans, murdering those who had either identified with the colonial administration or had simply failed to demonstrate their allegiance to the cause.[43] To protect civilians, emergency laws were imposed, broadening the legal definition of unlawful gatherings and giving the police greater powers to crack down on agitators or subversives.[78] The death sentence was also introduced for terrorism involving explosives and arson.[5]
A crisis of confidence soon resulted across ZAPU, which was already suffering from poor morale, compounded by tribal and ideological factionalism. In 1963, party dissidents rejected Joshua Nkomo's authority and formed their own organisation, the Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU) – which worked out its own strategy for impressing international opinion, undermining white assurance, and achieving a complete breakdown of order. By August 1964, ZANU, which had brutally intimidated neutrals and opponents alike, was outlawed by authorities as well.[79]
ZANU's agenda was inward-looking, leftist, and pan-Africanist in nature. Ndabaningi Sithole and avowed Marxist Robert Mugabe, its most prominent leaders, demanded a one party Zimbabwean state with majority rule and a public monopoly on land.[5] After being forced from Rhodesia, they continued to operate in exile, creating occupation groups representing urban workers, miners, and peasant farmers. ZANU also attracted professionals, students, and feminists to its ranks. While ZAPU theoretically continued to command the allegiance of most Ndebele and Shona activists, Sithole and Mugabe drew their support from the Mashonaland countryside.[5]
After the UDI, ZANU officials mapped an elaborate plan for the "liberation of Zimbabwe" which called for attacks on white farmers, destruction of cash crops, disrupting electricity in urban areas, and petrol bombings.[43] Sithole and Nkomo both insisted on the need for armed struggle, but disagreed on the means to go about it. For example, ZAPU tended to follow Soviet thinking, placing an emphasis on sophisticated weaponry in the hopes of winning a conventional battle like the Viet Minh at Dien Bien Phu. ZANU preferred to politicise populations in areas which they intended to seize.[68] Neither force, however, had acquired basic knowledge of guerrilla warfare. Debate on political theory and insurgent tactics became the obsession of nationalists at this stage.[43]




Soldier interrogates Rhodesian villagers about insurgent activity in late 1977. This photograph became one of the most enduring images of the bush war.


In April 1966, two Zimbabwe African National Liberation Army (ZANLA – the military wing of ZANU) units, having received prior training at Nanjing Military College, crossed into Rhodesia from Zambia. They were armed with SKS carbines, Chinese hand grenades, explosives, and communist pamphlets, having been issued vague instructions to sabotage important installations before killing white persons indiscriminately.[43] At least five guerrillas were simply arrested before getting very far. Another seven hoped to destroy a pylon carrying electricity to Sinoia in the northwest. Their faulty demolitions were uncovered by the Rhodesian Security Forces and the men easily tracked to a nearby ranch on 28 April, where they were shot resisting capture.[68][80][81] This event is considered to have been the first engagement of what came to be known as the "Bush War" in Rhodesia and the "Second Chimurenga" (or rebellion in Shona) by supporters of the guerrillas.[82]
The campaign proper is generally considered to have started in 1972 with the Attack on Altena Farm, despite the minor threat already represented by the nationalist movements in the 1960s.
After unsuccessful appeals to Britain and the United States for military assistance, Robert Mugabe, who was based in Mozambique after that country's independence from Portugal in 1975, led ZANU to seek support from the People's Republic of China and countries of the Soviet Bloc. Joshua Nkomo, based in Zambia and also supported by the Soviet Union, led ZAPU.[83] ZANU and ZAPU together formed 'the Patriotic Front'. Broadly, ZANLA recruited mainly from Mashonaland and Manicaland provinces, whilst the ZIPRA recruited from Mashonaland West, Midlands and Matabeleland provinces of Zimbabwe.
After the collapse of Portuguese rule in Mozambique in 1974–75, it was no longer viable for the Smith regime to sustain white minority rule indefinitely. By this time, even South Africa's Vorster had come to this view. While Vorster was unwilling to make concessions to his own country's blacks, he concluded that white minority rule was not sustainable in a country where blacks outnumbered whites 22:1.[83] In 1978, there were 270,000 Rhodesians of European descent and more than six million Africans.[84]
International business groups involved in the country (e.g. Lonrho) transferred their support from the Rhodesian government to black nationalist parties. Business leaders and politicians feted Nkomo on his visits to Europe. ZANU also attracted business supporters who saw the course that future events were likely to take.[85] Funding and arms support provided by supporters, particularly from the Soviet Union and its allies in the latter 1970s, allowed both ZIPRA and the ZANLA to acquire more sophisticated weaponry, thereby increasing the military pressure that the guerrillas were able to place on Rhodesia.
Until 1972, containing the guerrillas was little more than a police action. Even as late as August 1975 when Rhodesian government and black nationalist leaders met at Victoria Falls for negotiations brokered by South Africa and Zambia, the talks never got beyond the procedural phase.[86] Rhodesian representatives made it clear they were prepared to fight an all out war to prevent majority rule.[87] However, the situation changed dramatically after the end of Portuguese colonial rule in Mozambique in 1975. Rhodesia now found itself almost entirely surrounded by hostile states and even South Africa, its only real ally, pressed for a settlement.

Having let slip one chance after another of reaching an accommodation with more moderate black leaders, Rhodesia's whites seem to have made the tragic choice of facing black nationalism over the barrel of a gun rather than the conference table. The downhill road toward a race war in Rhodesia is becoming increasingly slippery with blood.
— Rand Daily Mail editorial, May 1976[88]

At this point, ZANU's alliance with FRELIMO (the Liberation Front of Mozambique) and the porous border between Mozambique and eastern Rhodesia enabled large-scale training and infiltration of ZANU/ZANLA fighters. The governments of Zambia and Botswana were also emboldened sufficiently to allow resistance movement bases to be set up in their territories. Guerrillas began to launch operations deep inside Rhodesia, attacking roads, railways, economic targets and isolated security force positions, in 1976.[89]




Rhodesian servicewoman takes aim with her Browning Hi-Power 9×19mm semi-automatic pistol; from a 1976 army recruitment poster


The government adopted a 'strategic hamlets' policy of the kind used in Malaya and Vietnam to restrict the influence of insurgents over the population of rural areas. Local people were forced to relocate to protected villages (PVs) which were strictly controlled and guarded by the government against rebel atrocities. The protected villages were compared by the guerrillas to concentration camps. Some contemporary accounts claim that this interference in the lives of local residents induced many of them who had previously been neutral to support the guerrillas.[90]
The war degenerated into rounds of increasing brutality from all three parties involved (ZANU and ZAPU, and the Rhodesian Army fighting off their attacks). Mike Subritzky, a former NZ Army ceasefire monitor in Rhodesia, in 1980 described the war as "both bloody and brutal and brought out the very worst in the opposing combatants on all three sides."[91]
End of the Bush War[edit]









The geographical situation in 1965 (left, on UDI) and 1975 (right, after the independence of Mozambique and Angola from Portugal). Green: Rhodesia; purple: friendly nations; orange: hostile states.


Rhodesia began to lose vital economic and military support from South Africa, which, while sympathetic to the white minority government, never accorded it diplomatic recognition. The South African government placed limits on the fuel and munitions they supplied to the Rhodesian military. They also withdrew the personnel and equipment that they had previously provided to aid the war effort, though covert military support continued.[92]
In 1976, the South African government and United States governments worked together to place pressure on Smith to agree to a form of majority rule. In response to the initiative of US Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, in 1976 Ian Smith accepted the principle of black majority rule within two years.[92] The Rhodesians now offered more concessions, but those concessions, focused on reaching an "internal settlement" with moderate black leaders, were insufficient to end the war.
At the time, some Rhodesians said the still embittered history between the British-dominated Rhodesia and the Afrikaner-dominated South Africa partly led South African government to withdraw its aid to Rhodesia. Ian Smith said in his memoirs that even though many white South Africans supported Rhodesia, South African Prime Minister John Vorster's policy of détente with the Black African states ended up with Rhodesia being offered as the "sacrificial lamb" to buy more time for South Africa. Other observers perceived South Africa's distancing itself from Rhodesia as being an early move in the process that led to majority rule in South Africa itself.[93]

In 1976 South Africa saw settlement of the Rhodesian question as vital on several fronts: to cauterise the wound of the psychological blow … caused by her defeat in the Angolan conflict; to pre-empt possible Cuban intervention in Rhodesia and the possibility of South Africa being sucked into another Cold War regional conflict without the support and endorsement of the western powers
— Dr Sue Onslow, South Africa and UDI[94]


In the latter 1970s, the militants had successfully put the economy of Rhodesia under significant pressure while the numbers of guerrillas in the country were steadily increasing.[95][96] The government abandoned its early strategy of trying to defend the borders in favour of trying to defend key economic areas and lines of communication with South Africa, while the rest of the countryside became a patchwork of "no-go areas".
Late 1970s[edit]
By the late 1970s, Rhodesia's front-line forces contained about 25,000 regular troops and police – backed up by relatively strong army and police reserves.[97] Its mechanised contingent consisted of light armoured cars and improvised mine-protected armoured personnel carriers, complemented by eight tanks (Polish built T-55LD tanks), delivered in the last year of the war. The Rhodesian Air Force operated an assortment of both Canberra light bombers, Hawker Hunter fighter bombers, older de Havilland Vampire jets as well as a somewhat antiquated, but still potent, helicopter arm. These forces, including highly trained special operations units, were capable of launching devastating raids on resistance movement camps outside the country, as in Operation Dingo in 1977 and other similar operations.
Nevertheless, guerrilla pressure inside the country itself was steadily increasing in the latter 1970s. By 1978–79, the war had become a contest between the guerrilla warfare placing ever increasing pressure on the Rhodesian regime and civil population and the Rhodesian government's strategy of trying to hold off the militants until external recognition for a compromise political settlement with moderate black leaders could be secured.
By this time, the need to cut a deal was apparent to most Rhodesians, but not to all. Ian Smith had dismissed his intransigent Defence Minister, P. K. van der Byl, as early as 1976.[98] "PK" had been a hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opposition or the international community since before UDI.

...it is better to fight to the last man and the last cartridge and die with some honour. Because, what is being presented to us here is a degree of humiliation...
— P. K. van der Byl in 1977, commenting on a British peace plan.[99]

Van der Byl eventually retired to his country estate outside Cape Town, but there were elements in Rhodesia, mainly embittered former security force personnel, who forcibly opposed majority rule up to and well beyond the establishment of majority rule.[100] New white immigrants continued to arrive in Rhodesia right up to the eve of majority rule.[101]
Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas[edit]
Main article: Rhodesia and weapons of mass destruction
The program's primary purpose was to kill guerrillas whether they were recruits transiting to camps in Mozambique or guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia. The CBW effort took on the guerrilla threat from three fronts.[102] First, the effort aimed to eliminate guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia through contaminated supplies either provided by contact men, recovered from hidden caches, or stolen from rural stores.[103] Secondly, the effort worked to contaminate water supplies along guerrilla infiltration routes into Rhodesia, forcing the guerrillas either to travel through arid regions to carry more water and less ammunition or travel through areas patrolled by the security forces.[104] Finally, the Rhodesians sought to hit the guerrillas in their camps in Mozambique by poisoning food, beverages, and medicines.
The chemicals most used in the Rhodesian program were parathion (an organophosphate insecticide) and thallium (a heavy metal commonly found in rodenticide).[105] The Rhodesians selected for use also included Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera) and possibly Bacillus anthracis (causative agent of anthrax). They also looked at using Rickettsia prowazekii (causative agent of epidemic typhus), and Salmonella typhi (causative agent of typhoid fever), and toxins—such as ricin and botulinum toxin.[102]
Biological agents, namely Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera), had some impact on the fighting capability of ZANLA.[106] Some former officers of the Rhodesian Security Forces alleged that anthrax was covertly used by Rhodesian psy-ops units during the late 1970s, but these statements are unfounded. Rhodesia never possessed the capability to produce anthrax spores on the scale needed for widespread dissemination.[102] Use of anthracis, ricin, or botulinum toxin would have been confined to assassination attempts.[102] Some more-merited allegations are that the South African government's top-secret chemical and biological weapons program, a progenitor of Project Coast, used Rhodesia as a "laboratory".[106]
Security Situation Erodes Rapidly[edit]
The work of journalists such as Lord Richard Cecil, son of the Marquess of Salisbury, stiffened the morale of Rhodesians and their overseas supporters.[107] Lord Richard produced regular news reports such as the Thames TV 'Frontline Rhodesia' features. These reports typically contrasted the incompetent insurgents with the "superbly professional" government troops.[108] A group of ZANLA fighters killed Lord Richard on 20 April 1978 when he was accompanying a Rhodesian airborne unit employed in Fire Force Operations.[109]
The shooting down on 3 September 1978 of the civilian Vickers Viscount airliner Hunyani, Air Rhodesia Flight RH825, in the Kariba area by ZIPRA fighters using a surface-to-air missile, with the subsequent massacre of its survivors, is widely considered to be the event that finally destroyed the Rhodesians' will to continue the war. Although militarily insignificant, the loss of this aircraft (and a second Viscount, the Umniati, in 1979) demonstrated the reach of resistance movements extended to Rhodesian civil society.[110]
The Rhodesians' means to continue the war were also eroding fast. In December 1978, a ZANLA unit penetrated the outskirts of Salisbury and fired a volley of rockets and incendiary device rounds into the main oil storage depot – the most heavily defended economic asset in the country. The storage tanks burned for five days, giving off a column of smoke that could be seen 130 kilometres (80 mi) away. Five hundred thousand barrels (79,000 m3) of petroleum product (comprising Rhodesia's strategic oil reserve) were lost.[111]
The government's defence spending increased from R$30 million, 8.5% of the national budget in 1971 to 1972, to R$400 m in 1978 to 1979, 47% of the national budget. In 1980, the post-independence government of Zimbabwe inherited a US$500 million national debt.[112]
End of UDI (1979)[edit]




Signing the Rhodesian Internal Settlement (from left: Bishop Abel Muzorewa, Ian Smith, Jeremiah Chirau and Ndabaningi Sithole)


The Rhodesian army continued its "mobile counter-offensive" strategy of holding key positions ("vital asset ground") while carrying out raids into the no-go areas and into neighbouring countries. While often extraordinarily successful in inflicting heavy guerrilla casualties, such raids also on occasion failed to achieve their objectives. In April 1979 special forces carried out a raid on Joshua Nkomo's residence in Lusaka (Zambia) with the stated intention of assassinating him.[113] Nkomo and his family left hastily a few hours before the raid – having clearly been warned that the raid was coming.
In 1979, some special forces units were accused of using counterinsurgent operations as cover for ivory poaching and smuggling. Colonel Reid-Daly (commander of the Selous Scouts) discovered that his phone was bugged and after challenging a superior officer on this issue was court martialled for insubordination. He received the lightest sentence possible, a caution, but he continued to fight his conviction and eventually resigned his commission and left the Army.
By 1978–79, up to 70% of the regular army was composed of black soldiers (though both the army and police reserves remained overwhelmingly white). By 1979 there were also 30 black commissioned officers in the regular army. While there was never any suggestion of disloyalty among the soldiers from predominantly black units (in particular within the Selous Scouts or the Rhodesian African Rifles – RAR), some argue that, by the time of the 1980 election, many of the RAR soldiers voted for Robert Mugabe.[114]
As the result of an Internal Settlement signed on 3 March 1978 between the Rhodesian government and the moderate African nationalist parties, which were not in exile and not involved in the war, elections were held in April 1979. The United African National Council (UANC) party won a majority in this election, and its leader, Abel Muzorewa (a United Methodist Church bishop), became the country's first black prime minister on 1 June 1979. The country's name was changed to Zimbabwe Rhodesia. The internal settlement left control of the country's police, security forces, civil service and judiciary in white hands, for the moment. It assured whites of about one third of the seats in parliament. It was essentially a power-sharing arrangement between whites and blacks which, in the eyes of many, particularly the insurgents, did not amount to majority rule.[115] However, the United States Senate voted to end economic sanctions against Zimbabwe Rhodesia on 12 June.[116]
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU. In spite of offers from Ian Smith, the latter parties declined to participate in an election in which their political position would be insecure and under a proposed constitution which they had played no part in drafting and which was perceived as retaining strong white minority privilege.
Bishop Muzorewa's government did not receive international recognition. The Bush War continued unabated and sanctions were not lifted. The international community refused to accept the validity of any agreement which did not incorporate the main nationalist parties. The British Government (then led by the recently elected Margaret Thatcher) issued invitations to all parties to attend a peace conference at Lancaster House. These negotiations took place in London in late 1979. The three-month-long conference almost failed to reach conclusion, due to disagreements on land reform, but resulted in the Lancaster House Agreement. UDI ended, and Rhodesia temporarily reverted to the status of a British colony (the 'Colony of Southern Rhodesia').[117]
The Lancaster House Agreement further provided for a ceasefire which was followed by an internationally supervised general election, held on February 1980. ZANU led by Robert Mugabe won this election, some alleged,[who?] by terrorising its political opposition, including supporters of ZAPU, through former insurgents that had not confined themselves to the designated guerrilla assembly points, as stipulated by the Lancaster House Agreement. The observers and the newly installed governor Lord Soames were accused of looking the other way, and Mugabe's victory was certified. Nevertheless, few could doubt that Mugabe's support within his majority Shona tribal group was extremely strong. The Rhodesian military seriously considered mounting a coup against a perceived stolen election ("Operation Quartz") to prevent ZANU from taking over the country.[118] The alleged coup was to include the assassination of Mugabe and coordinated assaults on guerrilla assembly points throughout the country. The plan was eventually scuttled, as it was obvious that Mugabe enjoyed widespread support from the black majority despite voter intimidation, as well as the fact that the coup would gain no external support, and a conflagration which would engulf the country was seen as inevitable.
Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)[edit]
Mugabe and the victorious black nationalists were rather less concerned by Operation Quartz than by the possibility that there might be a mass exodus of the white community of the kind that had caused chaos in Mozambique five years earlier. Such an exodus had been prepared for by the South African government. With the agreement of the British Governor of Rhodesia, South African troops had entered the country to secure the road approaches to the Beit Bridge border crossing point. Refugee camps had been prepared in the Transvaal. On the day the election results became known, most white families had prepared contingency plans for flight, including the packing of cars and suitcases.
However, after a meeting with Robert Mugabe and the central committee of ZANU (PF), Ian Smith was reassured that whites could, and should stay in the new Zimbabwe. Mugabe promised that he would abide strictly by the terms of the Lancaster House Agreement and that changes in Zimbabwe would be made gradually and by proper legal process. In a CBS news interview, Mugabe claimed that Rhodesian whites "...are still in control of the economy, the majority being commercial farmers.",[119] Mugabe however, would reverse his commitment to these agreements some years later; the regime began confiscating white owned farm lands. This is widely blamed for leading to the deterioration of the Zimbabwean economy which plagues the country today.[120]
On 18 April 1980 the country became independent as the Republic of Zimbabwe, and its capital, Salisbury, was renamed Harare two years later.
Politics[edit]



Rhodesia






This article is part of a series on the
politics and government of
Rhodesia




Constitutional history



— Overview
1890–1923  BSA Company rule
1923–1980  Southern Rhodesia
1953–1963  Rhodesia–Nyasaland Federation
1965–1979  Rhodesia under UDI
 1979  Zimbabwe Rhodesia (under UDI)









Government


Governor / President
Prime Minister








Legislature



1899–1923  Legislative Council
1924–1970  Legislative Assembly









Elections


General


1924 1928 1933 1934 1939 1946 1948 1954 1958 1962 1965 1970 1974 1977 1979 1980



Legislative Council


1899 1902 1905 1908 1911 1914 1920



Referendums


1922 1934 1953 1961 1964 1969 1979











Political parties


African National Congress
Communist Party
Labour Party
Liberal Party
Rhodesia Party
Rhodesian Action Party
Rhodesian Front
United African National Council
United Federal Party

Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU)


Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU)









Foreign relations



Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI)

Mission in Lisbon
Passport








National symbols


Flag (other flags)
Anthem









Other countries
Atlas








v
t
e





Main article: Politics of Rhodesia




The Presidential flag of Rhodesia.


Although Southern Rhodesia never gained full dominion status within the Commonwealth of Nations, Southern Rhodesians ruled themselves from the attainment of 'Responsible Government' in 1923. Its electoral register had property and education qualifications. Over the years various electoral arrangements made at a national and municipal level upheld these standards. For example, the franchise for the first Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council election in 1899 contained the following requirement:

"voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth £75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of £50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months' continuous residence was also required for qualifications (b) and (c)."

Following Cecil Rhodes's dictum of "equal rights for all civilised men", there was no overt racial component to the franchise. However, the requirement excluded a majority of native blacks from the electorate.
Up until the 1950s, Southern Rhodesia had a vibrant political life with right and left wing parties competing for power. The Rhodesian Labour Party held seats in the Assembly and in municipal councils throughout the 1920s and 1930s. From 1953 to 1958, the prime minister was Garfield Todd, a liberal who did much to promote the development of the Black community through investment in education, housing and healthcare. However, the government forced Todd from office because his proposed reforms were seen by many whites as too radical.
From 1958 onwards, white settler politics consolidated and ossified around resistance to majority rule, setting the stage for UDI. The 1961 Constitution governed Southern Rhodesia and independent Rhodesia up until 1969, using the Westminster Parliamentary System modified by a system of separate voter rolls with differing property and education qualifications, without regard to race. Whites ended up with the majority of Assembly seats.
The 1969 republican constitution established a bicameral Parliament consisting of an indirectly elected Senate and a directly elected House of Assembly, effectively reserving the majority of seats for whites. The office of President had only ceremonial significance with the Prime Minister holding executive power.
The Constitution of the short-lived Zimbabwe Rhodesia, which saw a black-led government elected for the first time, reserved 28 of the 100 parliamentary seats for whites. The independence constitution agreed at Lancaster House watered those provisions down and reserved 20 out of 100 seats for whites in the House of Assembly and 8 out of 40 seats in the Senate. The constitution prohibited Zimbabwe authorities from altering the Constitution for seven years without unanimous consent and required a three-quarters vote in Parliament for a further three years. The government amended the Constitution in 1987 to abolish the seats reserved for whites, and replace the office of Prime Minister with an executive President. In 1990, the government abolished the Senate.
Military and police[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Security Forces
Rhodesian Security Forces consisted of the Rhodesian Army, Royal Rhodesian Air Force, British South Africa Police, Rhodesian Ministry of Internal Affairs (INTAF) and the Guard Force. Despite the impact of economic and diplomatic sanctions, Rhodesia was able to develop and maintain a potent and professional military capability.[121] Time magazine reported in June 1977 that "man for man, the Rhodesian army ranks among the world's finest fighting units."[122]
Foreign relations[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2011) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Throughout the period of its Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965 to 1979), Rhodesia pursued a foreign policy of attempting to secure recognition as an independent country, and insisting that its political system would include 'gradual steps to majority rule.' Ardently anti-communist, Rhodesia tried to present itself to the West as a front-line state against communist expansion in Africa, to little avail. Rhodesia received little international recognition during its existence; recognition only occurred after elections in 1980 and a transition to majority rule.
Rhodesia wished to retain its economic prosperity and also feared communist elements in the rebel forces, and thus felt their policy of a gradual progression to black majority rule was justified. However, the international community refused to accept this rationale, believing that their policies were perpetuating racism. This attitude was part of the larger decolonisation context, during which Western powers such as the United Kingdom, France, and Belgium hastened to grant independence to their colonies in Africa.
Britain and the UDI[edit]
Rhodesia was originally a British colony. Although decolonisation in Africa had begun after World War II, it began accelerating in the early 1960s, causing Britain to negotiate independence rapidly with several of its colonies. During this period, it adopted a foreign policy called NIBMAR, or No Independence Before Majority African Rule, mandating democratic reforms that placed governance in the hands of the majority black Africans. The governing white minority of Rhodesia, led by Ian Smith, opposed the policy and its implications. On 11 November 1965, Rhodesia's minority white government made a unilateral declaration of independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom, as it became apparent that negotiations would not lead to independence under the white regime.
The United Kingdom government immediately brought in legislation (Southern Rhodesia Act 1965) which formally abolished all Rhodesian government institutions. This move made life difficult for Rhodesian citizens who wished to travel internationally as passports issued by Rhodesia's UDI administration were not recognised as valid;[123] in January 1966, the British issued a statement accepting as valid any passport issued before the declaration of independence and allowing six-month United Kingdom passports to be granted when they expired – provided that the bearer declared they did not intend to aid the UDI Rhodesian government.[124]
Until late 1969, Rhodesia still recognised Queen Elizabeth II as head of state, even though it opposed the British government itself for hindering its goals of independence. The Queen, however, refused to accept the title Queen of Rhodesia. Eventually, the Smith government abandoned attempts to remain loyal to the Crown, and in 1969, a majority of the electorate voted in referendum to declare Rhodesia a republic. They hoped that this move would facilitate recognition as an independent state by the international community, but the issues of white minority control remained and hindered this effort, and like the UDI before it, the proclamation of a republic lacked international recognition.
Sanctions[edit]
After the declaration of independence, and indeed for the entire duration of its existence, Rhodesia did not receive official recognition from any state, although it did maintain diplomatic relations with South Africa, which was then under apartheid. South Africa did not recognise Rhodesia to preserve its fragile positions with other nations, but frequently assisted the republic. Portugal maintained informal relations until the Carnation Revolution of 1974. The day following the declaration of independence, the United Nations Security Council passed a resolution (S/RES/216) calling upon all states not to accord Rhodesia recognition, and to refrain from any assistance. The Security Council also imposed selective mandatory economic sanctions, which were later made comprehensive.
Malawi,[125] Israel, South Africa, Portugal, and Iran did not comply with economic sanctions against Rhodesia.[126] The US, despite voting in favor of the sanctions at the UNSC, violated them to buy chrome ore from Rhodesia.[127] Kenneth Kaunda, president of Zambia, also accused western oil companies of violating the sanctions and selling oil to Rhodesia.[128]
International perspective[edit]
Rhodesia's Unilateral Declaration of Independence from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965 was promptly condemned by the international community. The United Nations Security Council Resolution 216 of 12 November 1965 called "upon all States not to recognise this illegal racist minority regime in Southern Rhodesia."[129]
Rhodesia campaigned for international acceptance and invoked the doctrine of non-intervention in internal affairs as justification for rebuking external criticism of its internal policies. However, the emerging doctrine of self-determination in colonial situations meant that most nations regarded Rhodesia as illegitimate.
Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia, took a pragmatic approach towards Rhodesia. Kenneth Kaunda, heavily dependent on access through Rhodesia for his nation's copper ore exports, fuel, and power imports unofficially worked with the Rhodesian government. Rhodesia still allowed Zambia to export and import its goods through its territory to Mozambique ports, despite the Zambian government's official policy of hostility and non-recognition of the post-UDI Smith Administration.
The United States, like all other Western nations, refused to recognise Rhodesia, but unlike others allowed its Consulate-General to function as a communications conduit between the American government in Washington, D.C., and the Rhodesian government in Salisbury. When Rhodesia set up an information office in Washington, D.C., OAS nations loudly protested. The US government responded by saying the Rhodesian mission and its staff had no official diplomatic status and violated no US laws.
Portugal pursued a middle path with Rhodesia. While not officially recognising Rhodesia under Ian Smith, the government of António Salazar did permit Rhodesia to establish a representative mission in Lisbon, and permitted Rhodesian exports and imports through their colony of Mozambique. The Portuguese government in power at that time, authoritarian and ardently anti-communist, gave active behind-the-scenes support in Rhodesia's fight against the guerrilla groups.
South Africa, itself under international pressure as a white minority government, pursued a policy of détente with the black African states at the time. These states wanted South Africa to pressure Ian Smith to accept a faster transition to majority rule in Rhodesia, in return for pledges of non-interference in South Africa's internal affairs. Prime Minister John Vorster, believing majority rule in Rhodesia would lead to international acceptance for South Africa, used a number of tactics to pressure Smith. The South African government held up shipments of fuel and ammunition and pulled out friendly South African forces from Rhodesia. The combined loss of Mozambique and the loss of support from South Africa dealt critical blows to the Rhodesian government.
Diplomatic relations[edit]
After the UDI, Rhodesia maintained several overseas missions, including Pretoria,[130] and until 1975, Lisbon in Portugal and Lourenço Marques (now Maputo) in Mozambique.[131]
Since 1961, Rhodesia had had an "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" with South Africa, heading a "Rhodesian Diplomatic Mission" or de facto embassy.[132] Before South Africa left the Commonwealth that year, the then Southern Rhodesia had exchanged High Commissioners with the then Union of South Africa, but following the change in status, the Republic now had a "South African Diplomatic Mission" in Salisbury.[133]
During 1965, the government of Rhodesia made moves to establish a mission in Lisbon separate from the British Embassy, with its own accredited representative, having previously been able to establish its own consulate in Lourenço Marques, capital of Portuguese Mozambique.[134] This prompted protests from the British government, which was determined that the representative, Harry Reedman, should be a nominal member of the British Ambassador's staff.[135] For their part, the Portuguese authorities sought a compromise whereby they would accept Reedman as an independent representative but deny him diplomatic status.[136]
The Rhodesian Information Office in Washington remained open following UDI, but its director, Ken Towsey, and his staff were deprived of their diplomatic status.[137] Previously, there had been a "Minister for Rhodesian Affairs" operating under the aegis of the British Embassy in Washington,[138] as well representatives in Tokyo and Bonn.[139] Following the country's independence as Zimbabwe, Towsey became chargé d'affaires at the new Embassy.[140]
The High Commission in London, known as Rhodesia House, continued to function until it was closed in 1969 following the decision by white Rhodesians in a referendum to make the country a republic, along with the "British Residual Mission" in Salisbury.[141] Prior to its closure, the mission flew the newly adopted Flag of Rhodesia, considered illegal by the Foreign Office, prompting calls by Labour MP Willie Hamilton for its removal.[142]
In Australia, the federal government in Canberra sought to close the Rhodesian Information Centre in Sydney,[143] but it remained open, operating under the jurisdiction of the state of New South Wales.[144] In 1973, the Labor government of Gough Whitlam cut post and telephone links to the Centre, but this was ruled illegal by the High Court.[145] An office was also established in Paris, but this was closed down by the French government in 1977.[146]
Similarly, the United States recalled its consul-general from Salisbury, and reduced consular staff,[147] but did not move to close its consulate until the declaration of a republic in 1970.[148] South Africa, however, retained its "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" after UDI,[149] which allowed it to continue to recognise British sovereignty as well as to deal with the de facto authority of the government of Ian Smith.[150]
The South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury became the only such mission remaining in the country after 1975,[151] when Portugal downgraded its mission to consul level,[152] having recalled its consul-general in Salisbury in May 1970.[153] After Zimbabwe's independence, the new government closed its missions in Pretoria and Cape Town, only maintaining a trade mission in Johannesburg,[154] while the South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury was also closed.[155]
Results[edit]
Continuing civil war and a lack of international support eventually led the Rhodesian government to submit to an agreement with the UK in 1979. This led to internationally supervised elections, won by Zimbabwe African National Union - Patriotic Front and Robert Mugabe, establishing the internationally recognised Zimbabwe.
Legacy[edit]
In the ten years after independence, around 60% of the white population of Zimbabwe emigrated, most to South Africa and to other mainly white, English speaking countries where they formed expatriate communities. Politically within Zimbabwe, the consolidation of power by Robert Mugabe continued through the 1980s. Following amendments to the country's constitution in 1987, parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished, and an executive presidency was created, held by Mugabe. Many expatriates and some of the whites who stayed in Zimbabwe became deeply nostalgic for Rhodesia. These individuals are known as "Rhodies." Native whites who are more accepting of the new order are known as "Zimbos."
While as Rhodesia, the country was once considered the breadbasket of Africa. Today, Zimbabwe is a net importer of foodstuffs, with the European Union and United States providing emergency food relief as humanitarian aid on a regular basis.[156] The nation has suffered profound economic and social decline in the past twenty years. Recently the agriculture sector has started to do well since the availability of expertise and machines has improved supported mainly by China.[157][158]
Zimbabwe also suffered from a crippling inflation rate, as the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe had a policy of printing money to satisfy government debts, which introduces excessive currency into the economic system which led to the demise of the local currency. This policy caused the inflation rate to soar from 32% in 1998 (considered extremely high by most economic standards) to an astonishing 11,200,000% by 2007. Monetary aid by the International Monetary Fund has been suspended due to the Zimbabwe government's defaulting on past loans, inability to stabilise its own economy, and its inability to stem corruption and advance human rights.[156] In 2009, Zimbabwe abandoned its currency, relying instead on foreign currencies such as the South African rand, the US dollar, the Botswana pula, the euro and the British pound, among others.[159]
In 2008 elections, Mugabe garnered 41%, Simba Makoni 10% and Morgan Tsvangirai 48% of the votes cast for president forcing a runoff election called by the Zimbabwe Electoral Commission (ZEC). In the months leading to the run-off, instances of extreme violence between the two major parties (ZANU PF and MDC) led Tsvangirai to withdraw from the election. In February 2009, a power-sharing accord was reached which resulted in the Zimbabwe Government of National Unity of 2009. The accord was, essentially, to create the position of "Prime Minister" for Tsvangirai, who served in that role from 2009 to 2013. Mugabe retained the title of President.
Rhodesian media[edit]
The main newspapers were the Rhodesia Herald in Salisbury and The Chronicle in Bulawayo. Following UDI, in 1976, the state-run Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation (RBC) took over the privately owned Rhodesian Television (RTV) service, in which it had previously acquired a 51 per cent stake.[160] Among the news magazines published in Rhodesia under UDI were the Illustrated Life Rhodesia, while The Valiant Years by Beryl Salt told the history of Rhodesia from 1890 to 1978 entirely through the medium of facsimile reproduction of articles and headlines from Rhodesian newspapers.[161]
References[edit]


^ a b Rowland, J. Reid. "Constitutional History of Rhodesia: An outline".  in Berlyn, Phillippa (April 1978). The Quiet Man: A Biography of the Hon. Ian Douglas Smith. Salisbury: M. O. Collins. pp. 240–256. OCLC 4282978. 
^

Palley, Claire (1966). The Constitutional History and Law of Southern Rhodesia 1888–1965, with Special Reference to Imperial Control (First ed.). Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 742–743. OCLC 406157. 


^ a b c d Duignan, Peter (1986), Politics and Government in African States 1960–1985, Croom Helm Ltd, ISBN 0-7099-1475-X 
^ Volume V: Africa, Australia, and Southern Islands. Lands and Peoples: The World in Color. The Grolier Society of Canada Ltd 1955. Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 54-11291. p 19-109.
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t Nelson, Harold (1983), Zimbabwe: a country study, The American University (Washington, D.C.), ISBN 0160015987 
^ "Rhodesia – Mzilikaze to Smith". Rhodesia.nl. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "The Cabinet Papers | Rhodesia and the Central African Federation". Nationalarchives.gov.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "History of Zimbabwe". Historyworld.net. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645 - Authority for date of annexation having been 12 September 1923
^ a b Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia by Vera Gowlland-Debbas
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645
^ Southern Rhodesia Constitution Letters Patent 1923
^ "Parliament". Rhodesia.me.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Full text of "Southern Rhodesia 1890–1950; A Record of Sixty Years Progress"". Archive.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbambwe". Sapst.org. 22 December 1987. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Weitzer, Ronald. Transforming Settler States: Communal Conflict and Internal Security in Northern Ireland and Zimbabwe. pp. 1–206. 
^ afrikantraveler (16 May 2012). "Rhodesia: A Failed Attempt to Maintain Racism into the 21st Century". The African File. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Hastings Kamuzu Banda Biography – Detoured on Road to Become a Doctor, Pursued Degrees with Diligence, Spoke Out Against Racism – JRank Articles". Biography.jrank.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Novak, Andrew. "Academia.edu | Sport and Racial Discrimination in Colonial Zimbabwe: A Reanalysis | Andrew Novak". Independent.academia.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Wills, A.J. (1967). "Three Territories". An Introduction to the History of Central Africa (2nd ed.). Durban: Oxford University Press. p. Appendix IV. ISBN 0-620-06410-2. Retrieved 10 September 2012. 
^ "Database – Uppsala Conflict Data Program". UCDP. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "On Board the Tiger". Rhodesia.nl. 9 October 1968. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA PSYOP 1965". Psywarrior.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A brief history of Zimbabwe". Zimembassy.se. 18 April 1980. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Smith, Ian (1997). The Great Betrayal. London: Blake Publishing Ltd. pp. 74–256. ISBN 1-85782-176-9. 
^ "Chronology: Rhodesia UDI: Road to Settlement" (PDF). Lse.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Principled failure: British policy toward Rhodesia, 1971–72 | Assorted Materials: Johnny Ryan". Johnnyryan.wordpress.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA: DEFINITION OF THE FIVE PRINCIPLES (Hansard, 16 December 1970)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 16 December 1970. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Chronology for Europeans in Zimbabwe". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A Brief History of Zimbabwe – Part 1: Early Kingdoms to UDI". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cowell, Alan (21 November 2007). "Ian Smith, Defiant Symbol of White Rule in Africa, Is Dead at 88". The New York Times. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbabwe (country)". Talktalk.co.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Policy For Rhodesia from theTribune Magazine Archive". Archive.tribunemagazine.co.uk. 23 September 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "White referendum in Southern Rhodesia is overwhelmingly in support of Ian Smith's proposal for independence. | South African History Online". Sahistory.org.za. 6 November 1964. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "British South Rhodesia (1964–1980)". Uca.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Elections in Zimbabwe". Africanelections.tripod.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Lunch with Harold Wilson | Pop Theory". Clivebarnett.wordpress.com. 12 September 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia: The Last Thread". TIME. 30 December 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Chris McGreal (13 April 2008). "There are many villains to blame for Zimbabwe's decade of horror | World news | The Observer". London: Guardian. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Mungazi, Dickson. Last Defenders of the Laager: Ian D. Smith and F.W. de Klerk. pp. 1–288. 
^ a b c d Raftopolous, Brian. Becoming Zimbabwe: A History from the pre-colonial period to 2008. pp. 1–298. 
^ a b c d e f g h Raeburn, Michael. We are everywhere: Narratives from Rhodesian guerillas. pp. 1–209. 
^ "Issue 6, Spring 2011". Genocidepreventionnow.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA (Hansard, 21 January 1969)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 21 January 1969. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Question of Southern Rhodesia". undocs.org. United Nations. 12 October 1965. A/RES/2012(XX). Retrieved 17 March 2017. 
^ "Southern Times-Learning From Rhodesia". Southerntimesafrica.com. 12 November 1965. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Resolution 221 (1966) of 9 April 1966". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Gowlland-Debbas, Vera (1990), Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers, ISBN 0-7923-0811-5 
^ "The Secretary of State, Washington" (PDF). Gwu.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Okoth, Assa (2006), A History of Africa: Volume 2: 1915–1995, East African Educational Publishers Ltd, ISBN 9966-25-358-0 
^ "When Sanctions Worked: The Case of Rhodesia Reexamined". Africafocus.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia Unilateral Declaration of Independence 1965 – Online exhibition". Commonwealth.sas.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Meredith, Martin. The Past is Another Country. p. 218. 
^ "1970:Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". BBC News. 2 March 1970. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "Chemistry – Ian Smith". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Chemistry – Humphrey Gibbs". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Herald, Salisbury, 13 to 20 September 1968
^ "Stella Madzimbamuto (Appellant) v Desmond William Lardner Burke and Frederick Phillip George (Respondents)" (PDF). Jurisafrica.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "In re James (an insolvent)". Uniset.ca. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Lauterpacht, Elihu. International Law Reports (Volume 39). pp. 1–78. 
^ http://archive.lib.msu.edu/DMC/African%20Journals/pdfs/Journal%20of%20the%20University%20of%20Zimbabwe/vol3n1/juz003001001.pdf
^ "HMS Tiger". Barrylockyer.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Smock, David R. "The Forgotten Rhodesians". Foreign Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cockram, B. "Rhodesia Rides A Tiger" (PDF). South African Institute of International Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "2 March 1970 – Rhodesia Declared a Republic". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "BBC ON THIS DAY - 2 - 1970: Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". bbc.co.uk. 
^ a b c Clayton, Anthony. Frontiersmen: Warfare in Africa since 1950. pp. 1–260. 
^ Dr. Sue Onslow. "UDI: 40 Years On". LSE. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ Michael Hartnack (2005). "40 years in wilderness after UDI declaration". The Herald. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "What's Wrong With Trade Sanctions". Cato Institute. 23 December 1985. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Brownell, Josiah. Collapse of Rhodesia: Population Demographics and the Politics of Race. pp. 1–255. 
^ "Zimbabwe Rejects Sellout!" (PDF). American Committee on Africa. 1 February 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Zvobgo, Chengetai. A History of Zimbabwe, 1890–2000 and Postscript, Zimbabwe, 2001–2008. pp. 1–410. 
^ "1972: Rhodesia's former leader arrested". BBC. 18 January 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ "Insurgency in Rhodesia, 1957–1973: An Account and Assessment". International Institute for Strategic Studies. 1973. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Shamuyarira, Nathan. Crisis in Rhodesia. pp. 202–203. 
^ Palm Beach Post, Miami, 26 March 1959
^ "The Rhodesian Agreement: Aspects and Prospects". South African Institute of International Affairs. 1978. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Moorcraft and McLaughlin, Peter, Paul (2008). The Rhodesian War: A Military History. pp. 1–200. 
^ "Rhodesian Air Force Anti Terrorist Operations (COINOPS)". rhodesianforces.org. 2012. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Spring, William (1986). The Long Fields: Zimbabwe Since Independence. p. 38. 
^ a b "APF newsletter, "Appraisal of Rhodesia in 1975"". Archived from the original on 31 May 2009. 
^ Ian Beckett. "Report on Bush War, paragraph 10". 
^ The Guardian, 21 April 2000 British Multimillionaire bankrolls Mugabe party
^ Brookings Institution: p156, study on conflict resolution
^ "Peace talks fail". BBC news. 26 August 1975. Retrieved 27 November 2007. 
^ "Rhodesia: A Strike At the Lifeline". Rand Daily Mail via TIME magazine. 1976. p. 2. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ "A Strike at the Lifeline". TIME magazine. 1976. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ APF Newsletter, 1976 :Rhodesia's "Protected" Blacks
^ "Operation Agila, "The British Empire's Last Sunset"". NZ History. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ a b "BBC ON THIS DAY | 24 | 1976: White rule in Rhodesia to end". BBC News. 24 September 1976. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ APF newsletter, 1976: appraisal of Rhodesia in 1976
^ "Cold War Studies Project". lse.ac.uk. 
^ Time magazine, 7 August 1978: Rhodesia faces collapse
^ Time magazine, 1 August 1978: taking the chicken run
^ Major Charles Lohman and Major Robert MacPherson. ""Rhodesia: Tactical Victory, Strategic Defeat" WAR SINCE 1945 SEMINAR AND SYMPOSIUM, US Marine Corps Command and Staff College, June 1983 – See Chapter 3". Scribd.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Worldwide:"PK"
^ The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p 291
^ Newsnet report : saboteurs hit Zimbabwean military, partisan comment
^ Time magazine, October 1977 : The Land of Opportunity
^ a b c d Glenn Cross, "Dirty War: Rhodesia and Chemical Biological Warfare, 1975-1980," Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, 2017
^ Ed Bird. Special Branch War: Slaughter in the Rhodesian Bush Southern Ndebele land, 1976-1980. Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, Ltd. 2014.
^ Jim Parker, "Assignment Selous Scouts: The Inside Story of a Rhodesian Special Branch Officer". Johannesburg, South Africa: Galago Press, 2006
^ Chandré Gould and Peter Folb. "Project Coast: Apartheid’s Chemical and Biological Warfare Programme". Geneva: United Nations Institute for Disarmament Research, 2002.
^ a b Southern African News Feature: the plague wars
^ The Guardian, 15 July 2003: obituary of sixth Marquess of Salisbury
^ Nick Downie report: caution, partisan comment
^ 2nd Lt CJE Vincent BCR who was present when Lord Cecil was killed
^ The Viscount Disasters – The Story
^ The Atlantic Monthly : The Fragility of Domestic Energy, see page 5
^ Selby thesis: ZWNEWS.com, p 88
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War, para 7.
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War.
^ BBC "On this day" report :1 June 1979.
^ Senate Votes Down A Move To Preserve Rhodesia Sanctions; Arms-Bill Veto Threatened White House Says 52-to-41 Margin Shows President Has Support to Prevent an Override, 13 June 1979. The New York Times.
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Allport, R. "Operation Quartz – Rhodesia 1980" (PDF). memoriesofrhodesia.com. 
^ Video on YouTube
^ "Ian Smith's farm seized in Zimbabwe as Robert Mugabe eyes election". BBC News. 7 December 2012. 
^ Rogers 1998, p. 41
^ "The World: The Military: A Mission Impossible". Time. New York. 13 June 1977. Retrieved 3 December 2011. 
^ The Southern Rhodesia (Property in Passports) Order 1965 provided that they were the property of the British government, allowing them to be impounded if presented by anyone arriving at a port of entry. See Hansard, HC 5ser vol 721 col 696.
^ The statement is printed in Hansard HC 5ser vol 723 col 4.
^ http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,836951,00.html
^ http://www.southafricaproject.info/rhodesia_and_south_africa.html
^ https://library.cqpress.com/cqalmanac/document.php?id=cqal75-1214210
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1978/09/22/zambian-to-meet-with-callaghan-on-un-oil-sanction-violations/bdd35f61-e9cb-463f-a319-38981df92cf3/
^ Wikisource:United Nations Security Council Resolution 216
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 52
^ Rhodesians to quit Lisbon, Glasgow Herald, 1 May 1975, page 4
^ Report of the Secretary for Information, Immigration, and Tourism
^ Diplomacy with a Difference: the Commonwealth Office of High Commissioner, 1880-2006, Lorna Lloyd, BRILL, 2007, page 240
^ John Arthur KINSEY, Esq., Consul-General for the Federation at Lourenco Marques, London Gazette, 5th June 1959
^ Rhodesia's Man in Lisbon: Objective Said To Be Achieved, The Glasgow Herald, 22 September 1965. page 9
^ International Diplomacy and Colonial Retreat, Kent Fedorowich, Martin Thomas Routledge, 2013, page 186
^ Goldberg Back British Stand In U.N. Session,Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, November 13, 1965
^ Isolated States: A Comparative Analysis, Deon Geldenhuys, Cambridge University Press, 1990, page 62
^ Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Vera Gowlland-Debbas, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 1990
^ Rhodesia's Lobbyist Back for Mugabe, The Washington Post, June 26, 1980
^ RHODESIA, Hansard, HC Deb 24 June 1969 vol 785 cc1218-27
^ M.P. CALLS FOR REMOVAL OF RHODESIAN FLAG IN STRAND, The Glasgow Herald, January 4, 1969, page 1
^ Rhodesia Office Will Be Closed, The Age, April 3, 1972
^ The Nationals: The Progressive, Country, and National Party in New South Wales 1919-2006, Paul Davey, Federation Press, 2006 page 223
^ [rathall+rhodesia++Minister+of+Finance+and+of+Posts+and+ Telecommunications&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=whitlam Africa Contemporary Record: Annual Survey and Documents, Volume 6], Colin Legum, Africana Publishing Company, 1974
^ US Not Closing Rhodesian Office, The Lewiston Daily Sun, August 27, 1977, page 8
^ US To Restrict Sales To Rhodesia, Reading Eagle, December 12, 1965
^ The Superpowers and Africa: The Constraints of a Rivalry, 1960-1990, Zaki Laïdi University of Chicago Press, 1990, page 55
^ Foreign Affairs for New States: Some Questions of Credentials, Peter John Boyce, University of Queensland Press, January 1977, page 13
^ Confrontation and Accommodation in Southern Africa: The Limits of Independence, Kenneth W. Grundy, University of California Press, 1973, page 257
^ Native Vs. Settler: Ethnic Conflict in Israel/Palestine, Northern Ireland, and South Africa, Thomas G. Mitchell Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000, page 141
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 77
^ Portugal Severs Key Link With Rhodesia, Sarasota Herald-Tribune, April 27, 1970
^ Coming To Terms: Zimbabwe in the International Arena, Richard Schwartz I.B.Tauris, 2001, page 68
^ Salisbury whites queue up to flee, The Age, July 8, 1980
^ a b "The World Factbook". cia.gov. 
^ Published in 2010, research by Ian Scoones on land reform in Masvingo, Zimbabwe.
^ GDP percentage growth 2010 and Tobabcco auctions 2010
^ BBC News, 29 January 2009: Zimbabwe abandons its currency
^ Broadcasting: An Introduction, John R. Bittner, Prentice-Hall International, 1980, page 263
^ Salt, Beryl (1978). The Valiant Years. 


External links[edit]





This article's use of external links may not follow Wikipedia's policies or guidelines. Please improve this article by removing excessive or inappropriate external links, and converting useful links where appropriate into footnote references. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Find more aboutRhodesiaat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Rhodesian Bush War historical research / discussion forum
Rhodesian Bush War Photographs




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rhodesia.



The Viscount disasters of 1978 and 1979
Ironing the lawn in Salisbury – the last days of Rhodesia (The Guardian)
Ian Beckett, an account of the Bush War (in 2 parts)
Rhodesian and South African Military History – An extensive collection of histories and analysis of Rhodesian and South African military operations, to the early 1980s
Window on Rhodesia- An archive of the history and life of Rhodesia.
1975 BBC report on the failure of negotiations between the Rhodesian government and the black nationalists
The Brookings Institution : Managing Ethnic Conflict in Africa – Rhodesia/Zimbabwe
Selby, Angus (2006) "Commercial Farmers and the State: Interest Group Politics and Land Reform in Zimbabwe, 1890–2005", PhD Thesis, Oxford University
Rhodesia Roll of Honour – Those who died in defence of UDI
Constitution of Rhodesia
Rhodesian aviation and comment

Audio and video[edit]

Audio of Ian Smith's radio address announcing UDI
2 years of independence, 1967 Rhodesian MoI film (7 mins) on YouTube
Rhodesia to Zimbabwe, collection of film clips (6 mins) on YouTube
Songs of UDI, 3 songs from 1977 (9 mins) on YouTube







v
t
e


Southern Rhodesia / Rhodesia articles




1890–1923: Company rule; 1923–80: Southern Rhodesia; 1953–63: Federation; 1965–79: Rhodesia under UDI; 1979: Zimbabwe Rhodesia under UDI; 1980–present: Zimbabwe



History



Pre-colonial
Rudd Concession
Company rule

Pioneer Column
First Matabele War
Shangani Patrol
Second Matabele War
Second Boer War
First World War


Southern Rhodesia

colonial history
Second World War
Malayan Emergency involvement
Federation


Unilateral Declaration of Independence

Bush War
1975 Victoria Falls Conference
1976 Geneva Conference
Internal Settlement
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
Lancaster House Agreement


Zimbabwe





Geography







Chimanimani Mountains
Cities and towns
Limpopo River
Zambezi River








Politics







Constitutional history
Districts
Elections
Governor
Mission in Lisbon
Municipalities
Police
Political parties
Central Africa Party
Confederate Party
Dominion Party
Federal Party
Responsible Government Association (RGA)
Rhodesian Action Party (RAP)
Rhodesian Front (RF)
Rhodesia Labour Party (RLP)
Southern Rhodesia African National Congress (SRANC)
Southern Rhodesia Communist Party (SRCP)
Southern Rhodesia Liberal Party (SRLP)
United Federal Party (UFP)
United National Federal Party (UNFP)
United Rhodesia Party
President
Prime Minister
Provinces
Security Forces








Economy







Dollar (currency from 1970)
Pound (currency to 1970)
Reserve Bank
Stock Exchange
Telecommunications
Tourism
Transportation








Society







List of Rhodesians
Public holidays
Rhodesiana





Demographics




Ethnic groups
(diaspora)




Black



Hungwe
Kunda
Lemba
Manyika
Ndebele
Rusape Jews
Shona
Tokaleya
Tonga





White



Afrikaners
British
Greeks
Jews
"Rhodies"





Others



Coloureds (Goffals)
Indians








Languages



Afrikaans
English (South African)
Shona
Sindebele








Symbols



Animal
Anthem
Coat of arms
Emblem
Flags

national


Flower











Category
Portal












v
t
e


Commonwealth realms and dominions



Current



Antigua and Barbuda (monarchy)
Australia (monarchy)
Bahamas (monarchy)
Barbados (monarchy)
Belize (monarchy)
Canada (monarchy)
Grenada (monarchy)
Jamaica (monarchy)
Realm of New Zealand

Cook Islands
New Zealand
Niue


Papua New Guinea (monarchy)
Saint Kitts and Nevis (monarchy)
Saint Lucia (monarchy)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines (monarchy)
Solomon Islands (monarchy)
Tuvalu (monarchy)
United Kingdom (monarchy)





Former



Ceylon
Fiji (monarchy)
The Gambia
Ghana
Guyana
India1
Ireland1 (monarchy)
Kenya
Malawi
Malta
Mauritius
Newfoundland2
Nigeria
Pakistan
Rhodesia3
Sierra Leone
South Africa (monarchy)
Tanganyika
Trinidad and Tobago
Uganda








1 Dominion, became republic before adoption of the term "realm"
2 Dominion, never ratified Statute of Westminster 1931, London-based external government 1934–1949, annexed by Canada in 1949
3 Rhodesia unilaterally declared independence as a realm in 1965, but this was not recognised internationally. Declared itself a republic in 1970.











 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rhodesia&oldid=790867687"					
Categories: Former countries in AfricaStates and territories established in 1965States and territories disestablished in 1979RhodesiaBritish colonisation in AfricaBritish EmpireFormer British colonies and protectorates in AfricaFormer polities of the Cold WarFormer republicsFormer territorial entities in AfricaFormer unrecognized countriesHistory of RhodesiaHistory of ZimbabweOligarchy1965 establishments in Africa1979 disestablishments in Africa1965 establishments in Rhodesia1970s disestablishments in Rhodesia1965 establishments in the British Empire1979 disestablishments in the United KingdomWhite supremacy in AfricaEnglish-speaking countries and territoriesHidden categories: EngvarB from August 2014Use dmy dates from August 2014Use South African English from April 2016All Wikipedia articles written in South African EnglishArticles containing Latin-language textFormer country articles requiring maintenancePages using infobox former country with unknown parametersArticles containing Shona-language textAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2017Articles needing additional references from February 2011All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia external links cleanup from October 2012Wikipedia spam cleanup from October 2012Zimbabwe articles missing geocoordinate dataAll articles needing coordinates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةБеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGalego한국어Bahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიLadinoLatviešuLigureLumbaartМакедонскиमराठीمازِرونیBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 16:58.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 


















Rhodesian ridgeback | Etsy
























































Close

            Beginning of a dialog window, including tabbed navigation to register an account or sign in to an existing account. Both registration and sign in support using google and facebook accounts.  Escape will close this window.
        



                    Register
                



                    Sign in
                








                Get started
            







            Continue with Facebook
        


 


            Continue with Google
    

 

                    We'll never post without your permission.
                
OR









 


                            Enter your email
                    













Have an account?
Sign in

 






Just one more step…
Create your Etsy password




Create Your Etsy Account




            Continue with Facebook
        


 


            Continue with Google
    

 

                    We'll never post without your permission.
                
OR









 



First Name





Email







Password





Confirm Password














                        By clicking Register, you agree to Etsy's Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Etsy may send you communications; you may change your preferences in your account settings.
            

 







            Uh oh! You need to have cookies enabled to sign in.
        


Welcome back
Nice—you already have an Etsy account.






            Sign in with Facebook
        


 


            Sign in with Google
    

 
OR









 


Email or Username





Password






Stay signed in











Forgot your password?
Forgot your username or email?
Reopen your account?



 



























                        Etsy
                    


Search






Search for items or shops






                                            Search
                                    




 

Skip to Content




                                Sell on Etsy
                            

                                Sell
                            




                            Register
                        



                            Sign in
                        






                                Cart
                            

0























            Take full advantage of our site features by enabling JavaScript. Learn more













                Shop unique and handmade items directly from creative people around the world
            






Popular items for rhodesian ridgeback









Ad
 


                        Stubborn Rhodie Tricks | Dog lovers gift idea | Rhodesian Ridgeback Shirt | Rhodie Gift|
                    



$21.99
 
                        MadFido
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Stemless Wine Glass Set
                    



$29.99
 
                        HoundWorks
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Necklace - Engraving Pendant - Sterling Silver Jewelry - Gold Jewelry- Rose Gold Jewelry - Personalized Dog Jewelry Gift
                    



$12.00
 
                        ChristyTreasureBox
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Handmade Greeting Card of Dining with Ketzel, a Rhodesian Ridgeback
                    



$3.00
 
                        merlinsgarden
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Silver Rhodesian Ridgeback Necklace Rhod107
                    



$69.00
 
                        TheFunkyDog
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        SALE 20% OFF Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Breed Traits Print
                    





$14.02
 
                        WellBredDesign
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print of Original Watercolor Painting - 8x10
                    





$15.50
 
                        dogartstudio
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Sitting Ornament 083821 Personalized With Your Dog's Name
                    





$12.95
 
                        gclasergraphics
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Sign 9"x12" "ALUMINUM"  3388RRHS
                    





$15.99
 
                        animalzrule
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        taking care of business Rhodesian Ridgeback Shirt, Big Dog Sweater, Cute Shirt, S,M,L,XL,2XL
                    





$38.00
 
                        nicandthenewfie
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Leather Art Cards Greeting Cards Fancy Cards Handmade in UK Blank Cards
                    





$7.44
 
                        TheDogsCollarsUK
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Kitchen Towels - Dog Breeds Tea Towel - Dog Lover Gift - Gifts for Dog Lovers - Made in England - British Gifts
                    





$13.54
 
                        HomeAndHoundLondon
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback art print watercolor print  silhouette painting print poster wall art decor drawing, dog wall art poster
                    





$9.69
 
                        MoondustGalleryArt
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback portrait print of pop art painting bright pop colors 12x12" rr dog art
                    





$22.99
 
                        BentNotBroken
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Magnet - Lions Tigers Bears Whatever
                    





$6.99
 
                        PopDoggie
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        SALE • Rhodesian Ridgeback Necklace • Personalized Dog Jewelry • Custom Dog Charm • Personalized Pet Necklace • Unique Pet Pendant • Custom
                    





$15.98
 
                        IvyByDesign
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Art CANVAS Print Fine Artwork of Nobility Dogs Dog Portrait Dog Painting Dog Art Dog Print
                    





$42.90
 
                        NobilityDogs
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Car Sticker Dog Rhodesian Ridgeback 2
                    





$18.05
 
                        ABCstickUndDruck
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Dangerous Rhodesian Ridgeback Inside - Has Killed Squeaky Toy
                    





$5.00
 
                        KnobNots
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback dog unique personalised word art print A4
                    





$5.41
 
                        PawsAWhiledogshop
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Wine Glass, Dog Lover Gift, Etched Stemless Wineglass
                    





$10.50
 
                        CreateBrightly
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        RHODESIAN RIDGEBACK Winter Dog Coat, Winter Coat for Dogs, Waterproof Dog Jacket, Fleece Dog Snood, Dog Hood, Fleece Neckwarmer, Dog Clothes
                    





$95.00
 
                        VoyagersK9Apparel
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Custom Dog Portrait 8 x 8 Canvas Rhodesian Ridgeback. Hand Painted.
                    





$100.00
 
                        verybestdog
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback heartbeat | Unisex Shirt | Dog lovers gift idea | Rhodesian Ridgeback | Parcel WILL NOT arrive in time for Xmas
                    





$21.99
 
                        PupBeats
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Solid Rhodesian Ridgeback Angel Dog Pendant RDG2-AP
                    





$154.00
 
                        Efsterling
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Ornament-Rhodesian Ridgeback Gift-Free Personalization
                    





$9.00
 
                        VioletEtch
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Nail Art,  Dog Nail Art Stickers, Rhodesian Ridgeback Nail Stickers, Fingernail Stickers, Lion Dog, decals
                    





$3.99
 
                        Kerioak
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Navajo Dog Collar, Southwest Dog Collar, The Ridgeback, Aztec Dog Collar, Puppy Gift, Dog Gift, cool collar, Matching Leash Available
                    





$10.00
 
                        MuttsandMittens
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Little Packrats MILO the DOG Backpack
                    





$29.99
 
                        CBHstudio
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Dogs and Flowers Art Print  - Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print 11 x 14
                    





$26.00
 
                        DogsIncorporated
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Necklace Custom Made Stainless Steel iHeart Dog - Personalized Necklace.Engraving.Stainless Steel
                    



$10.00
 
                        WiZardsCustomJewelry
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Wine Glass, Dog Lover Gift, Etched Stemless Wineglass
                    



$10.50
 
                        CreateBrightly
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        I Just Want to Stay Home, Drink Wine, and Snuggle with my Rhodesian Ridgeback Shirt - Ladies or Unisex cut
                    



$20.00
 
                        TheSqueakyEgg
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Print, Rhodesian Ridgeback Poster, Rhodesian Ridgeback Art, Ridgeback, Lion Dog, Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print, Dog Art
                    



$28.89
 
                        RayMarasiganPrints
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Mug | Dog Lover Gift | Dog Mug | Coffee Mug Dog Gift | Fiance Gift | Gifts Under 25 | Tea Mug | Husband Gift | Wife Gift
                    



$18.95
 
                        Phurbaby
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Mug - Yes... I Do Love My Ridgeback Mug - Rhodesian Ridgeback 
                    





$14.95
 
                        WhiteFoxToys
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Silhouette Vinyl Sticker Car Decal Personalized
                    





$11.00
 
                        blakdogs
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        RHODESIAN RIDGEBACK with Ridge, stuffed dog breeds dachshund plush animal soft toy irish setter handmade doxie home decor ooak Made to ORDER
                    





$81.15
 
                        TALLhappyCOLORS
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback, For Pets, Dog Lover Gift, Husband gift, Wife Gift, Man Cave Gift, Girlfriend Gift, Dog Gift Idea, Dog Decor, Dog Pillow
                    





$24.75
 
                        CushionCoAustralia
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Got Rhodesian Ridgeback T-Shirt T1249
                    





$19.99
 
                        MisterPetLife
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Necklace - Engraving Pendant - Sterling Silver Jewelry - Gold Jewelry- Rose Gold Jewelry - Personalized Dog Jewelry Gift
                    





$12.00
 
                        ChristyTreasureBox
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Pet Portrait , Rhodesian Ridgeback, Custom Portrait, Pet, Artwork , Dog portrait Australia , Painting, Watercolour dog  artwork pet animal
                    





$90.77
 
                        MycatandmeArt
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Vinyl Decal Laptop Car Truck Bumper Window Sticker
                    





$8.00
 
                        NashvilleDecals
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        No One Understands Me Like My Rhodesian Ridgeback T-Shirt
                    





$17.00
 
                        Teeburon
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Print, Rhodesian Ridgeback Poster, Rhodesian Ridgeback Art, Ridgeback, Lion Dog, Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print, Dog Art
                    





$28.89
 
                        RayMarasiganPrints
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback art portrait CANVAS print of LA Shepard dog painting 11x14
                    





$39.99
 
                        TheDogLover
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Personalised Labradoodle, Old English Sheepdog, Pointer, Pomeranian, Rhodesian Ridgeback Word Art Keepsake Print Gift A4 21x30cm
                    





$9.46
 
                        PoppysMemoryBox
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Personalised Laser Engraved Pet Dog ID Tag 31mm Round & Free Slip Ring <TAG_ANO_CIRC_L_RHODESIAN_RIDGEBACK>
                    





$9.86
 
                        kokopopart
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Gift Engraved Personalised Fine Quality Wine Glass - Your Message - Birthday Gift - Christmas Gift - Dog Lover Gift
                    





$18.88
 
                        LovingGlassDesigns
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print - King of Africa - Dog Art, Prints, Wall Decoration - African Wall Art - Pet Portraits by Maria Pishvanova
                    





$18.17
 
                        AnimalCenturyKingdom
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Standing - Small Cold Cast Bronze Dog Statue
                    





$69.00
 
                        DANNYQUEST
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        20% off storewide Rhodesian Ridgeback at the Wine Bar Dog Art Tile Coaster Gift
                    





$9.99
 
                        SCHMETZPETZ
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback necklace, Rhodesian Ridgeback charm, Brass dog necklace, pet memorial gift
                    





$39.00
 
                        silhouPETte
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Ridge Mom | DC375MOM | High Quality Adhesive Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Vinyl Window Decal Sticker
                    





$7.59
 
                        NickerStickers
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug Van Growl Starry Night
                    





$16.95
 
                        PawPalettes
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Dog with Stick Organic Cotton Short Sleeve Onesie_ made in Seattle-also available in long sleeve
                    





$28.00
 
                        patternandposy
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback, animal print, watercolor Rhodesian Ridgeback, animal art, dog, Kids Room Decor, Poster, wall art, print(3254b)
                    





$8.00
 
                        RosalisArt
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print of Original Watercolor Painting - 8x10
                    





$15.50
 
                        dogartstudio
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Vintage Movie Style Poster Canvas Print  NEW Collection by Nobility Dogs
                    





$32.90
 
                        NobilityDogs
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Leather Christmas Ornament Santa Ridgeback Xmas Bauble Leather Ridgeback Hanging Gift Personalised Hand Stamped Dog Name
                    





$16.24
 
                        TheDogsCollarsUK
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug Van Growl Starry Night
                    



$16.95
 
                        PawPalettes
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print of Original Watercolor Painting - 11x14
                    



$27.50
 
                        dogartstudio
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        20% off storewide Rhodesian Ridgeback at the Martini Bar Dog Art Print
                    



$9.99
 
                        SCHMETZPETZ
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Typographic Watercolor Painting, Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print / Poster, Dog Portrait, Rhodesian Ridgeback Memorial
                    



$16.00
 
                        VisionaryLine
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Funny Rhodesian Ridgeback T-Shirt, Hoodie, Tank Top, Gifts
                    



$23.95
 
                        ChummyTees
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Sailing Company Original Art Print - 11x14 - Customize with Your Dog's Name
                    





$29.00
 
                        DogsIncorporated
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Mug - Life Is Better With A Rhodesian Ridgeback Puppy - Rhodesian Ridgeback
                    





$14.95
 
                        WhiteFoxToys
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Hotfix, Rhinestone picture motif: Rhodesian Ridgeback
                    





$24.10
 
                        ABCstickUndDruck
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Sitting - Small Cold Cast Bronze Dog Statue
                    





$69.00
 
                        DANNYQUEST
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Stubborn Rhodie Tricks Mug | Dog lover gift | Rhodesian Ridgeback Mug | Rhodie Mug | Funny dog mug | Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug
                    





$18.99
 
                        MadFido
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag, Dog Breed Tote, Gift for Pet Lover, Dog Lover, Dog Mom, Dog Breed Art, Pet Tote, Pet Gift
                    





$15.00
 
                        DogCityandCo
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Silhouette Art 8x10 - UNFRAMED Hand Cut Rhodesian Ridgeback Print - Personalized Name or Text Optional
                    





$18.00
 
                        LinenWorkshop
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Ridgeback - Repeating Silhouette - Rhodesian Ridgeback shirt - Ladies or Unisex cut - Choose your color!
                    





$20.00
 
                        TheSqueakyEgg
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Personalized Solid Rhodesian Ridgeback Angel Dog Pendant RDG4-ANP
                    





$128.00
 
                        Efsterling
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Christmas Ornament personalized memorial floated paper glass bulb dog gift
                    





$12.00
 
                        AbbyRoseStudios
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback SCARECROW Halloween vintage style CHENILLE ORNAMENTS set of 2
                    





$15.00
 
                        StanleyAndStewart
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Beagle Address Stamp - Dog Return Address Stamp - Dog Lover Gift - Rubber Stamp - Personalized Pet Address Stamp
                    





$27.00
 
                        PaperPeachShop
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        RHODESIAN RIDGEBACK Tummy Warmer, Fleece Dog Coat, Sweater for Dogs, Dog Shirt, Dog Jacket, Dog Vest, Clothes for Dogs, Large dog clothing
                    





$44.00
 
                        VoyagersK9Apparel
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Ornament in Wood or Mirror Acrylic Customizable with Name
                    





$5.00
 
                        DaybreaksPet
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Dog collar MASSAI, Martingale,  embroidered Earth brown
                    





$99.32
 
                        BlinniFashion
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Die Cut Vinyl Sticker - 1248
                    





$5.99
 
                        MisterPetLife
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Custom Necklace Dog Jewelry Personalized with your Dog's name Pet Memorial
                    





$15.00
 
                        tagsoup
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        International Dog Society - 4 Art Prints - Samoyed, Akita Inu, Rhodesian Ridgeback, Tibetan Spaniel - Pet Portraits by Maria Pishvanova
                    





$50.87
 
                        AnimalCenturyKingdom
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Silhouette Dog Lead Holder Rack - metal wall art
                    





$13.39
 
                        MetalMagpieUK
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        My Rhodesian Ridgeback Is Smarter License Plate Frame (T)
                    





$13.99
 
                        JamesEReidDesign
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Ornament, Dog Gifts for Dog Lovers
                    





$16.99
 
                        SerendipitiniPet
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback NOSE BUTTER® Handcrafted, All Natural Moisturizing Balm for Rough, Dry, Crusty Dog Noses 16 oz Tin with Ridgie Label
                    





$58.95
 
                        TheBlissfulDog
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Welcome Sign - CAN BE CUSTOMIZED!
                    





$50.00
 
                        VulcanixArt
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rusty Finish Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Angel Memorial Garden Art Stake Rhodi
                    





$36.99
 
                        MountainIron
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Wyatt Rhodesian Ridgeback Stuffed Animal
                    





$20.00
 
                        ShelterToServiceDog
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Address Stamp - Dog Return Address Stamp - Dog Lover Gift - Rubber Stamp - Personalized Pet Address Stamp
                    



$27.00
 
                        PaperPeachShop
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback heartbeat | Unisex Shirt | Dog lovers gift idea | Rhodesian Ridgeback | Parcel WILL NOT arrive in time for Xmas
                    



$21.99
 
                        PupBeats
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        RHODESIAN RIDGEBACK DOG Pouche & Coin Purse, Dog Lovers, Wristlet Pouch
                    



$20.00
 
                        PawiesAnimalLovers
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag, Dog Breed Tote, Gift for Pet Lover, Dog Lover, Dog Mom, Dog Breed Art, Pet Tote, Pet Gift
                    



$15.00
 
                        DogCityandCo
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












Ad
 


                        Ridge Mom | DC375MOM | High Quality Adhesive Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Vinyl Window Decal Sticker
                    



$7.59
 
                        NickerStickers
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Tiny Rhodesian Ridgeback necklace, silver Rhodesian Ridgeback jewelry, pet memorial necklace,  remembrance jewelry
                    





$30.00
 
                        lulubugjewelry
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback owned by Mrs J Player 1935 Dog vintage print art canine dog picture home decor wall art
                    





$13.54
 
                        OLDBOOKSMAPSPRINTS
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Fabric cotton polyester tapestry dog Munsterlander Rhodesian Ridgeback pillow slip bag
                    





$25.80
 
                        stoffamstueck
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        Rhodesian Ridgeback Decals, set of 2
                    





$8.00
 
                        SisuBeads
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 












 


                        I Love my Rhodesian Ridgeback Mug personalised | Different colours available | Custom name mugs | Dog Mug | Rhodesian gift
                    





$16.17
 
                        CreativeZooShop
                    










            Favorite
        

            Favorited
        
 






            Add to
        

            Added
        

 


















 



































Rhodesia - Wikipedia






















 






Rhodesia

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Rhodesian)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the unrecognised state of Rhodesia. For the British colony, see Southern Rhodesia. For other uses, see Rhodesia (disambiguation).


Rhodesia


Unrecognised state






1965–1979










Flag (1968)



Coat of arms





Motto
Sit Nomine Digna (Latin)
"May she be worthy of the name"


Anthem
"Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia" (1974–1979)








Royal anthem
"God Save the Queen" (1965–1970)























Capital
Salisbury


Languages
English (official)
Afrikaans, Shona and Ndebele widely spoken


Government
Constitutional monarchy (1965–70)
Parliamentary republic (1970–79)


Head of State



 • 
Monarch
1965–1970

Elizabeth II (Unrecognised by Elizabeth II)


 • 
President
1970–1975

Clifford Dupont (First)


 • 
1979
Henry Everard (Acting president) (Last)


Prime Minister



 • 
1965–1979
Ian Smith


Legislature
Parliament


 • 
Upper house
Senate


 • 
Lower house
House of Assembly


Historical era
Cold War


 • 
Independence (UDI)
11 November 1965


 • 
Republic declared
2 March 1970


 • 
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
1 June 1979


 • 
Republic of Zimbabwe
18 April 1980


Area


 • 
1978
390,580 km2 (150,800 sq mi)


Population


 • 
1978 est.
6,930,000 


     Density
18/km2 (46/sq mi)


Currency
Rhodesian pound (1965–1970)
Rhodesian dollar (1970–1979)







Preceded by
Succeeded by






Southern Rhodesia






Zimbabwe Rhodesia









Today part of
 Zimbabwe


a. The government recognised Queen Elizabeth II as the official Head of State from 1965 to 1970. The highest official of Rhodesia held the title "Officer Administering the Government" (OAtG) as he acted in lieu of the official Governor, who remained at his post but was ignored. After Rhodesia became a republic in March 1970, the President replaced the OAtG as the highest official and the Governor returned to London.


Rhodesia (/roʊˈdiːʒə/), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe. With its capital in Salisbury (now Harare), Rhodesia was considered a de facto successor state to the former British colony of Southern Rhodesia (which had achieved responsible government in 1923).
During an effort to delay an immediate transition to black majority rule, Rhodesia's predominantly white government issued its own Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965. The UDI administration initially sought recognition as an autonomous realm within the Commonwealth of Nations, but reconstituted itself as a republic in 1970.
Following a brutal guerrilla war fought with two African nationalist organisations (Robert Mugabe's ZANU and Joshua Nkomo's ZAPU), Rhodesian premier Ian Smith conceded to bi-racial democracy in 1978. However, a provisional government subsequently headed by Smith and his moderate colleague Abel Muzorewa failed in appeasing international critics or halting the bloodshed. By December 1979, Muzorewa had replaced Smith as Prime Minister and secured an agreement with the militant nationalists, allowing Rhodesia to briefly revert to colonial status pending elections under a universal franchise. It finally achieved internationally recognised independence in April 1980; the nation was concurrently renamed the Republic of Zimbabwe.
A wholly landlocked area, Rhodesia was bordered by South Africa to the south, Bechuanaland (later Botswana) to the southwest, Zambia to the northwest, and Mozambique (a Portuguese province until 1975) to the east. The state was named after Cecil Rhodes, whose British South Africa Company acquired the land in the late 19th century.



Contents


1 Nomenclature
2 History

2.1 Background
2.2 Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)

2.2.1 Impact of UDI


2.3 The Bush War
2.4 End of the Bush War

2.4.1 Late 1970s
2.4.2 Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas
2.4.3 Security Situation Erodes Rapidly


2.5 End of UDI (1979)
2.6 Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)


3 Politics
4 Military and police
5 Foreign relations

5.1 Britain and the UDI
5.2 Sanctions
5.3 International perspective
5.4 Diplomatic relations
5.5 Results


6 Legacy

6.1 Rhodesian media


7 References
8 External links

8.1 Audio and video





Nomenclature[edit]
The official name of the country, according to the constitution adopted concurrently with the Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) in 1965, was Rhodesia. This was not the case under British law, however, which considered the territory's legal name to be Southern Rhodesia, the name given to the country in 1898 during the British South Africa Company's administration of the Rhodesias, and retained by the self-governing colony of Southern Rhodesia after the end of Company rule in 1923.[1]
This naming dispute dated back to October 1964, when Northern Rhodesia became independent from Britain and concurrently changed its name to Zambia. The Southern Rhodesian colonial government in Salisbury felt that in the absence of a "Northern" Rhodesia, the continued use of "Southern" was superfluous. It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government. Salisbury went on using the shortened name in an official manner nevertheless,[2] while the British government continued referring to the country as Southern Rhodesia. This situation continued throughout the UDI period.[1] The shortened name was used by many people including the British government in the House of Commons.
The British government maintained this stance regarding the June–December 1979 successor state of Zimbabwe Rhodesia, and when Zimbabwe Rhodesia returned to colonial status from December 1979 to April 1980, it was as "Southern Rhodesia". Southern Rhodesia subsequently gained international recognition of its independence in April 1980, when it became the Republic of Zimbabwe.
History[edit]



Part of a series on the



History of Zimbabwe





Ancient history


Mapungubwe Kingdom
c.1075–1220


Zimbabwe Kingdom
c.1220–1450


Mutapa Kingdom
c.1450–1760


Torwa dynasty
c.1450–1683





White settlement pre-1923


Rozwi Empire
c.1684–1834


Matabeleland
1838–1894


Rudd Concession
1888


BSA Company rule
1890–1923


First Matabele War
1893–1894


Second Matabele War
1896–1897


World War I involvement
1914–1918


Colony of Southern Rhodesia
1923–1980


World War II involvement
1939–1945


Malayan Emergency
involvement
1948–1960


Federation with Northern
Rhodesia and Nyasaland
1953–1963


Rhodesian Bush War
1964–1979



Unilateral Declaration of
Independence (UDI)

1965


Rhodesia under UDI
1965–1979


Zimbabwe-Rhodesia
June–Dec 1979



Lancaster House Agreement

Dec 1979


British Dependency
1979–1980


Zimbabwe
1980–present


Gukurahundi
1982–1987


Second Congo War
1998–2003





 Zimbabwe portal





v
t
e





Main article: History of Rhodesia
Background[edit]
Until after World War II, the landlocked British possession of Southern Rhodesia was not developed as an indigenous African territory, but rather as a unique state which reflected its multiracial character.[3] This situation certainly made it very different from other lands which existed under colonial rule, as many Europeans had arrived to make permanent homes, populating the towns as traders or settling to farm the most productive soils.[4][5] In 1922, faced with the decision to join the Union of South Africa as a fifth province or accept nearly full internal autonomy, the electorate cast its vote against South African integration.[6][7][8]
In view of the outcome of the referendum, the territory was annexed by the United Kingdom on 12 September 1923.[9][10][11][12] Shortly after annexation, on 1 October 1923, the first constitution for the new Colony of Southern Rhodesia came into force.[11][13] Under this constitution, Southern Rhodesia was given the right to elect its own thirty-member legislature, premier, and cabinet—although the British Crown retained a formal veto over measures affecting natives and dominated foreign policy.[14][15][16]
The Rhodesian authorities provided compensation when the government nationalised enterprises such as the country's railroads, consistently refused to radically alleviate unemployment, and shied from filling civil service posts with partisan appointees. By colonial standards, public services were well-organised and praised for their efficiency.[3]
In 1953, Southern Rhodesia merged with the two other British Central African states to form the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland – a loose association that placed defence and economic direction under a central government but left many domestic affairs under the control of its constituent territories.[17] As it began to appear that decolonisation was inevitable and indigenous black populations were pressing heavily for change,[3] the federation was dissolved in 1963.[18][19][20]

Numbers of white and black inhabitants before and during the Central African Federation[21]

Year
Southern Rhodesia
Northern Rhodesia
Nyasaland
Total


White
Black
White
Black
White
Black
White
Black


1927
38,200 (3.98%)
922,000 (96.02%)
4,000 (0.4%)
1,000,000 (99.6%)
1,700 (0.13%)
1,350,000 (99.87%)
43,900 (1.32%)
3,272,000 (98.68%)


1946
80,500 (4.79%)
1,600,000 (95.21%)
21,919 (1.32%)
1,634,980 (97.68%)
2,300 (0.10%)
2,340,000 (99.90%)
104,719 (1.84%)
5,574,980 (98.16%)


1955
150,000 (5.88%)
2,400,000 (94.12%)
65,000 (3.02%)
2,085,000 (96.98%)
6,300 (0.25%)
2,550,000 (99.75%)
221,300 (3.05%)
7,035,000 (96.95%)


1960
223,000 (7.30%)
2,830,000 (92.70%)
76,000 (3.14%)
2,340,000 (96.85%)
9,300 (0.33%)
2,810,000 (99.66%)
308,300 (3.72%)
7,980,000 (96.28%)


Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)[edit]
Although prepared to grant formal independence to Southern Rhodesia (now Rhodesia), the British government had adopted a policy of no independence before majority rule, dictating that colonies with a substantial population of European settlers would not receive independence except under conditions of majority rule.[22][23][24] Rhodesian colonials initially balked at the suggestion; some felt they had a right to absolute political control, at least for the time being, despite their relatively small numbers.[17][25] The authorities were also disturbed by the post-independence chaos which was plaguing other African nations at the time.[26] However, once Rhodesia had been introduced as a topic for discussion in international bodies, extension of the status quo became a matter of concern to the world community and a serious embarrassment to the United Kingdom.[5]
After the federal break-up in 1963, then-Prime Minister Alec Douglas-Home insisted that preconditions on independence talks hinge on what he termed the "five principles" – unimpeded progress to majority rule, assurance against any future legislation decidedly detrimental to black interests, "improvement in the political status" of local Africans, moves towards ending racial discrimination, and agreement on a settlement which could be "acceptable to the whole population".[27][28][29][30] Harold Wilson and his incoming Labour government took an even harder line on demanding that these points be legitimately addressed before an independence agenda could be set.[5]
By 1964, growing dissatisfaction with the ongoing negotiations ousted Salisbury's incumbent Winston Field, replacing him with Ian Smith, deputy chairman of the conservative Rhodesian Front party.[31][32][33] Smith, the colony's first Rhodesian-born leader, soon came to personify resistance to liberals in British government and those agitating for change at home.[5] He ruled out acceptance for all five of the proposed principles as they stood,[34] implying instead that Rhodesia was already legally entitled to independence—a claim which was overwhelmingly endorsed by registered voters in a referendum.[35][36][37]
Emboldened by the results of this referendum and the subsequent general election, Rhodesia now threatened to assume her own sovereignty without British consent. Harold Wilson countered by warning that such an irregular procedure would be considered treasonous, although he specifically rejected using armed force against the English "kith and kin" in Africa.[38][39][40] Wilson's refusal to consider a military option encouraged Smith to proceed with his plans. Talks quickly broke down, and final efforts in October to achieve a settlement floundered; the Rhodesian Front remained unwilling to accept what were regarded as unacceptably drastic terms and the British would settle for nothing less – it was a formula doomed to failure.[5]




Ian Smith signs the Unilateral Declaration of Independence.



The mantle of the pioneers has fallen on our shoulders to sustain civilisation in a primitive country.
— Ian Smith, 11 November 1965, upon the announcement of UDI[41]

On 11 November 1965, following a brief but solemn consensus, Rhodesia's leading statesmen issued their country's unilateral declaration of independence (UDI).[3][42][43] This was immediately denounced as an "act of rebellion against the Crown" in the United Kingdom, and Wilson promised that the illegal action would be short-lived.[44][45] However, few seemed to initially realise that Rhodesia was no longer within the Commonwealth's direct sphere of influence and British rule was now a constitutional fiction; Salisbury remained virtually immune to credible metropolitan leverage.[17]
On 12 October 1965, the United Nations General Assembly had noted the repeated threats of the Rhodesian authorities "to declare unilaterally the independence of Southern Rhodesia, in order to perpetuate minority rule", and called upon Wilson to use all means at his disposal (including military force) to prevent the Rhodesian Front from asserting independence.[46] After UDI was proclaimed, UN officials branded Ian Smith's government as an "illegal racist minority regime"[47] and called on member states to sever economic ties with Rhodesia, recommending sanctions on petroleum products and military hardware.[5] In December 1966, these measures became mandatory, extending to bar the purchase of Rhodesian tobacco, chrome, copper, asbestos, sugar, meat, and hides.[5]
Britain, having already adopted extensive sanctions of its own, dispatched a Royal Navy squadron to monitor oil deliveries in the port of Beira in Mozambique, from which a strategic pipeline ran to Umtali in Rhodesia. The warships were to deter "by force, if necessary, vessels reasonably believed to be carrying oil destined for (Southern) Rhodesia".[48][49]
Some nations, such as Switzerland, and West Germany, which were not UN members, conducted business legally with Rhodesia – the latter remained the Smith government's largest trading partner in Western Europe until 1973, when Bonn joined the UN.[5] Japan continued to accept more Rhodesian exports than any other nation, and Iran provided oil.[50] The Portuguese government marketed Rhodesian products as its own, via false certificates of origin and disguised trade channels.[51] South Africa openly refused to observe the UN sanctions.[52][53] A 1971 amendment passed in the United States permitted American firms to go on importing Rhodesian chromium and nickel as normal.[54]
Despite the poor showing of sanctions, Rhodesia found it nearly impossible to obtain diplomatic recognition abroad. In 1970, the US government had made it clear that the UDI would not be recognised "under [any] circumstances".[55] Even Smith's ideological allies in Pretoria, although sympathetic, failed to recognise the new country on an equal level.[56]
Initially, the state retained its pledged loyalty to Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom, recognising her as Queen of Rhodesia.[5] When Smith and Deputy Prime Minister Clifford Dupont called on colonial Governor, Sir Humphrey Gibbs, to formally notify him of the UDI, Gibbs condemned the UDI as an act of treason. After Smith formally announced the UDI on the radio, Gibbs sacked the entire cabinet on orders from Whitehall. However, he was unable to enact any concrete actions to foster a return to legality. Government ministers simply ignored his notices, pointing out that UDI made his office obsolete. Even so, Gibbs continued to occupy his residence in Salisbury until 1970, when he vacated the premises and left Rhodesia following the declaration of a republic.[57] He had effectively been superseded before then; on 20 December 1965, Smith named Dupont as "Officer Administering the Government"; an earlier attempt to have him named as Governor-General of Rhodesia was dismissed out of hand.[5]
In September 1968, the Appellate Division of the Rhodesian High Court ruled that Ian Smith's administration had become the de jure government of the country, not merely the de facto one.[58] To support his decision, Chief Justice Sir Hugh Beadle used several statements made by Hugo Grotius, who maintained that there was no way in which a nation could rightly claim to be governing a particular territory – if it was waging a war against that territory. Beadle argued that due to Britain's economic war against Rhodesia, she could not (at the same point) be described as governing Rhodesia.[59][60] Resulting court decisions held that the rebel government "could lawfully do anything its predecessors could lawfully have done".[61]
A Salisbury commission chaired by prominent lawyer W.R. Waley was appointed to study constitutional options open to the Rhodesian authorities as of April 1968, but reaching a further settlement with the British was ruled out early on.[17][62] Waley, although insistent that "Europeans must surrender any belief in permanent European domination", also testified that majority rule was not desirable immediately.[5]
Talks aimed at easing the differences between Rhodesia and the United Kingdom were carried out aboard Royal Navy vessels once in December 1966 and again in October 1968.[63][64][65] Both efforts failed to achieve agreement, although Harold Wilson added a sixth principle to the five he had previously enunciated: "it would be necessary to ensure that, regardless of race, there was no oppression of the majority by the minority or of [any] minority by the majority." Rhodesian resolve stiffened following a failure to reach a new settlement, with more radical elements of the Rhodesian Front calling for a republican constitution.[5]
During a two-proposition referendum held in 1969, the proposal for severing all remaining ties to the British Crown passed by a majority of 61,130 votes to 14,327.[5] Rhodesia declared itself a republic on 2 March 1970. Under the new constitution, a president served as ceremonial head of state, with the prime minister nominally reporting to him.[66] Some in Rhodesian government had hoped in vain that the declaration of a republic would finally prompt other nations to grant recognition.[67]
Impact of UDI[edit]
The years following Rhodesia's UDI saw an unfolding series of economic, military, and political pressures placed on the country which eventually brought about majority rule, a totality of these factors rather than any one the reason for introducing change.[68] In 2005, a conference at the London School of Economics which discussed Rhodesia's independence concluded that UDI was sparked by an existing racial conflict complicated by Cold War intrigues.[69]
Critics of UDI sought to maintain that Ian Smith intended only to safeguard the privileges of an entrenched colonial elite at the expense of the impoverished African community. According to this logic, UDI created a vacuum of oppression which was eventually filled by Robert Mugabe's present dictatorship.[70] Smith and his supporters continued to defend their actions, however, by claiming that the Rhodesian majority was too inexperienced at the time to manage effectively a developed nation.[26]
At large, the European population's emerging attitude to UDI was tense. Many white Rhodesians had seen themselves as nothing less than fully fledged members of the British Empire, carrying on the same rugged values and frontier spirit of the early Englishmen who had settled in 1890.[42] But such confidence was rudely shaken by Whitehall's refusal to grant independence on their terms. After 1965, there were those who continued to claim that they were collectively upholders of principle and defenders of such values against the twin threats of communism, manifested through the militant black nationalists, and – ironically – the decadence of Britain herself.[42] Often repeated appeals to the Christian heritage of their pioneer ancestors in "defending the free world" reflected these beliefs.[42]
African parties displayed initial horror at Smith's declaration, with one ZANU official stating, "...for all those who cherish freedom and a meaningful life, UDI has set a collision course which cannot be altered. 11 November 1965 [has] marked the turning point of the struggle for freedom in that land from a constitutional and political one to primarily a military struggle."[43] It would, however, be several years before even the most radical nationalists chose to develop a coherent strategy revolving around armed resistance, preferring instead to create opportunities for external intervention.[43]
Because Rhodesian exports were generally competitive and had previously been entitled to preferential treatment on the British market, the former colony did not recognise the need for escalating the pace of diversification before independence. Following the UDI, however, Rhodesia began to demonstrate that she had the potential to develop a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency.[26][71] After the Rhodesian Front began introducing incentives accorded to domestic production, industrial output expanded dramatically. A rigid system of countermeasures enacted to combat sanctions succeeded in blunting their impact for at least a decade.[5] Over the next nine years Rhodesian companies, spiting the freezing of their assets and blocking of overseas accounts, also perfected cunning techniques of sanctions evasion through both local and foreign subsidiaries, which operated on a clandestine trade network.[5]
From 1968 until 1970, there was virtually no further dialogue between Rhodesia and the UK. This altered immediately after the ascension of Edward Heath, who reopened negotiations.[72] Smith remained optimistic that Heath would do his utmost to remedy Anglo-Rhodesian relations, although disappointed that he continued to adhere publicly to the original "five principles" proposed by Alec Douglas-Home, now foreign secretary. In November 1971, Douglas-Home renewed contacts with Salisbury and announced a proposed agreement which would be satisfactory to both sides – it recognised Rhodesia's 1969 constitution as the legal frame of government, while agreeing that gradual legislative representation was an acceptable formula for unhindered advance to majority rule.[5] Nevertheless, the new settlement, if approved, would also implement an immediate improvement in black political status, offer a means to terminate racial discrimination, and provide a solid guarantee against retrogressive constitutional amendments.[73]
Implementation of the proposed settlement hinged on popular acceptance, but the Rhodesian government consistently refused to submit it to a universal referendum.[5] A twenty four-member commission headed by an eminent jurist, Lord Pearce, was therefore tasked with ascertaining public opinion on the subject.[74] In 1972, the commission began interviewing interest groups and sampling opinions – although concern was expressed over the widespread apathy encountered.[26] According to every published finding, whites were in favour of the settlement, and Rhodesians of mixed or Asian background generally pleased, while black reaction was resoundingly negative.[72][75] As many as thirty African chiefs and politicians voiced their opposition, prompting Britain to withdraw from the proposals on the grounds of the commission's report.[74]
The Bush War[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Bush War
As early as 1960, minority rule in Southern Rhodesia was already being challenged by a rising tide of political violence led by African nationalists such as Joshua Nkomo and Ndabaningi Sithole. After their public campaigns were initially suppressed, many believed that negotiation was completely incapable of meeting their aspirations. Petrol bombings by radicals became increasingly common, with the Zimbabwe Review observing in 1961, "for the first time home-made petrol bombs were used by freedom fighters in Salisbury against settler establishments."[76] It was officially noted that between January and September 1962 alone, 33 bombings were carried out, in addition to 27 acts of attempted sabotage on communications. In that same period, nationalists were implicated in arson targeting 18 schools and 10 churches.[43] Nkomo's Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU) subsequently disclosed that it had formed a military wing (Zimbabwe People's Revolutionary Army, ZIPRA), and 'the decision to start bringing in arms and ammunition and to send young men away for sabotage training' had already been made. The Rhodesian authorities responded by banning ZAPU and driving its supporters underground.[77] Frustrated by their repeated failures, nationalists also conducted a campaign of terror against black Africans, murdering those who had either identified with the colonial administration or had simply failed to demonstrate their allegiance to the cause.[43] To protect civilians, emergency laws were imposed, broadening the legal definition of unlawful gatherings and giving the police greater powers to crack down on agitators or subversives.[78] The death sentence was also introduced for terrorism involving explosives and arson.[5]
A crisis of confidence soon resulted across ZAPU, which was already suffering from poor morale, compounded by tribal and ideological factionalism. In 1963, party dissidents rejected Joshua Nkomo's authority and formed their own organisation, the Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU) – which worked out its own strategy for impressing international opinion, undermining white assurance, and achieving a complete breakdown of order. By August 1964, ZANU, which had brutally intimidated neutrals and opponents alike, was outlawed by authorities as well.[79]
ZANU's agenda was inward-looking, leftist, and pan-Africanist in nature. Ndabaningi Sithole and avowed Marxist Robert Mugabe, its most prominent leaders, demanded a one party Zimbabwean state with majority rule and a public monopoly on land.[5] After being forced from Rhodesia, they continued to operate in exile, creating occupation groups representing urban workers, miners, and peasant farmers. ZANU also attracted professionals, students, and feminists to its ranks. While ZAPU theoretically continued to command the allegiance of most Ndebele and Shona activists, Sithole and Mugabe drew their support from the Mashonaland countryside.[5]
After the UDI, ZANU officials mapped an elaborate plan for the "liberation of Zimbabwe" which called for attacks on white farmers, destruction of cash crops, disrupting electricity in urban areas, and petrol bombings.[43] Sithole and Nkomo both insisted on the need for armed struggle, but disagreed on the means to go about it. For example, ZAPU tended to follow Soviet thinking, placing an emphasis on sophisticated weaponry in the hopes of winning a conventional battle like the Viet Minh at Dien Bien Phu. ZANU preferred to politicise populations in areas which they intended to seize.[68] Neither force, however, had acquired basic knowledge of guerrilla warfare. Debate on political theory and insurgent tactics became the obsession of nationalists at this stage.[43]




Soldier interrogates Rhodesian villagers about insurgent activity in late 1977. This photograph became one of the most enduring images of the bush war.


In April 1966, two Zimbabwe African National Liberation Army (ZANLA – the military wing of ZANU) units, having received prior training at Nanjing Military College, crossed into Rhodesia from Zambia. They were armed with SKS carbines, Chinese hand grenades, explosives, and communist pamphlets, having been issued vague instructions to sabotage important installations before killing white persons indiscriminately.[43] At least five guerrillas were simply arrested before getting very far. Another seven hoped to destroy a pylon carrying electricity to Sinoia in the northwest. Their faulty demolitions were uncovered by the Rhodesian Security Forces and the men easily tracked to a nearby ranch on 28 April, where they were shot resisting capture.[68][80][81] This event is considered to have been the first engagement of what came to be known as the "Bush War" in Rhodesia and the "Second Chimurenga" (or rebellion in Shona) by supporters of the guerrillas.[82]
The campaign proper is generally considered to have started in 1972 with the Attack on Altena Farm, despite the minor threat already represented by the nationalist movements in the 1960s.
After unsuccessful appeals to Britain and the United States for military assistance, Robert Mugabe, who was based in Mozambique after that country's independence from Portugal in 1975, led ZANU to seek support from the People's Republic of China and countries of the Soviet Bloc. Joshua Nkomo, based in Zambia and also supported by the Soviet Union, led ZAPU.[83] ZANU and ZAPU together formed 'the Patriotic Front'. Broadly, ZANLA recruited mainly from Mashonaland and Manicaland provinces, whilst the ZIPRA recruited from Mashonaland West, Midlands and Matabeleland provinces of Zimbabwe.
After the collapse of Portuguese rule in Mozambique in 1974–75, it was no longer viable for the Smith regime to sustain white minority rule indefinitely. By this time, even South Africa's Vorster had come to this view. While Vorster was unwilling to make concessions to his own country's blacks, he concluded that white minority rule was not sustainable in a country where blacks outnumbered whites 22:1.[83] In 1978, there were 270,000 Rhodesians of European descent and more than six million Africans.[84]
International business groups involved in the country (e.g. Lonrho) transferred their support from the Rhodesian government to black nationalist parties. Business leaders and politicians feted Nkomo on his visits to Europe. ZANU also attracted business supporters who saw the course that future events were likely to take.[85] Funding and arms support provided by supporters, particularly from the Soviet Union and its allies in the latter 1970s, allowed both ZIPRA and the ZANLA to acquire more sophisticated weaponry, thereby increasing the military pressure that the guerrillas were able to place on Rhodesia.
Until 1972, containing the guerrillas was little more than a police action. Even as late as August 1975 when Rhodesian government and black nationalist leaders met at Victoria Falls for negotiations brokered by South Africa and Zambia, the talks never got beyond the procedural phase.[86] Rhodesian representatives made it clear they were prepared to fight an all out war to prevent majority rule.[87] However, the situation changed dramatically after the end of Portuguese colonial rule in Mozambique in 1975. Rhodesia now found itself almost entirely surrounded by hostile states and even South Africa, its only real ally, pressed for a settlement.

Having let slip one chance after another of reaching an accommodation with more moderate black leaders, Rhodesia's whites seem to have made the tragic choice of facing black nationalism over the barrel of a gun rather than the conference table. The downhill road toward a race war in Rhodesia is becoming increasingly slippery with blood.
— Rand Daily Mail editorial, May 1976[88]

At this point, ZANU's alliance with FRELIMO (the Liberation Front of Mozambique) and the porous border between Mozambique and eastern Rhodesia enabled large-scale training and infiltration of ZANU/ZANLA fighters. The governments of Zambia and Botswana were also emboldened sufficiently to allow resistance movement bases to be set up in their territories. Guerrillas began to launch operations deep inside Rhodesia, attacking roads, railways, economic targets and isolated security force positions, in 1976.[89]




Rhodesian servicewoman takes aim with her Browning Hi-Power 9×19mm semi-automatic pistol; from a 1976 army recruitment poster


The government adopted a 'strategic hamlets' policy of the kind used in Malaya and Vietnam to restrict the influence of insurgents over the population of rural areas. Local people were forced to relocate to protected villages (PVs) which were strictly controlled and guarded by the government against rebel atrocities. The protected villages were compared by the guerrillas to concentration camps. Some contemporary accounts claim that this interference in the lives of local residents induced many of them who had previously been neutral to support the guerrillas.[90]
The war degenerated into rounds of increasing brutality from all three parties involved (ZANU and ZAPU, and the Rhodesian Army fighting off their attacks). Mike Subritzky, a former NZ Army ceasefire monitor in Rhodesia, in 1980 described the war as "both bloody and brutal and brought out the very worst in the opposing combatants on all three sides."[91]
End of the Bush War[edit]









The geographical situation in 1965 (left, on UDI) and 1975 (right, after the independence of Mozambique and Angola from Portugal). Green: Rhodesia; purple: friendly nations; orange: hostile states.


Rhodesia began to lose vital economic and military support from South Africa, which, while sympathetic to the white minority government, never accorded it diplomatic recognition. The South African government placed limits on the fuel and munitions they supplied to the Rhodesian military. They also withdrew the personnel and equipment that they had previously provided to aid the war effort, though covert military support continued.[92]
In 1976, the South African government and United States governments worked together to place pressure on Smith to agree to a form of majority rule. In response to the initiative of US Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, in 1976 Ian Smith accepted the principle of black majority rule within two years.[92] The Rhodesians now offered more concessions, but those concessions, focused on reaching an "internal settlement" with moderate black leaders, were insufficient to end the war.
At the time, some Rhodesians said the still embittered history between the British-dominated Rhodesia and the Afrikaner-dominated South Africa partly led South African government to withdraw its aid to Rhodesia. Ian Smith said in his memoirs that even though many white South Africans supported Rhodesia, South African Prime Minister John Vorster's policy of détente with the Black African states ended up with Rhodesia being offered as the "sacrificial lamb" to buy more time for South Africa. Other observers perceived South Africa's distancing itself from Rhodesia as being an early move in the process that led to majority rule in South Africa itself.[93]

In 1976 South Africa saw settlement of the Rhodesian question as vital on several fronts: to cauterise the wound of the psychological blow … caused by her defeat in the Angolan conflict; to pre-empt possible Cuban intervention in Rhodesia and the possibility of South Africa being sucked into another Cold War regional conflict without the support and endorsement of the western powers
— Dr Sue Onslow, South Africa and UDI[94]


In the latter 1970s, the militants had successfully put the economy of Rhodesia under significant pressure while the numbers of guerrillas in the country were steadily increasing.[95][96] The government abandoned its early strategy of trying to defend the borders in favour of trying to defend key economic areas and lines of communication with South Africa, while the rest of the countryside became a patchwork of "no-go areas".
Late 1970s[edit]
By the late 1970s, Rhodesia's front-line forces contained about 25,000 regular troops and police – backed up by relatively strong army and police reserves.[97] Its mechanised contingent consisted of light armoured cars and improvised mine-protected armoured personnel carriers, complemented by eight tanks (Polish built T-55LD tanks), delivered in the last year of the war. The Rhodesian Air Force operated an assortment of both Canberra light bombers, Hawker Hunter fighter bombers, older de Havilland Vampire jets as well as a somewhat antiquated, but still potent, helicopter arm. These forces, including highly trained special operations units, were capable of launching devastating raids on resistance movement camps outside the country, as in Operation Dingo in 1977 and other similar operations.
Nevertheless, guerrilla pressure inside the country itself was steadily increasing in the latter 1970s. By 1978–79, the war had become a contest between the guerrilla warfare placing ever increasing pressure on the Rhodesian regime and civil population and the Rhodesian government's strategy of trying to hold off the militants until external recognition for a compromise political settlement with moderate black leaders could be secured.
By this time, the need to cut a deal was apparent to most Rhodesians, but not to all. Ian Smith had dismissed his intransigent Defence Minister, P. K. van der Byl, as early as 1976.[98] "PK" had been a hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opposition or the international community since before UDI.

...it is better to fight to the last man and the last cartridge and die with some honour. Because, what is being presented to us here is a degree of humiliation...
— P. K. van der Byl in 1977, commenting on a British peace plan.[99]

Van der Byl eventually retired to his country estate outside Cape Town, but there were elements in Rhodesia, mainly embittered former security force personnel, who forcibly opposed majority rule up to and well beyond the establishment of majority rule.[100] New white immigrants continued to arrive in Rhodesia right up to the eve of majority rule.[101]
Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas[edit]
Main article: Rhodesia and weapons of mass destruction
The program's primary purpose was to kill guerrillas whether they were recruits transiting to camps in Mozambique or guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia. The CBW effort took on the guerrilla threat from three fronts.[102] First, the effort aimed to eliminate guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia through contaminated supplies either provided by contact men, recovered from hidden caches, or stolen from rural stores.[103] Secondly, the effort worked to contaminate water supplies along guerrilla infiltration routes into Rhodesia, forcing the guerrillas either to travel through arid regions to carry more water and less ammunition or travel through areas patrolled by the security forces.[104] Finally, the Rhodesians sought to hit the guerrillas in their camps in Mozambique by poisoning food, beverages, and medicines.
The chemicals most used in the Rhodesian program were parathion (an organophosphate insecticide) and thallium (a heavy metal commonly found in rodenticide).[105] The Rhodesians selected for use also included Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera) and possibly Bacillus anthracis (causative agent of anthrax). They also looked at using Rickettsia prowazekii (causative agent of epidemic typhus), and Salmonella typhi (causative agent of typhoid fever), and toxins—such as ricin and botulinum toxin.[102]
Biological agents, namely Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera), had some impact on the fighting capability of ZANLA.[106] Some former officers of the Rhodesian Security Forces alleged that anthrax was covertly used by Rhodesian psy-ops units during the late 1970s, but these statements are unfounded. Rhodesia never possessed the capability to produce anthrax spores on the scale needed for widespread dissemination.[102] Use of anthracis, ricin, or botulinum toxin would have been confined to assassination attempts.[102] Some more-merited allegations are that the South African government's top-secret chemical and biological weapons program, a progenitor of Project Coast, used Rhodesia as a "laboratory".[106]
Security Situation Erodes Rapidly[edit]
The work of journalists such as Lord Richard Cecil, son of the Marquess of Salisbury, stiffened the morale of Rhodesians and their overseas supporters.[107] Lord Richard produced regular news reports such as the Thames TV 'Frontline Rhodesia' features. These reports typically contrasted the incompetent insurgents with the "superbly professional" government troops.[108] A group of ZANLA fighters killed Lord Richard on 20 April 1978 when he was accompanying a Rhodesian airborne unit employed in Fire Force Operations.[109]
The shooting down on 3 September 1978 of the civilian Vickers Viscount airliner Hunyani, Air Rhodesia Flight RH825, in the Kariba area by ZIPRA fighters using a surface-to-air missile, with the subsequent massacre of its survivors, is widely considered to be the event that finally destroyed the Rhodesians' will to continue the war. Although militarily insignificant, the loss of this aircraft (and a second Viscount, the Umniati, in 1979) demonstrated the reach of resistance movements extended to Rhodesian civil society.[110]
The Rhodesians' means to continue the war were also eroding fast. In December 1978, a ZANLA unit penetrated the outskirts of Salisbury and fired a volley of rockets and incendiary device rounds into the main oil storage depot – the most heavily defended economic asset in the country. The storage tanks burned for five days, giving off a column of smoke that could be seen 130 kilometres (80 mi) away. Five hundred thousand barrels (79,000 m3) of petroleum product (comprising Rhodesia's strategic oil reserve) were lost.[111]
The government's defence spending increased from R$30 million, 8.5% of the national budget in 1971 to 1972, to R$400 m in 1978 to 1979, 47% of the national budget. In 1980, the post-independence government of Zimbabwe inherited a US$500 million national debt.[112]
End of UDI (1979)[edit]




Signing the Rhodesian Internal Settlement (from left: Bishop Abel Muzorewa, Ian Smith, Jeremiah Chirau and Ndabaningi Sithole)


The Rhodesian army continued its "mobile counter-offensive" strategy of holding key positions ("vital asset ground") while carrying out raids into the no-go areas and into neighbouring countries. While often extraordinarily successful in inflicting heavy guerrilla casualties, such raids also on occasion failed to achieve their objectives. In April 1979 special forces carried out a raid on Joshua Nkomo's residence in Lusaka (Zambia) with the stated intention of assassinating him.[113] Nkomo and his family left hastily a few hours before the raid – having clearly been warned that the raid was coming.
In 1979, some special forces units were accused of using counterinsurgent operations as cover for ivory poaching and smuggling. Colonel Reid-Daly (commander of the Selous Scouts) discovered that his phone was bugged and after challenging a superior officer on this issue was court martialled for insubordination. He received the lightest sentence possible, a caution, but he continued to fight his conviction and eventually resigned his commission and left the Army.
By 1978–79, up to 70% of the regular army was composed of black soldiers (though both the army and police reserves remained overwhelmingly white). By 1979 there were also 30 black commissioned officers in the regular army. While there was never any suggestion of disloyalty among the soldiers from predominantly black units (in particular within the Selous Scouts or the Rhodesian African Rifles – RAR), some argue that, by the time of the 1980 election, many of the RAR soldiers voted for Robert Mugabe.[114]
As the result of an Internal Settlement signed on 3 March 1978 between the Rhodesian government and the moderate African nationalist parties, which were not in exile and not involved in the war, elections were held in April 1979. The United African National Council (UANC) party won a majority in this election, and its leader, Abel Muzorewa (a United Methodist Church bishop), became the country's first black prime minister on 1 June 1979. The country's name was changed to Zimbabwe Rhodesia. The internal settlement left control of the country's police, security forces, civil service and judiciary in white hands, for the moment. It assured whites of about one third of the seats in parliament. It was essentially a power-sharing arrangement between whites and blacks which, in the eyes of many, particularly the insurgents, did not amount to majority rule.[115] However, the United States Senate voted to end economic sanctions against Zimbabwe Rhodesia on 12 June.[116]
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU. In spite of offers from Ian Smith, the latter parties declined to participate in an election in which their political position would be insecure and under a proposed constitution which they had played no part in drafting and which was perceived as retaining strong white minority privilege.
Bishop Muzorewa's government did not receive international recognition. The Bush War continued unabated and sanctions were not lifted. The international community refused to accept the validity of any agreement which did not incorporate the main nationalist parties. The British Government (then led by the recently elected Margaret Thatcher) issued invitations to all parties to attend a peace conference at Lancaster House. These negotiations took place in London in late 1979. The three-month-long conference almost failed to reach conclusion, due to disagreements on land reform, but resulted in the Lancaster House Agreement. UDI ended, and Rhodesia temporarily reverted to the status of a British colony (the 'Colony of Southern Rhodesia').[117]
The Lancaster House Agreement further provided for a ceasefire which was followed by an internationally supervised general election, held on February 1980. ZANU led by Robert Mugabe won this election, some alleged,[who?] by terrorising its political opposition, including supporters of ZAPU, through former insurgents that had not confined themselves to the designated guerrilla assembly points, as stipulated by the Lancaster House Agreement. The observers and the newly installed governor Lord Soames were accused of looking the other way, and Mugabe's victory was certified. Nevertheless, few could doubt that Mugabe's support within his majority Shona tribal group was extremely strong. The Rhodesian military seriously considered mounting a coup against a perceived stolen election ("Operation Quartz") to prevent ZANU from taking over the country.[118] The alleged coup was to include the assassination of Mugabe and coordinated assaults on guerrilla assembly points throughout the country. The plan was eventually scuttled, as it was obvious that Mugabe enjoyed widespread support from the black majority despite voter intimidation, as well as the fact that the coup would gain no external support, and a conflagration which would engulf the country was seen as inevitable.
Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)[edit]
Mugabe and the victorious black nationalists were rather less concerned by Operation Quartz than by the possibility that there might be a mass exodus of the white community of the kind that had caused chaos in Mozambique five years earlier. Such an exodus had been prepared for by the South African government. With the agreement of the British Governor of Rhodesia, South African troops had entered the country to secure the road approaches to the Beit Bridge border crossing point. Refugee camps had been prepared in the Transvaal. On the day the election results became known, most white families had prepared contingency plans for flight, including the packing of cars and suitcases.
However, after a meeting with Robert Mugabe and the central committee of ZANU (PF), Ian Smith was reassured that whites could, and should stay in the new Zimbabwe. Mugabe promised that he would abide strictly by the terms of the Lancaster House Agreement and that changes in Zimbabwe would be made gradually and by proper legal process. In a CBS news interview, Mugabe claimed that Rhodesian whites "...are still in control of the economy, the majority being commercial farmers.",[119] Mugabe however, would reverse his commitment to these agreements some years later; the regime began confiscating white owned farm lands. This is widely blamed for leading to the deterioration of the Zimbabwean economy which plagues the country today.[120]
On 18 April 1980 the country became independent as the Republic of Zimbabwe, and its capital, Salisbury, was renamed Harare two years later.
Politics[edit]



Rhodesia






This article is part of a series on the
politics and government of
Rhodesia




Constitutional history



— Overview
1890–1923  BSA Company rule
1923–1980  Southern Rhodesia
1953–1963  Rhodesia–Nyasaland Federation
1965–1979  Rhodesia under UDI
 1979  Zimbabwe Rhodesia (under UDI)









Government


Governor / President
Prime Minister








Legislature



1899–1923  Legislative Council
1924–1970  Legislative Assembly









Elections


General


1924 1928 1933 1934 1939 1946 1948 1954 1958 1962 1965 1970 1974 1977 1979 1980



Legislative Council


1899 1902 1905 1908 1911 1914 1920



Referendums


1922 1934 1953 1961 1964 1969 1979











Political parties


African National Congress
Communist Party
Labour Party
Liberal Party
Rhodesia Party
Rhodesian Action Party
Rhodesian Front
United African National Council
United Federal Party

Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU)


Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU)









Foreign relations



Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI)

Mission in Lisbon
Passport








National symbols


Flag (other flags)
Anthem









Other countries
Atlas








v
t
e





Main article: Politics of Rhodesia




The Presidential flag of Rhodesia.


Although Southern Rhodesia never gained full dominion status within the Commonwealth of Nations, Southern Rhodesians ruled themselves from the attainment of 'Responsible Government' in 1923. Its electoral register had property and education qualifications. Over the years various electoral arrangements made at a national and municipal level upheld these standards. For example, the franchise for the first Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council election in 1899 contained the following requirement:

"voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth £75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of £50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months' continuous residence was also required for qualifications (b) and (c)."

Following Cecil Rhodes's dictum of "equal rights for all civilised men", there was no overt racial component to the franchise. However, the requirement excluded a majority of native blacks from the electorate.
Up until the 1950s, Southern Rhodesia had a vibrant political life with right and left wing parties competing for power. The Rhodesian Labour Party held seats in the Assembly and in municipal councils throughout the 1920s and 1930s. From 1953 to 1958, the prime minister was Garfield Todd, a liberal who did much to promote the development of the Black community through investment in education, housing and healthcare. However, the government forced Todd from office because his proposed reforms were seen by many whites as too radical.
From 1958 onwards, white settler politics consolidated and ossified around resistance to majority rule, setting the stage for UDI. The 1961 Constitution governed Southern Rhodesia and independent Rhodesia up until 1969, using the Westminster Parliamentary System modified by a system of separate voter rolls with differing property and education qualifications, without regard to race. Whites ended up with the majority of Assembly seats.
The 1969 republican constitution established a bicameral Parliament consisting of an indirectly elected Senate and a directly elected House of Assembly, effectively reserving the majority of seats for whites. The office of President had only ceremonial significance with the Prime Minister holding executive power.
The Constitution of the short-lived Zimbabwe Rhodesia, which saw a black-led government elected for the first time, reserved 28 of the 100 parliamentary seats for whites. The independence constitution agreed at Lancaster House watered those provisions down and reserved 20 out of 100 seats for whites in the House of Assembly and 8 out of 40 seats in the Senate. The constitution prohibited Zimbabwe authorities from altering the Constitution for seven years without unanimous consent and required a three-quarters vote in Parliament for a further three years. The government amended the Constitution in 1987 to abolish the seats reserved for whites, and replace the office of Prime Minister with an executive President. In 1990, the government abolished the Senate.
Military and police[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Security Forces
Rhodesian Security Forces consisted of the Rhodesian Army, Royal Rhodesian Air Force, British South Africa Police, Rhodesian Ministry of Internal Affairs (INTAF) and the Guard Force. Despite the impact of economic and diplomatic sanctions, Rhodesia was able to develop and maintain a potent and professional military capability.[121] Time magazine reported in June 1977 that "man for man, the Rhodesian army ranks among the world's finest fighting units."[122]
Foreign relations[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2011) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Throughout the period of its Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965 to 1979), Rhodesia pursued a foreign policy of attempting to secure recognition as an independent country, and insisting that its political system would include 'gradual steps to majority rule.' Ardently anti-communist, Rhodesia tried to present itself to the West as a front-line state against communist expansion in Africa, to little avail. Rhodesia received little international recognition during its existence; recognition only occurred after elections in 1980 and a transition to majority rule.
Rhodesia wished to retain its economic prosperity and also feared communist elements in the rebel forces, and thus felt their policy of a gradual progression to black majority rule was justified. However, the international community refused to accept this rationale, believing that their policies were perpetuating racism. This attitude was part of the larger decolonisation context, during which Western powers such as the United Kingdom, France, and Belgium hastened to grant independence to their colonies in Africa.
Britain and the UDI[edit]
Rhodesia was originally a British colony. Although decolonisation in Africa had begun after World War II, it began accelerating in the early 1960s, causing Britain to negotiate independence rapidly with several of its colonies. During this period, it adopted a foreign policy called NIBMAR, or No Independence Before Majority African Rule, mandating democratic reforms that placed governance in the hands of the majority black Africans. The governing white minority of Rhodesia, led by Ian Smith, opposed the policy and its implications. On 11 November 1965, Rhodesia's minority white government made a unilateral declaration of independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom, as it became apparent that negotiations would not lead to independence under the white regime.
The United Kingdom government immediately brought in legislation (Southern Rhodesia Act 1965) which formally abolished all Rhodesian government institutions. This move made life difficult for Rhodesian citizens who wished to travel internationally as passports issued by Rhodesia's UDI administration were not recognised as valid;[123] in January 1966, the British issued a statement accepting as valid any passport issued before the declaration of independence and allowing six-month United Kingdom passports to be granted when they expired – provided that the bearer declared they did not intend to aid the UDI Rhodesian government.[124]
Until late 1969, Rhodesia still recognised Queen Elizabeth II as head of state, even though it opposed the British government itself for hindering its goals of independence. The Queen, however, refused to accept the title Queen of Rhodesia. Eventually, the Smith government abandoned attempts to remain loyal to the Crown, and in 1969, a majority of the electorate voted in referendum to declare Rhodesia a republic. They hoped that this move would facilitate recognition as an independent state by the international community, but the issues of white minority control remained and hindered this effort, and like the UDI before it, the proclamation of a republic lacked international recognition.
Sanctions[edit]
After the declaration of independence, and indeed for the entire duration of its existence, Rhodesia did not receive official recognition from any state, although it did maintain diplomatic relations with South Africa, which was then under apartheid. South Africa did not recognise Rhodesia to preserve its fragile positions with other nations, but frequently assisted the republic. Portugal maintained informal relations until the Carnation Revolution of 1974. The day following the declaration of independence, the United Nations Security Council passed a resolution (S/RES/216) calling upon all states not to accord Rhodesia recognition, and to refrain from any assistance. The Security Council also imposed selective mandatory economic sanctions, which were later made comprehensive.
Malawi,[125] Israel, South Africa, Portugal, and Iran did not comply with economic sanctions against Rhodesia.[126] The US, despite voting in favor of the sanctions at the UNSC, violated them to buy chrome ore from Rhodesia.[127] Kenneth Kaunda, president of Zambia, also accused western oil companies of violating the sanctions and selling oil to Rhodesia.[128]
International perspective[edit]
Rhodesia's Unilateral Declaration of Independence from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965 was promptly condemned by the international community. The United Nations Security Council Resolution 216 of 12 November 1965 called "upon all States not to recognise this illegal racist minority regime in Southern Rhodesia."[129]
Rhodesia campaigned for international acceptance and invoked the doctrine of non-intervention in internal affairs as justification for rebuking external criticism of its internal policies. However, the emerging doctrine of self-determination in colonial situations meant that most nations regarded Rhodesia as illegitimate.
Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia, took a pragmatic approach towards Rhodesia. Kenneth Kaunda, heavily dependent on access through Rhodesia for his nation's copper ore exports, fuel, and power imports unofficially worked with the Rhodesian government. Rhodesia still allowed Zambia to export and import its goods through its territory to Mozambique ports, despite the Zambian government's official policy of hostility and non-recognition of the post-UDI Smith Administration.
The United States, like all other Western nations, refused to recognise Rhodesia, but unlike others allowed its Consulate-General to function as a communications conduit between the American government in Washington, D.C., and the Rhodesian government in Salisbury. When Rhodesia set up an information office in Washington, D.C., OAS nations loudly protested. The US government responded by saying the Rhodesian mission and its staff had no official diplomatic status and violated no US laws.
Portugal pursued a middle path with Rhodesia. While not officially recognising Rhodesia under Ian Smith, the government of António Salazar did permit Rhodesia to establish a representative mission in Lisbon, and permitted Rhodesian exports and imports through their colony of Mozambique. The Portuguese government in power at that time, authoritarian and ardently anti-communist, gave active behind-the-scenes support in Rhodesia's fight against the guerrilla groups.
South Africa, itself under international pressure as a white minority government, pursued a policy of détente with the black African states at the time. These states wanted South Africa to pressure Ian Smith to accept a faster transition to majority rule in Rhodesia, in return for pledges of non-interference in South Africa's internal affairs. Prime Minister John Vorster, believing majority rule in Rhodesia would lead to international acceptance for South Africa, used a number of tactics to pressure Smith. The South African government held up shipments of fuel and ammunition and pulled out friendly South African forces from Rhodesia. The combined loss of Mozambique and the loss of support from South Africa dealt critical blows to the Rhodesian government.
Diplomatic relations[edit]
After the UDI, Rhodesia maintained several overseas missions, including Pretoria,[130] and until 1975, Lisbon in Portugal and Lourenço Marques (now Maputo) in Mozambique.[131]
Since 1961, Rhodesia had had an "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" with South Africa, heading a "Rhodesian Diplomatic Mission" or de facto embassy.[132] Before South Africa left the Commonwealth that year, the then Southern Rhodesia had exchanged High Commissioners with the then Union of South Africa, but following the change in status, the Republic now had a "South African Diplomatic Mission" in Salisbury.[133]
During 1965, the government of Rhodesia made moves to establish a mission in Lisbon separate from the British Embassy, with its own accredited representative, having previously been able to establish its own consulate in Lourenço Marques, capital of Portuguese Mozambique.[134] This prompted protests from the British government, which was determined that the representative, Harry Reedman, should be a nominal member of the British Ambassador's staff.[135] For their part, the Portuguese authorities sought a compromise whereby they would accept Reedman as an independent representative but deny him diplomatic status.[136]
The Rhodesian Information Office in Washington remained open following UDI, but its director, Ken Towsey, and his staff were deprived of their diplomatic status.[137] Previously, there had been a "Minister for Rhodesian Affairs" operating under the aegis of the British Embassy in Washington,[138] as well representatives in Tokyo and Bonn.[139] Following the country's independence as Zimbabwe, Towsey became chargé d'affaires at the new Embassy.[140]
The High Commission in London, known as Rhodesia House, continued to function until it was closed in 1969 following the decision by white Rhodesians in a referendum to make the country a republic, along with the "British Residual Mission" in Salisbury.[141] Prior to its closure, the mission flew the newly adopted Flag of Rhodesia, considered illegal by the Foreign Office, prompting calls by Labour MP Willie Hamilton for its removal.[142]
In Australia, the federal government in Canberra sought to close the Rhodesian Information Centre in Sydney,[143] but it remained open, operating under the jurisdiction of the state of New South Wales.[144] In 1973, the Labor government of Gough Whitlam cut post and telephone links to the Centre, but this was ruled illegal by the High Court.[145] An office was also established in Paris, but this was closed down by the French government in 1977.[146]
Similarly, the United States recalled its consul-general from Salisbury, and reduced consular staff,[147] but did not move to close its consulate until the declaration of a republic in 1970.[148] South Africa, however, retained its "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" after UDI,[149] which allowed it to continue to recognise British sovereignty as well as to deal with the de facto authority of the government of Ian Smith.[150]
The South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury became the only such mission remaining in the country after 1975,[151] when Portugal downgraded its mission to consul level,[152] having recalled its consul-general in Salisbury in May 1970.[153] After Zimbabwe's independence, the new government closed its missions in Pretoria and Cape Town, only maintaining a trade mission in Johannesburg,[154] while the South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury was also closed.[155]
Results[edit]
Continuing civil war and a lack of international support eventually led the Rhodesian government to submit to an agreement with the UK in 1979. This led to internationally supervised elections, won by Zimbabwe African National Union - Patriotic Front and Robert Mugabe, establishing the internationally recognised Zimbabwe.
Legacy[edit]
In the ten years after independence, around 60% of the white population of Zimbabwe emigrated, most to South Africa and to other mainly white, English speaking countries where they formed expatriate communities. Politically within Zimbabwe, the consolidation of power by Robert Mugabe continued through the 1980s. Following amendments to the country's constitution in 1987, parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished, and an executive presidency was created, held by Mugabe. Many expatriates and some of the whites who stayed in Zimbabwe became deeply nostalgic for Rhodesia. These individuals are known as "Rhodies." Native whites who are more accepting of the new order are known as "Zimbos."
While as Rhodesia, the country was once considered the breadbasket of Africa. Today, Zimbabwe is a net importer of foodstuffs, with the European Union and United States providing emergency food relief as humanitarian aid on a regular basis.[156] The nation has suffered profound economic and social decline in the past twenty years. Recently the agriculture sector has started to do well since the availability of expertise and machines has improved supported mainly by China.[157][158]
Zimbabwe also suffered from a crippling inflation rate, as the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe had a policy of printing money to satisfy government debts, which introduces excessive currency into the economic system which led to the demise of the local currency. This policy caused the inflation rate to soar from 32% in 1998 (considered extremely high by most economic standards) to an astonishing 11,200,000% by 2007. Monetary aid by the International Monetary Fund has been suspended due to the Zimbabwe government's defaulting on past loans, inability to stabilise its own economy, and its inability to stem corruption and advance human rights.[156] In 2009, Zimbabwe abandoned its currency, relying instead on foreign currencies such as the South African rand, the US dollar, the Botswana pula, the euro and the British pound, among others.[159]
In 2008 elections, Mugabe garnered 41%, Simba Makoni 10% and Morgan Tsvangirai 48% of the votes cast for president forcing a runoff election called by the Zimbabwe Electoral Commission (ZEC). In the months leading to the run-off, instances of extreme violence between the two major parties (ZANU PF and MDC) led Tsvangirai to withdraw from the election. In February 2009, a power-sharing accord was reached which resulted in the Zimbabwe Government of National Unity of 2009. The accord was, essentially, to create the position of "Prime Minister" for Tsvangirai, who served in that role from 2009 to 2013. Mugabe retained the title of President.
Rhodesian media[edit]
The main newspapers were the Rhodesia Herald in Salisbury and The Chronicle in Bulawayo. Following UDI, in 1976, the state-run Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation (RBC) took over the privately owned Rhodesian Television (RTV) service, in which it had previously acquired a 51 per cent stake.[160] Among the news magazines published in Rhodesia under UDI were the Illustrated Life Rhodesia, while The Valiant Years by Beryl Salt told the history of Rhodesia from 1890 to 1978 entirely through the medium of facsimile reproduction of articles and headlines from Rhodesian newspapers.[161]
References[edit]


^ a b Rowland, J. Reid. "Constitutional History of Rhodesia: An outline".  in Berlyn, Phillippa (April 1978). The Quiet Man: A Biography of the Hon. Ian Douglas Smith. Salisbury: M. O. Collins. pp. 240–256. OCLC 4282978. 
^

Palley, Claire (1966). The Constitutional History and Law of Southern Rhodesia 1888–1965, with Special Reference to Imperial Control (First ed.). Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 742–743. OCLC 406157. 


^ a b c d Duignan, Peter (1986), Politics and Government in African States 1960–1985, Croom Helm Ltd, ISBN 0-7099-1475-X 
^ Volume V: Africa, Australia, and Southern Islands. Lands and Peoples: The World in Color. The Grolier Society of Canada Ltd 1955. Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 54-11291. p 19-109.
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t Nelson, Harold (1983), Zimbabwe: a country study, The American University (Washington, D.C.), ISBN 0160015987 
^ "Rhodesia – Mzilikaze to Smith". Rhodesia.nl. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "The Cabinet Papers | Rhodesia and the Central African Federation". Nationalarchives.gov.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "History of Zimbabwe". Historyworld.net. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645 - Authority for date of annexation having been 12 September 1923
^ a b Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia by Vera Gowlland-Debbas
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645
^ Southern Rhodesia Constitution Letters Patent 1923
^ "Parliament". Rhodesia.me.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Full text of "Southern Rhodesia 1890–1950; A Record of Sixty Years Progress"". Archive.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbambwe". Sapst.org. 22 December 1987. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Weitzer, Ronald. Transforming Settler States: Communal Conflict and Internal Security in Northern Ireland and Zimbabwe. pp. 1–206. 
^ afrikantraveler (16 May 2012). "Rhodesia: A Failed Attempt to Maintain Racism into the 21st Century". The African File. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Hastings Kamuzu Banda Biography – Detoured on Road to Become a Doctor, Pursued Degrees with Diligence, Spoke Out Against Racism – JRank Articles". Biography.jrank.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Novak, Andrew. "Academia.edu | Sport and Racial Discrimination in Colonial Zimbabwe: A Reanalysis | Andrew Novak". Independent.academia.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Wills, A.J. (1967). "Three Territories". An Introduction to the History of Central Africa (2nd ed.). Durban: Oxford University Press. p. Appendix IV. ISBN 0-620-06410-2. Retrieved 10 September 2012. 
^ "Database – Uppsala Conflict Data Program". UCDP. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "On Board the Tiger". Rhodesia.nl. 9 October 1968. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA PSYOP 1965". Psywarrior.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A brief history of Zimbabwe". Zimembassy.se. 18 April 1980. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Smith, Ian (1997). The Great Betrayal. London: Blake Publishing Ltd. pp. 74–256. ISBN 1-85782-176-9. 
^ "Chronology: Rhodesia UDI: Road to Settlement" (PDF). Lse.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Principled failure: British policy toward Rhodesia, 1971–72 | Assorted Materials: Johnny Ryan". Johnnyryan.wordpress.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA: DEFINITION OF THE FIVE PRINCIPLES (Hansard, 16 December 1970)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 16 December 1970. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Chronology for Europeans in Zimbabwe". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A Brief History of Zimbabwe – Part 1: Early Kingdoms to UDI". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cowell, Alan (21 November 2007). "Ian Smith, Defiant Symbol of White Rule in Africa, Is Dead at 88". The New York Times. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbabwe (country)". Talktalk.co.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Policy For Rhodesia from theTribune Magazine Archive". Archive.tribunemagazine.co.uk. 23 September 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "White referendum in Southern Rhodesia is overwhelmingly in support of Ian Smith's proposal for independence. | South African History Online". Sahistory.org.za. 6 November 1964. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "British South Rhodesia (1964–1980)". Uca.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Elections in Zimbabwe". Africanelections.tripod.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Lunch with Harold Wilson | Pop Theory". Clivebarnett.wordpress.com. 12 September 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia: The Last Thread". TIME. 30 December 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Chris McGreal (13 April 2008). "There are many villains to blame for Zimbabwe's decade of horror | World news | The Observer". London: Guardian. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Mungazi, Dickson. Last Defenders of the Laager: Ian D. Smith and F.W. de Klerk. pp. 1–288. 
^ a b c d Raftopolous, Brian. Becoming Zimbabwe: A History from the pre-colonial period to 2008. pp. 1–298. 
^ a b c d e f g h Raeburn, Michael. We are everywhere: Narratives from Rhodesian guerillas. pp. 1–209. 
^ "Issue 6, Spring 2011". Genocidepreventionnow.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA (Hansard, 21 January 1969)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 21 January 1969. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Question of Southern Rhodesia". undocs.org. United Nations. 12 October 1965. A/RES/2012(XX). Retrieved 17 March 2017. 
^ "Southern Times-Learning From Rhodesia". Southerntimesafrica.com. 12 November 1965. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Resolution 221 (1966) of 9 April 1966". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Gowlland-Debbas, Vera (1990), Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers, ISBN 0-7923-0811-5 
^ "The Secretary of State, Washington" (PDF). Gwu.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Okoth, Assa (2006), A History of Africa: Volume 2: 1915–1995, East African Educational Publishers Ltd, ISBN 9966-25-358-0 
^ "When Sanctions Worked: The Case of Rhodesia Reexamined". Africafocus.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia Unilateral Declaration of Independence 1965 – Online exhibition". Commonwealth.sas.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Meredith, Martin. The Past is Another Country. p. 218. 
^ "1970:Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". BBC News. 2 March 1970. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "Chemistry – Ian Smith". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Chemistry – Humphrey Gibbs". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Herald, Salisbury, 13 to 20 September 1968
^ "Stella Madzimbamuto (Appellant) v Desmond William Lardner Burke and Frederick Phillip George (Respondents)" (PDF). Jurisafrica.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "In re James (an insolvent)". Uniset.ca. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Lauterpacht, Elihu. International Law Reports (Volume 39). pp. 1–78. 
^ http://archive.lib.msu.edu/DMC/African%20Journals/pdfs/Journal%20of%20the%20University%20of%20Zimbabwe/vol3n1/juz003001001.pdf
^ "HMS Tiger". Barrylockyer.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Smock, David R. "The Forgotten Rhodesians". Foreign Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cockram, B. "Rhodesia Rides A Tiger" (PDF). South African Institute of International Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "2 March 1970 – Rhodesia Declared a Republic". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "BBC ON THIS DAY - 2 - 1970: Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". bbc.co.uk. 
^ a b c Clayton, Anthony. Frontiersmen: Warfare in Africa since 1950. pp. 1–260. 
^ Dr. Sue Onslow. "UDI: 40 Years On". LSE. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ Michael Hartnack (2005). "40 years in wilderness after UDI declaration". The Herald. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "What's Wrong With Trade Sanctions". Cato Institute. 23 December 1985. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Brownell, Josiah. Collapse of Rhodesia: Population Demographics and the Politics of Race. pp. 1–255. 
^ "Zimbabwe Rejects Sellout!" (PDF). American Committee on Africa. 1 February 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Zvobgo, Chengetai. A History of Zimbabwe, 1890–2000 and Postscript, Zimbabwe, 2001–2008. pp. 1–410. 
^ "1972: Rhodesia's former leader arrested". BBC. 18 January 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ "Insurgency in Rhodesia, 1957–1973: An Account and Assessment". International Institute for Strategic Studies. 1973. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Shamuyarira, Nathan. Crisis in Rhodesia. pp. 202–203. 
^ Palm Beach Post, Miami, 26 March 1959
^ "The Rhodesian Agreement: Aspects and Prospects". South African Institute of International Affairs. 1978. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Moorcraft and McLaughlin, Peter, Paul (2008). The Rhodesian War: A Military History. pp. 1–200. 
^ "Rhodesian Air Force Anti Terrorist Operations (COINOPS)". rhodesianforces.org. 2012. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Spring, William (1986). The Long Fields: Zimbabwe Since Independence. p. 38. 
^ a b "APF newsletter, "Appraisal of Rhodesia in 1975"". Archived from the original on 31 May 2009. 
^ Ian Beckett. "Report on Bush War, paragraph 10". 
^ The Guardian, 21 April 2000 British Multimillionaire bankrolls Mugabe party
^ Brookings Institution: p156, study on conflict resolution
^ "Peace talks fail". BBC news. 26 August 1975. Retrieved 27 November 2007. 
^ "Rhodesia: A Strike At the Lifeline". Rand Daily Mail via TIME magazine. 1976. p. 2. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ "A Strike at the Lifeline". TIME magazine. 1976. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ APF Newsletter, 1976 :Rhodesia's "Protected" Blacks
^ "Operation Agila, "The British Empire's Last Sunset"". NZ History. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ a b "BBC ON THIS DAY | 24 | 1976: White rule in Rhodesia to end". BBC News. 24 September 1976. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ APF newsletter, 1976: appraisal of Rhodesia in 1976
^ "Cold War Studies Project". lse.ac.uk. 
^ Time magazine, 7 August 1978: Rhodesia faces collapse
^ Time magazine, 1 August 1978: taking the chicken run
^ Major Charles Lohman and Major Robert MacPherson. ""Rhodesia: Tactical Victory, Strategic Defeat" WAR SINCE 1945 SEMINAR AND SYMPOSIUM, US Marine Corps Command and Staff College, June 1983 – See Chapter 3". Scribd.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Worldwide:"PK"
^ The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p 291
^ Newsnet report : saboteurs hit Zimbabwean military, partisan comment
^ Time magazine, October 1977 : The Land of Opportunity
^ a b c d Glenn Cross, "Dirty War: Rhodesia and Chemical Biological Warfare, 1975-1980," Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, 2017
^ Ed Bird. Special Branch War: Slaughter in the Rhodesian Bush Southern Ndebele land, 1976-1980. Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, Ltd. 2014.
^ Jim Parker, "Assignment Selous Scouts: The Inside Story of a Rhodesian Special Branch Officer". Johannesburg, South Africa: Galago Press, 2006
^ Chandré Gould and Peter Folb. "Project Coast: Apartheid’s Chemical and Biological Warfare Programme". Geneva: United Nations Institute for Disarmament Research, 2002.
^ a b Southern African News Feature: the plague wars
^ The Guardian, 15 July 2003: obituary of sixth Marquess of Salisbury
^ Nick Downie report: caution, partisan comment
^ 2nd Lt CJE Vincent BCR who was present when Lord Cecil was killed
^ The Viscount Disasters – The Story
^ The Atlantic Monthly : The Fragility of Domestic Energy, see page 5
^ Selby thesis: ZWNEWS.com, p 88
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War, para 7.
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War.
^ BBC "On this day" report :1 June 1979.
^ Senate Votes Down A Move To Preserve Rhodesia Sanctions; Arms-Bill Veto Threatened White House Says 52-to-41 Margin Shows President Has Support to Prevent an Override, 13 June 1979. The New York Times.
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Allport, R. "Operation Quartz – Rhodesia 1980" (PDF). memoriesofrhodesia.com. 
^ Video on YouTube
^ "Ian Smith's farm seized in Zimbabwe as Robert Mugabe eyes election". BBC News. 7 December 2012. 
^ Rogers 1998, p. 41
^ "The World: The Military: A Mission Impossible". Time. New York. 13 June 1977. Retrieved 3 December 2011. 
^ The Southern Rhodesia (Property in Passports) Order 1965 provided that they were the property of the British government, allowing them to be impounded if presented by anyone arriving at a port of entry. See Hansard, HC 5ser vol 721 col 696.
^ The statement is printed in Hansard HC 5ser vol 723 col 4.
^ http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,836951,00.html
^ http://www.southafricaproject.info/rhodesia_and_south_africa.html
^ https://library.cqpress.com/cqalmanac/document.php?id=cqal75-1214210
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1978/09/22/zambian-to-meet-with-callaghan-on-un-oil-sanction-violations/bdd35f61-e9cb-463f-a319-38981df92cf3/
^ Wikisource:United Nations Security Council Resolution 216
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 52
^ Rhodesians to quit Lisbon, Glasgow Herald, 1 May 1975, page 4
^ Report of the Secretary for Information, Immigration, and Tourism
^ Diplomacy with a Difference: the Commonwealth Office of High Commissioner, 1880-2006, Lorna Lloyd, BRILL, 2007, page 240
^ John Arthur KINSEY, Esq., Consul-General for the Federation at Lourenco Marques, London Gazette, 5th June 1959
^ Rhodesia's Man in Lisbon: Objective Said To Be Achieved, The Glasgow Herald, 22 September 1965. page 9
^ International Diplomacy and Colonial Retreat, Kent Fedorowich, Martin Thomas Routledge, 2013, page 186
^ Goldberg Back British Stand In U.N. Session,Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, November 13, 1965
^ Isolated States: A Comparative Analysis, Deon Geldenhuys, Cambridge University Press, 1990, page 62
^ Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Vera Gowlland-Debbas, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 1990
^ Rhodesia's Lobbyist Back for Mugabe, The Washington Post, June 26, 1980
^ RHODESIA, Hansard, HC Deb 24 June 1969 vol 785 cc1218-27
^ M.P. CALLS FOR REMOVAL OF RHODESIAN FLAG IN STRAND, The Glasgow Herald, January 4, 1969, page 1
^ Rhodesia Office Will Be Closed, The Age, April 3, 1972
^ The Nationals: The Progressive, Country, and National Party in New South Wales 1919-2006, Paul Davey, Federation Press, 2006 page 223
^ [rathall+rhodesia++Minister+of+Finance+and+of+Posts+and+ Telecommunications&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=whitlam Africa Contemporary Record: Annual Survey and Documents, Volume 6], Colin Legum, Africana Publishing Company, 1974
^ US Not Closing Rhodesian Office, The Lewiston Daily Sun, August 27, 1977, page 8
^ US To Restrict Sales To Rhodesia, Reading Eagle, December 12, 1965
^ The Superpowers and Africa: The Constraints of a Rivalry, 1960-1990, Zaki Laïdi University of Chicago Press, 1990, page 55
^ Foreign Affairs for New States: Some Questions of Credentials, Peter John Boyce, University of Queensland Press, January 1977, page 13
^ Confrontation and Accommodation in Southern Africa: The Limits of Independence, Kenneth W. Grundy, University of California Press, 1973, page 257
^ Native Vs. Settler: Ethnic Conflict in Israel/Palestine, Northern Ireland, and South Africa, Thomas G. Mitchell Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000, page 141
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 77
^ Portugal Severs Key Link With Rhodesia, Sarasota Herald-Tribune, April 27, 1970
^ Coming To Terms: Zimbabwe in the International Arena, Richard Schwartz I.B.Tauris, 2001, page 68
^ Salisbury whites queue up to flee, The Age, July 8, 1980
^ a b "The World Factbook". cia.gov. 
^ Published in 2010, research by Ian Scoones on land reform in Masvingo, Zimbabwe.
^ GDP percentage growth 2010 and Tobabcco auctions 2010
^ BBC News, 29 January 2009: Zimbabwe abandons its currency
^ Broadcasting: An Introduction, John R. Bittner, Prentice-Hall International, 1980, page 263
^ Salt, Beryl (1978). The Valiant Years. 


External links[edit]





This article's use of external links may not follow Wikipedia's policies or guidelines. Please improve this article by removing excessive or inappropriate external links, and converting useful links where appropriate into footnote references. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Find more aboutRhodesiaat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Rhodesian Bush War historical research / discussion forum
Rhodesian Bush War Photographs




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rhodesia.



The Viscount disasters of 1978 and 1979
Ironing the lawn in Salisbury – the last days of Rhodesia (The Guardian)
Ian Beckett, an account of the Bush War (in 2 parts)
Rhodesian and South African Military History – An extensive collection of histories and analysis of Rhodesian and South African military operations, to the early 1980s
Window on Rhodesia- An archive of the history and life of Rhodesia.
1975 BBC report on the failure of negotiations between the Rhodesian government and the black nationalists
The Brookings Institution : Managing Ethnic Conflict in Africa – Rhodesia/Zimbabwe
Selby, Angus (2006) "Commercial Farmers and the State: Interest Group Politics and Land Reform in Zimbabwe, 1890–2005", PhD Thesis, Oxford University
Rhodesia Roll of Honour – Those who died in defence of UDI
Constitution of Rhodesia
Rhodesian aviation and comment

Audio and video[edit]

Audio of Ian Smith's radio address announcing UDI
2 years of independence, 1967 Rhodesian MoI film (7 mins) on YouTube
Rhodesia to Zimbabwe, collection of film clips (6 mins) on YouTube
Songs of UDI, 3 songs from 1977 (9 mins) on YouTube







v
t
e


Southern Rhodesia / Rhodesia articles




1890–1923: Company rule; 1923–80: Southern Rhodesia; 1953–63: Federation; 1965–79: Rhodesia under UDI; 1979: Zimbabwe Rhodesia under UDI; 1980–present: Zimbabwe



History



Pre-colonial
Rudd Concession
Company rule

Pioneer Column
First Matabele War
Shangani Patrol
Second Matabele War
Second Boer War
First World War


Southern Rhodesia

colonial history
Second World War
Malayan Emergency involvement
Federation


Unilateral Declaration of Independence

Bush War
1975 Victoria Falls Conference
1976 Geneva Conference
Internal Settlement
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
Lancaster House Agreement


Zimbabwe





Geography







Chimanimani Mountains
Cities and towns
Limpopo River
Zambezi River








Politics







Constitutional history
Districts
Elections
Governor
Mission in Lisbon
Municipalities
Police
Political parties
Central Africa Party
Confederate Party
Dominion Party
Federal Party
Responsible Government Association (RGA)
Rhodesian Action Party (RAP)
Rhodesian Front (RF)
Rhodesia Labour Party (RLP)
Southern Rhodesia African National Congress (SRANC)
Southern Rhodesia Communist Party (SRCP)
Southern Rhodesia Liberal Party (SRLP)
United Federal Party (UFP)
United National Federal Party (UNFP)
United Rhodesia Party
President
Prime Minister
Provinces
Security Forces








Economy







Dollar (currency from 1970)
Pound (currency to 1970)
Reserve Bank
Stock Exchange
Telecommunications
Tourism
Transportation








Society







List of Rhodesians
Public holidays
Rhodesiana





Demographics




Ethnic groups
(diaspora)




Black



Hungwe
Kunda
Lemba
Manyika
Ndebele
Rusape Jews
Shona
Tokaleya
Tonga





White



Afrikaners
British
Greeks
Jews
"Rhodies"





Others



Coloureds (Goffals)
Indians








Languages



Afrikaans
English (South African)
Shona
Sindebele








Symbols



Animal
Anthem
Coat of arms
Emblem
Flags

national


Flower











Category
Portal












v
t
e


Commonwealth realms and dominions



Current



Antigua and Barbuda (monarchy)
Australia (monarchy)
Bahamas (monarchy)
Barbados (monarchy)
Belize (monarchy)
Canada (monarchy)
Grenada (monarchy)
Jamaica (monarchy)
Realm of New Zealand

Cook Islands
New Zealand
Niue


Papua New Guinea (monarchy)
Saint Kitts and Nevis (monarchy)
Saint Lucia (monarchy)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines (monarchy)
Solomon Islands (monarchy)
Tuvalu (monarchy)
United Kingdom (monarchy)





Former



Ceylon
Fiji (monarchy)
The Gambia
Ghana
Guyana
India1
Ireland1 (monarchy)
Kenya
Malawi
Malta
Mauritius
Newfoundland2
Nigeria
Pakistan
Rhodesia3
Sierra Leone
South Africa (monarchy)
Tanganyika
Trinidad and Tobago
Uganda








1 Dominion, became republic before adoption of the term "realm"
2 Dominion, never ratified Statute of Westminster 1931, London-based external government 1934–1949, annexed by Canada in 1949
3 Rhodesia unilaterally declared independence as a realm in 1965, but this was not recognised internationally. Declared itself a republic in 1970.











 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rhodesia&oldid=790867687"					
Categories: Former countries in AfricaStates and territories established in 1965States and territories disestablished in 1979RhodesiaBritish colonisation in AfricaBritish EmpireFormer British colonies and protectorates in AfricaFormer polities of the Cold WarFormer republicsFormer territorial entities in AfricaFormer unrecognized countriesHistory of RhodesiaHistory of ZimbabweOligarchy1965 establishments in Africa1979 disestablishments in Africa1965 establishments in Rhodesia1970s disestablishments in Rhodesia1965 establishments in the British Empire1979 disestablishments in the United KingdomWhite supremacy in AfricaEnglish-speaking countries and territoriesHidden categories: EngvarB from August 2014Use dmy dates from August 2014Use South African English from April 2016All Wikipedia articles written in South African EnglishArticles containing Latin-language textFormer country articles requiring maintenancePages using infobox former country with unknown parametersArticles containing Shona-language textAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2017Articles needing additional references from February 2011All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia external links cleanup from October 2012Wikipedia spam cleanup from October 2012Zimbabwe articles missing geocoordinate dataAll articles needing coordinates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةБеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGalego한국어Bahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიLadinoLatviešuLigureLumbaartМакедонскиमराठीمازِرونیBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 16:58.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rhodesia - Wikipedia






















 






Rhodesia

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Rhodesian)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the unrecognised state of Rhodesia. For the British colony, see Southern Rhodesia. For other uses, see Rhodesia (disambiguation).


Rhodesia


Unrecognised state






1965–1979










Flag (1968)



Coat of arms





Motto
Sit Nomine Digna (Latin)
"May she be worthy of the name"


Anthem
"Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia" (1974–1979)








Royal anthem
"God Save the Queen" (1965–1970)























Capital
Salisbury


Languages
English (official)
Afrikaans, Shona and Ndebele widely spoken


Government
Constitutional monarchy (1965–70)
Parliamentary republic (1970–79)


Head of State



 • 
Monarch
1965–1970

Elizabeth II (Unrecognised by Elizabeth II)


 • 
President
1970–1975

Clifford Dupont (First)


 • 
1979
Henry Everard (Acting president) (Last)


Prime Minister



 • 
1965–1979
Ian Smith


Legislature
Parliament


 • 
Upper house
Senate


 • 
Lower house
House of Assembly


Historical era
Cold War


 • 
Independence (UDI)
11 November 1965


 • 
Republic declared
2 March 1970


 • 
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
1 June 1979


 • 
Republic of Zimbabwe
18 April 1980


Area


 • 
1978
390,580 km2 (150,800 sq mi)


Population


 • 
1978 est.
6,930,000 


     Density
18/km2 (46/sq mi)


Currency
Rhodesian pound (1965–1970)
Rhodesian dollar (1970–1979)







Preceded by
Succeeded by






Southern Rhodesia






Zimbabwe Rhodesia









Today part of
 Zimbabwe


a. The government recognised Queen Elizabeth II as the official Head of State from 1965 to 1970. The highest official of Rhodesia held the title "Officer Administering the Government" (OAtG) as he acted in lieu of the official Governor, who remained at his post but was ignored. After Rhodesia became a republic in March 1970, the President replaced the OAtG as the highest official and the Governor returned to London.


Rhodesia (/roʊˈdiːʒə/), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe. With its capital in Salisbury (now Harare), Rhodesia was considered a de facto successor state to the former British colony of Southern Rhodesia (which had achieved responsible government in 1923).
During an effort to delay an immediate transition to black majority rule, Rhodesia's predominantly white government issued its own Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965. The UDI administration initially sought recognition as an autonomous realm within the Commonwealth of Nations, but reconstituted itself as a republic in 1970.
Following a brutal guerrilla war fought with two African nationalist organisations (Robert Mugabe's ZANU and Joshua Nkomo's ZAPU), Rhodesian premier Ian Smith conceded to bi-racial democracy in 1978. However, a provisional government subsequently headed by Smith and his moderate colleague Abel Muzorewa failed in appeasing international critics or halting the bloodshed. By December 1979, Muzorewa had replaced Smith as Prime Minister and secured an agreement with the militant nationalists, allowing Rhodesia to briefly revert to colonial status pending elections under a universal franchise. It finally achieved internationally recognised independence in April 1980; the nation was concurrently renamed the Republic of Zimbabwe.
A wholly landlocked area, Rhodesia was bordered by South Africa to the south, Bechuanaland (later Botswana) to the southwest, Zambia to the northwest, and Mozambique (a Portuguese province until 1975) to the east. The state was named after Cecil Rhodes, whose British South Africa Company acquired the land in the late 19th century.



Contents


1 Nomenclature
2 History

2.1 Background
2.2 Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)

2.2.1 Impact of UDI


2.3 The Bush War
2.4 End of the Bush War

2.4.1 Late 1970s
2.4.2 Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas
2.4.3 Security Situation Erodes Rapidly


2.5 End of UDI (1979)
2.6 Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)


3 Politics
4 Military and police
5 Foreign relations

5.1 Britain and the UDI
5.2 Sanctions
5.3 International perspective
5.4 Diplomatic relations
5.5 Results


6 Legacy

6.1 Rhodesian media


7 References
8 External links

8.1 Audio and video





Nomenclature[edit]
The official name of the country, according to the constitution adopted concurrently with the Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) in 1965, was Rhodesia. This was not the case under British law, however, which considered the territory's legal name to be Southern Rhodesia, the name given to the country in 1898 during the British South Africa Company's administration of the Rhodesias, and retained by the self-governing colony of Southern Rhodesia after the end of Company rule in 1923.[1]
This naming dispute dated back to October 1964, when Northern Rhodesia became independent from Britain and concurrently changed its name to Zambia. The Southern Rhodesian colonial government in Salisbury felt that in the absence of a "Northern" Rhodesia, the continued use of "Southern" was superfluous. It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government. Salisbury went on using the shortened name in an official manner nevertheless,[2] while the British government continued referring to the country as Southern Rhodesia. This situation continued throughout the UDI period.[1] The shortened name was used by many people including the British government in the House of Commons.
The British government maintained this stance regarding the June–December 1979 successor state of Zimbabwe Rhodesia, and when Zimbabwe Rhodesia returned to colonial status from December 1979 to April 1980, it was as "Southern Rhodesia". Southern Rhodesia subsequently gained international recognition of its independence in April 1980, when it became the Republic of Zimbabwe.
History[edit]



Part of a series on the



History of Zimbabwe





Ancient history


Mapungubwe Kingdom
c.1075–1220


Zimbabwe Kingdom
c.1220–1450


Mutapa Kingdom
c.1450–1760


Torwa dynasty
c.1450–1683





White settlement pre-1923


Rozwi Empire
c.1684–1834


Matabeleland
1838–1894


Rudd Concession
1888


BSA Company rule
1890–1923


First Matabele War
1893–1894


Second Matabele War
1896–1897


World War I involvement
1914–1918


Colony of Southern Rhodesia
1923–1980


World War II involvement
1939–1945


Malayan Emergency
involvement
1948–1960


Federation with Northern
Rhodesia and Nyasaland
1953–1963


Rhodesian Bush War
1964–1979



Unilateral Declaration of
Independence (UDI)

1965


Rhodesia under UDI
1965–1979


Zimbabwe-Rhodesia
June–Dec 1979



Lancaster House Agreement

Dec 1979


British Dependency
1979–1980


Zimbabwe
1980–present


Gukurahundi
1982–1987


Second Congo War
1998–2003





 Zimbabwe portal





v
t
e





Main article: History of Rhodesia
Background[edit]
Until after World War II, the landlocked British possession of Southern Rhodesia was not developed as an indigenous African territory, but rather as a unique state which reflected its multiracial character.[3] This situation certainly made it very different from other lands which existed under colonial rule, as many Europeans had arrived to make permanent homes, populating the towns as traders or settling to farm the most productive soils.[4][5] In 1922, faced with the decision to join the Union of South Africa as a fifth province or accept nearly full internal autonomy, the electorate cast its vote against South African integration.[6][7][8]
In view of the outcome of the referendum, the territory was annexed by the United Kingdom on 12 September 1923.[9][10][11][12] Shortly after annexation, on 1 October 1923, the first constitution for the new Colony of Southern Rhodesia came into force.[11][13] Under this constitution, Southern Rhodesia was given the right to elect its own thirty-member legislature, premier, and cabinet—although the British Crown retained a formal veto over measures affecting natives and dominated foreign policy.[14][15][16]
The Rhodesian authorities provided compensation when the government nationalised enterprises such as the country's railroads, consistently refused to radically alleviate unemployment, and shied from filling civil service posts with partisan appointees. By colonial standards, public services were well-organised and praised for their efficiency.[3]
In 1953, Southern Rhodesia merged with the two other British Central African states to form the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland – a loose association that placed defence and economic direction under a central government but left many domestic affairs under the control of its constituent territories.[17] As it began to appear that decolonisation was inevitable and indigenous black populations were pressing heavily for change,[3] the federation was dissolved in 1963.[18][19][20]

Numbers of white and black inhabitants before and during the Central African Federation[21]

Year
Southern Rhodesia
Northern Rhodesia
Nyasaland
Total


White
Black
White
Black
White
Black
White
Black


1927
38,200 (3.98%)
922,000 (96.02%)
4,000 (0.4%)
1,000,000 (99.6%)
1,700 (0.13%)
1,350,000 (99.87%)
43,900 (1.32%)
3,272,000 (98.68%)


1946
80,500 (4.79%)
1,600,000 (95.21%)
21,919 (1.32%)
1,634,980 (97.68%)
2,300 (0.10%)
2,340,000 (99.90%)
104,719 (1.84%)
5,574,980 (98.16%)


1955
150,000 (5.88%)
2,400,000 (94.12%)
65,000 (3.02%)
2,085,000 (96.98%)
6,300 (0.25%)
2,550,000 (99.75%)
221,300 (3.05%)
7,035,000 (96.95%)


1960
223,000 (7.30%)
2,830,000 (92.70%)
76,000 (3.14%)
2,340,000 (96.85%)
9,300 (0.33%)
2,810,000 (99.66%)
308,300 (3.72%)
7,980,000 (96.28%)


Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)[edit]
Although prepared to grant formal independence to Southern Rhodesia (now Rhodesia), the British government had adopted a policy of no independence before majority rule, dictating that colonies with a substantial population of European settlers would not receive independence except under conditions of majority rule.[22][23][24] Rhodesian colonials initially balked at the suggestion; some felt they had a right to absolute political control, at least for the time being, despite their relatively small numbers.[17][25] The authorities were also disturbed by the post-independence chaos which was plaguing other African nations at the time.[26] However, once Rhodesia had been introduced as a topic for discussion in international bodies, extension of the status quo became a matter of concern to the world community and a serious embarrassment to the United Kingdom.[5]
After the federal break-up in 1963, then-Prime Minister Alec Douglas-Home insisted that preconditions on independence talks hinge on what he termed the "five principles" – unimpeded progress to majority rule, assurance against any future legislation decidedly detrimental to black interests, "improvement in the political status" of local Africans, moves towards ending racial discrimination, and agreement on a settlement which could be "acceptable to the whole population".[27][28][29][30] Harold Wilson and his incoming Labour government took an even harder line on demanding that these points be legitimately addressed before an independence agenda could be set.[5]
By 1964, growing dissatisfaction with the ongoing negotiations ousted Salisbury's incumbent Winston Field, replacing him with Ian Smith, deputy chairman of the conservative Rhodesian Front party.[31][32][33] Smith, the colony's first Rhodesian-born leader, soon came to personify resistance to liberals in British government and those agitating for change at home.[5] He ruled out acceptance for all five of the proposed principles as they stood,[34] implying instead that Rhodesia was already legally entitled to independence—a claim which was overwhelmingly endorsed by registered voters in a referendum.[35][36][37]
Emboldened by the results of this referendum and the subsequent general election, Rhodesia now threatened to assume her own sovereignty without British consent. Harold Wilson countered by warning that such an irregular procedure would be considered treasonous, although he specifically rejected using armed force against the English "kith and kin" in Africa.[38][39][40] Wilson's refusal to consider a military option encouraged Smith to proceed with his plans. Talks quickly broke down, and final efforts in October to achieve a settlement floundered; the Rhodesian Front remained unwilling to accept what were regarded as unacceptably drastic terms and the British would settle for nothing less – it was a formula doomed to failure.[5]




Ian Smith signs the Unilateral Declaration of Independence.



The mantle of the pioneers has fallen on our shoulders to sustain civilisation in a primitive country.
— Ian Smith, 11 November 1965, upon the announcement of UDI[41]

On 11 November 1965, following a brief but solemn consensus, Rhodesia's leading statesmen issued their country's unilateral declaration of independence (UDI).[3][42][43] This was immediately denounced as an "act of rebellion against the Crown" in the United Kingdom, and Wilson promised that the illegal action would be short-lived.[44][45] However, few seemed to initially realise that Rhodesia was no longer within the Commonwealth's direct sphere of influence and British rule was now a constitutional fiction; Salisbury remained virtually immune to credible metropolitan leverage.[17]
On 12 October 1965, the United Nations General Assembly had noted the repeated threats of the Rhodesian authorities "to declare unilaterally the independence of Southern Rhodesia, in order to perpetuate minority rule", and called upon Wilson to use all means at his disposal (including military force) to prevent the Rhodesian Front from asserting independence.[46] After UDI was proclaimed, UN officials branded Ian Smith's government as an "illegal racist minority regime"[47] and called on member states to sever economic ties with Rhodesia, recommending sanctions on petroleum products and military hardware.[5] In December 1966, these measures became mandatory, extending to bar the purchase of Rhodesian tobacco, chrome, copper, asbestos, sugar, meat, and hides.[5]
Britain, having already adopted extensive sanctions of its own, dispatched a Royal Navy squadron to monitor oil deliveries in the port of Beira in Mozambique, from which a strategic pipeline ran to Umtali in Rhodesia. The warships were to deter "by force, if necessary, vessels reasonably believed to be carrying oil destined for (Southern) Rhodesia".[48][49]
Some nations, such as Switzerland, and West Germany, which were not UN members, conducted business legally with Rhodesia – the latter remained the Smith government's largest trading partner in Western Europe until 1973, when Bonn joined the UN.[5] Japan continued to accept more Rhodesian exports than any other nation, and Iran provided oil.[50] The Portuguese government marketed Rhodesian products as its own, via false certificates of origin and disguised trade channels.[51] South Africa openly refused to observe the UN sanctions.[52][53] A 1971 amendment passed in the United States permitted American firms to go on importing Rhodesian chromium and nickel as normal.[54]
Despite the poor showing of sanctions, Rhodesia found it nearly impossible to obtain diplomatic recognition abroad. In 1970, the US government had made it clear that the UDI would not be recognised "under [any] circumstances".[55] Even Smith's ideological allies in Pretoria, although sympathetic, failed to recognise the new country on an equal level.[56]
Initially, the state retained its pledged loyalty to Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom, recognising her as Queen of Rhodesia.[5] When Smith and Deputy Prime Minister Clifford Dupont called on colonial Governor, Sir Humphrey Gibbs, to formally notify him of the UDI, Gibbs condemned the UDI as an act of treason. After Smith formally announced the UDI on the radio, Gibbs sacked the entire cabinet on orders from Whitehall. However, he was unable to enact any concrete actions to foster a return to legality. Government ministers simply ignored his notices, pointing out that UDI made his office obsolete. Even so, Gibbs continued to occupy his residence in Salisbury until 1970, when he vacated the premises and left Rhodesia following the declaration of a republic.[57] He had effectively been superseded before then; on 20 December 1965, Smith named Dupont as "Officer Administering the Government"; an earlier attempt to have him named as Governor-General of Rhodesia was dismissed out of hand.[5]
In September 1968, the Appellate Division of the Rhodesian High Court ruled that Ian Smith's administration had become the de jure government of the country, not merely the de facto one.[58] To support his decision, Chief Justice Sir Hugh Beadle used several statements made by Hugo Grotius, who maintained that there was no way in which a nation could rightly claim to be governing a particular territory – if it was waging a war against that territory. Beadle argued that due to Britain's economic war against Rhodesia, she could not (at the same point) be described as governing Rhodesia.[59][60] Resulting court decisions held that the rebel government "could lawfully do anything its predecessors could lawfully have done".[61]
A Salisbury commission chaired by prominent lawyer W.R. Waley was appointed to study constitutional options open to the Rhodesian authorities as of April 1968, but reaching a further settlement with the British was ruled out early on.[17][62] Waley, although insistent that "Europeans must surrender any belief in permanent European domination", also testified that majority rule was not desirable immediately.[5]
Talks aimed at easing the differences between Rhodesia and the United Kingdom were carried out aboard Royal Navy vessels once in December 1966 and again in October 1968.[63][64][65] Both efforts failed to achieve agreement, although Harold Wilson added a sixth principle to the five he had previously enunciated: "it would be necessary to ensure that, regardless of race, there was no oppression of the majority by the minority or of [any] minority by the majority." Rhodesian resolve stiffened following a failure to reach a new settlement, with more radical elements of the Rhodesian Front calling for a republican constitution.[5]
During a two-proposition referendum held in 1969, the proposal for severing all remaining ties to the British Crown passed by a majority of 61,130 votes to 14,327.[5] Rhodesia declared itself a republic on 2 March 1970. Under the new constitution, a president served as ceremonial head of state, with the prime minister nominally reporting to him.[66] Some in Rhodesian government had hoped in vain that the declaration of a republic would finally prompt other nations to grant recognition.[67]
Impact of UDI[edit]
The years following Rhodesia's UDI saw an unfolding series of economic, military, and political pressures placed on the country which eventually brought about majority rule, a totality of these factors rather than any one the reason for introducing change.[68] In 2005, a conference at the London School of Economics which discussed Rhodesia's independence concluded that UDI was sparked by an existing racial conflict complicated by Cold War intrigues.[69]
Critics of UDI sought to maintain that Ian Smith intended only to safeguard the privileges of an entrenched colonial elite at the expense of the impoverished African community. According to this logic, UDI created a vacuum of oppression which was eventually filled by Robert Mugabe's present dictatorship.[70] Smith and his supporters continued to defend their actions, however, by claiming that the Rhodesian majority was too inexperienced at the time to manage effectively a developed nation.[26]
At large, the European population's emerging attitude to UDI was tense. Many white Rhodesians had seen themselves as nothing less than fully fledged members of the British Empire, carrying on the same rugged values and frontier spirit of the early Englishmen who had settled in 1890.[42] But such confidence was rudely shaken by Whitehall's refusal to grant independence on their terms. After 1965, there were those who continued to claim that they were collectively upholders of principle and defenders of such values against the twin threats of communism, manifested through the militant black nationalists, and – ironically – the decadence of Britain herself.[42] Often repeated appeals to the Christian heritage of their pioneer ancestors in "defending the free world" reflected these beliefs.[42]
African parties displayed initial horror at Smith's declaration, with one ZANU official stating, "...for all those who cherish freedom and a meaningful life, UDI has set a collision course which cannot be altered. 11 November 1965 [has] marked the turning point of the struggle for freedom in that land from a constitutional and political one to primarily a military struggle."[43] It would, however, be several years before even the most radical nationalists chose to develop a coherent strategy revolving around armed resistance, preferring instead to create opportunities for external intervention.[43]
Because Rhodesian exports were generally competitive and had previously been entitled to preferential treatment on the British market, the former colony did not recognise the need for escalating the pace of diversification before independence. Following the UDI, however, Rhodesia began to demonstrate that she had the potential to develop a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency.[26][71] After the Rhodesian Front began introducing incentives accorded to domestic production, industrial output expanded dramatically. A rigid system of countermeasures enacted to combat sanctions succeeded in blunting their impact for at least a decade.[5] Over the next nine years Rhodesian companies, spiting the freezing of their assets and blocking of overseas accounts, also perfected cunning techniques of sanctions evasion through both local and foreign subsidiaries, which operated on a clandestine trade network.[5]
From 1968 until 1970, there was virtually no further dialogue between Rhodesia and the UK. This altered immediately after the ascension of Edward Heath, who reopened negotiations.[72] Smith remained optimistic that Heath would do his utmost to remedy Anglo-Rhodesian relations, although disappointed that he continued to adhere publicly to the original "five principles" proposed by Alec Douglas-Home, now foreign secretary. In November 1971, Douglas-Home renewed contacts with Salisbury and announced a proposed agreement which would be satisfactory to both sides – it recognised Rhodesia's 1969 constitution as the legal frame of government, while agreeing that gradual legislative representation was an acceptable formula for unhindered advance to majority rule.[5] Nevertheless, the new settlement, if approved, would also implement an immediate improvement in black political status, offer a means to terminate racial discrimination, and provide a solid guarantee against retrogressive constitutional amendments.[73]
Implementation of the proposed settlement hinged on popular acceptance, but the Rhodesian government consistently refused to submit it to a universal referendum.[5] A twenty four-member commission headed by an eminent jurist, Lord Pearce, was therefore tasked with ascertaining public opinion on the subject.[74] In 1972, the commission began interviewing interest groups and sampling opinions – although concern was expressed over the widespread apathy encountered.[26] According to every published finding, whites were in favour of the settlement, and Rhodesians of mixed or Asian background generally pleased, while black reaction was resoundingly negative.[72][75] As many as thirty African chiefs and politicians voiced their opposition, prompting Britain to withdraw from the proposals on the grounds of the commission's report.[74]
The Bush War[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Bush War
As early as 1960, minority rule in Southern Rhodesia was already being challenged by a rising tide of political violence led by African nationalists such as Joshua Nkomo and Ndabaningi Sithole. After their public campaigns were initially suppressed, many believed that negotiation was completely incapable of meeting their aspirations. Petrol bombings by radicals became increasingly common, with the Zimbabwe Review observing in 1961, "for the first time home-made petrol bombs were used by freedom fighters in Salisbury against settler establishments."[76] It was officially noted that between January and September 1962 alone, 33 bombings were carried out, in addition to 27 acts of attempted sabotage on communications. In that same period, nationalists were implicated in arson targeting 18 schools and 10 churches.[43] Nkomo's Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU) subsequently disclosed that it had formed a military wing (Zimbabwe People's Revolutionary Army, ZIPRA), and 'the decision to start bringing in arms and ammunition and to send young men away for sabotage training' had already been made. The Rhodesian authorities responded by banning ZAPU and driving its supporters underground.[77] Frustrated by their repeated failures, nationalists also conducted a campaign of terror against black Africans, murdering those who had either identified with the colonial administration or had simply failed to demonstrate their allegiance to the cause.[43] To protect civilians, emergency laws were imposed, broadening the legal definition of unlawful gatherings and giving the police greater powers to crack down on agitators or subversives.[78] The death sentence was also introduced for terrorism involving explosives and arson.[5]
A crisis of confidence soon resulted across ZAPU, which was already suffering from poor morale, compounded by tribal and ideological factionalism. In 1963, party dissidents rejected Joshua Nkomo's authority and formed their own organisation, the Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU) – which worked out its own strategy for impressing international opinion, undermining white assurance, and achieving a complete breakdown of order. By August 1964, ZANU, which had brutally intimidated neutrals and opponents alike, was outlawed by authorities as well.[79]
ZANU's agenda was inward-looking, leftist, and pan-Africanist in nature. Ndabaningi Sithole and avowed Marxist Robert Mugabe, its most prominent leaders, demanded a one party Zimbabwean state with majority rule and a public monopoly on land.[5] After being forced from Rhodesia, they continued to operate in exile, creating occupation groups representing urban workers, miners, and peasant farmers. ZANU also attracted professionals, students, and feminists to its ranks. While ZAPU theoretically continued to command the allegiance of most Ndebele and Shona activists, Sithole and Mugabe drew their support from the Mashonaland countryside.[5]
After the UDI, ZANU officials mapped an elaborate plan for the "liberation of Zimbabwe" which called for attacks on white farmers, destruction of cash crops, disrupting electricity in urban areas, and petrol bombings.[43] Sithole and Nkomo both insisted on the need for armed struggle, but disagreed on the means to go about it. For example, ZAPU tended to follow Soviet thinking, placing an emphasis on sophisticated weaponry in the hopes of winning a conventional battle like the Viet Minh at Dien Bien Phu. ZANU preferred to politicise populations in areas which they intended to seize.[68] Neither force, however, had acquired basic knowledge of guerrilla warfare. Debate on political theory and insurgent tactics became the obsession of nationalists at this stage.[43]




Soldier interrogates Rhodesian villagers about insurgent activity in late 1977. This photograph became one of the most enduring images of the bush war.


In April 1966, two Zimbabwe African National Liberation Army (ZANLA – the military wing of ZANU) units, having received prior training at Nanjing Military College, crossed into Rhodesia from Zambia. They were armed with SKS carbines, Chinese hand grenades, explosives, and communist pamphlets, having been issued vague instructions to sabotage important installations before killing white persons indiscriminately.[43] At least five guerrillas were simply arrested before getting very far. Another seven hoped to destroy a pylon carrying electricity to Sinoia in the northwest. Their faulty demolitions were uncovered by the Rhodesian Security Forces and the men easily tracked to a nearby ranch on 28 April, where they were shot resisting capture.[68][80][81] This event is considered to have been the first engagement of what came to be known as the "Bush War" in Rhodesia and the "Second Chimurenga" (or rebellion in Shona) by supporters of the guerrillas.[82]
The campaign proper is generally considered to have started in 1972 with the Attack on Altena Farm, despite the minor threat already represented by the nationalist movements in the 1960s.
After unsuccessful appeals to Britain and the United States for military assistance, Robert Mugabe, who was based in Mozambique after that country's independence from Portugal in 1975, led ZANU to seek support from the People's Republic of China and countries of the Soviet Bloc. Joshua Nkomo, based in Zambia and also supported by the Soviet Union, led ZAPU.[83] ZANU and ZAPU together formed 'the Patriotic Front'. Broadly, ZANLA recruited mainly from Mashonaland and Manicaland provinces, whilst the ZIPRA recruited from Mashonaland West, Midlands and Matabeleland provinces of Zimbabwe.
After the collapse of Portuguese rule in Mozambique in 1974–75, it was no longer viable for the Smith regime to sustain white minority rule indefinitely. By this time, even South Africa's Vorster had come to this view. While Vorster was unwilling to make concessions to his own country's blacks, he concluded that white minority rule was not sustainable in a country where blacks outnumbered whites 22:1.[83] In 1978, there were 270,000 Rhodesians of European descent and more than six million Africans.[84]
International business groups involved in the country (e.g. Lonrho) transferred their support from the Rhodesian government to black nationalist parties. Business leaders and politicians feted Nkomo on his visits to Europe. ZANU also attracted business supporters who saw the course that future events were likely to take.[85] Funding and arms support provided by supporters, particularly from the Soviet Union and its allies in the latter 1970s, allowed both ZIPRA and the ZANLA to acquire more sophisticated weaponry, thereby increasing the military pressure that the guerrillas were able to place on Rhodesia.
Until 1972, containing the guerrillas was little more than a police action. Even as late as August 1975 when Rhodesian government and black nationalist leaders met at Victoria Falls for negotiations brokered by South Africa and Zambia, the talks never got beyond the procedural phase.[86] Rhodesian representatives made it clear they were prepared to fight an all out war to prevent majority rule.[87] However, the situation changed dramatically after the end of Portuguese colonial rule in Mozambique in 1975. Rhodesia now found itself almost entirely surrounded by hostile states and even South Africa, its only real ally, pressed for a settlement.

Having let slip one chance after another of reaching an accommodation with more moderate black leaders, Rhodesia's whites seem to have made the tragic choice of facing black nationalism over the barrel of a gun rather than the conference table. The downhill road toward a race war in Rhodesia is becoming increasingly slippery with blood.
— Rand Daily Mail editorial, May 1976[88]

At this point, ZANU's alliance with FRELIMO (the Liberation Front of Mozambique) and the porous border between Mozambique and eastern Rhodesia enabled large-scale training and infiltration of ZANU/ZANLA fighters. The governments of Zambia and Botswana were also emboldened sufficiently to allow resistance movement bases to be set up in their territories. Guerrillas began to launch operations deep inside Rhodesia, attacking roads, railways, economic targets and isolated security force positions, in 1976.[89]




Rhodesian servicewoman takes aim with her Browning Hi-Power 9×19mm semi-automatic pistol; from a 1976 army recruitment poster


The government adopted a 'strategic hamlets' policy of the kind used in Malaya and Vietnam to restrict the influence of insurgents over the population of rural areas. Local people were forced to relocate to protected villages (PVs) which were strictly controlled and guarded by the government against rebel atrocities. The protected villages were compared by the guerrillas to concentration camps. Some contemporary accounts claim that this interference in the lives of local residents induced many of them who had previously been neutral to support the guerrillas.[90]
The war degenerated into rounds of increasing brutality from all three parties involved (ZANU and ZAPU, and the Rhodesian Army fighting off their attacks). Mike Subritzky, a former NZ Army ceasefire monitor in Rhodesia, in 1980 described the war as "both bloody and brutal and brought out the very worst in the opposing combatants on all three sides."[91]
End of the Bush War[edit]









The geographical situation in 1965 (left, on UDI) and 1975 (right, after the independence of Mozambique and Angola from Portugal). Green: Rhodesia; purple: friendly nations; orange: hostile states.


Rhodesia began to lose vital economic and military support from South Africa, which, while sympathetic to the white minority government, never accorded it diplomatic recognition. The South African government placed limits on the fuel and munitions they supplied to the Rhodesian military. They also withdrew the personnel and equipment that they had previously provided to aid the war effort, though covert military support continued.[92]
In 1976, the South African government and United States governments worked together to place pressure on Smith to agree to a form of majority rule. In response to the initiative of US Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, in 1976 Ian Smith accepted the principle of black majority rule within two years.[92] The Rhodesians now offered more concessions, but those concessions, focused on reaching an "internal settlement" with moderate black leaders, were insufficient to end the war.
At the time, some Rhodesians said the still embittered history between the British-dominated Rhodesia and the Afrikaner-dominated South Africa partly led South African government to withdraw its aid to Rhodesia. Ian Smith said in his memoirs that even though many white South Africans supported Rhodesia, South African Prime Minister John Vorster's policy of détente with the Black African states ended up with Rhodesia being offered as the "sacrificial lamb" to buy more time for South Africa. Other observers perceived South Africa's distancing itself from Rhodesia as being an early move in the process that led to majority rule in South Africa itself.[93]

In 1976 South Africa saw settlement of the Rhodesian question as vital on several fronts: to cauterise the wound of the psychological blow … caused by her defeat in the Angolan conflict; to pre-empt possible Cuban intervention in Rhodesia and the possibility of South Africa being sucked into another Cold War regional conflict without the support and endorsement of the western powers
— Dr Sue Onslow, South Africa and UDI[94]


In the latter 1970s, the militants had successfully put the economy of Rhodesia under significant pressure while the numbers of guerrillas in the country were steadily increasing.[95][96] The government abandoned its early strategy of trying to defend the borders in favour of trying to defend key economic areas and lines of communication with South Africa, while the rest of the countryside became a patchwork of "no-go areas".
Late 1970s[edit]
By the late 1970s, Rhodesia's front-line forces contained about 25,000 regular troops and police – backed up by relatively strong army and police reserves.[97] Its mechanised contingent consisted of light armoured cars and improvised mine-protected armoured personnel carriers, complemented by eight tanks (Polish built T-55LD tanks), delivered in the last year of the war. The Rhodesian Air Force operated an assortment of both Canberra light bombers, Hawker Hunter fighter bombers, older de Havilland Vampire jets as well as a somewhat antiquated, but still potent, helicopter arm. These forces, including highly trained special operations units, were capable of launching devastating raids on resistance movement camps outside the country, as in Operation Dingo in 1977 and other similar operations.
Nevertheless, guerrilla pressure inside the country itself was steadily increasing in the latter 1970s. By 1978–79, the war had become a contest between the guerrilla warfare placing ever increasing pressure on the Rhodesian regime and civil population and the Rhodesian government's strategy of trying to hold off the militants until external recognition for a compromise political settlement with moderate black leaders could be secured.
By this time, the need to cut a deal was apparent to most Rhodesians, but not to all. Ian Smith had dismissed his intransigent Defence Minister, P. K. van der Byl, as early as 1976.[98] "PK" had been a hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opposition or the international community since before UDI.

...it is better to fight to the last man and the last cartridge and die with some honour. Because, what is being presented to us here is a degree of humiliation...
— P. K. van der Byl in 1977, commenting on a British peace plan.[99]

Van der Byl eventually retired to his country estate outside Cape Town, but there were elements in Rhodesia, mainly embittered former security force personnel, who forcibly opposed majority rule up to and well beyond the establishment of majority rule.[100] New white immigrants continued to arrive in Rhodesia right up to the eve of majority rule.[101]
Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas[edit]
Main article: Rhodesia and weapons of mass destruction
The program's primary purpose was to kill guerrillas whether they were recruits transiting to camps in Mozambique or guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia. The CBW effort took on the guerrilla threat from three fronts.[102] First, the effort aimed to eliminate guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia through contaminated supplies either provided by contact men, recovered from hidden caches, or stolen from rural stores.[103] Secondly, the effort worked to contaminate water supplies along guerrilla infiltration routes into Rhodesia, forcing the guerrillas either to travel through arid regions to carry more water and less ammunition or travel through areas patrolled by the security forces.[104] Finally, the Rhodesians sought to hit the guerrillas in their camps in Mozambique by poisoning food, beverages, and medicines.
The chemicals most used in the Rhodesian program were parathion (an organophosphate insecticide) and thallium (a heavy metal commonly found in rodenticide).[105] The Rhodesians selected for use also included Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera) and possibly Bacillus anthracis (causative agent of anthrax). They also looked at using Rickettsia prowazekii (causative agent of epidemic typhus), and Salmonella typhi (causative agent of typhoid fever), and toxins—such as ricin and botulinum toxin.[102]
Biological agents, namely Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera), had some impact on the fighting capability of ZANLA.[106] Some former officers of the Rhodesian Security Forces alleged that anthrax was covertly used by Rhodesian psy-ops units during the late 1970s, but these statements are unfounded. Rhodesia never possessed the capability to produce anthrax spores on the scale needed for widespread dissemination.[102] Use of anthracis, ricin, or botulinum toxin would have been confined to assassination attempts.[102] Some more-merited allegations are that the South African government's top-secret chemical and biological weapons program, a progenitor of Project Coast, used Rhodesia as a "laboratory".[106]
Security Situation Erodes Rapidly[edit]
The work of journalists such as Lord Richard Cecil, son of the Marquess of Salisbury, stiffened the morale of Rhodesians and their overseas supporters.[107] Lord Richard produced regular news reports such as the Thames TV 'Frontline Rhodesia' features. These reports typically contrasted the incompetent insurgents with the "superbly professional" government troops.[108] A group of ZANLA fighters killed Lord Richard on 20 April 1978 when he was accompanying a Rhodesian airborne unit employed in Fire Force Operations.[109]
The shooting down on 3 September 1978 of the civilian Vickers Viscount airliner Hunyani, Air Rhodesia Flight RH825, in the Kariba area by ZIPRA fighters using a surface-to-air missile, with the subsequent massacre of its survivors, is widely considered to be the event that finally destroyed the Rhodesians' will to continue the war. Although militarily insignificant, the loss of this aircraft (and a second Viscount, the Umniati, in 1979) demonstrated the reach of resistance movements extended to Rhodesian civil society.[110]
The Rhodesians' means to continue the war were also eroding fast. In December 1978, a ZANLA unit penetrated the outskirts of Salisbury and fired a volley of rockets and incendiary device rounds into the main oil storage depot – the most heavily defended economic asset in the country. The storage tanks burned for five days, giving off a column of smoke that could be seen 130 kilometres (80 mi) away. Five hundred thousand barrels (79,000 m3) of petroleum product (comprising Rhodesia's strategic oil reserve) were lost.[111]
The government's defence spending increased from R$30 million, 8.5% of the national budget in 1971 to 1972, to R$400 m in 1978 to 1979, 47% of the national budget. In 1980, the post-independence government of Zimbabwe inherited a US$500 million national debt.[112]
End of UDI (1979)[edit]




Signing the Rhodesian Internal Settlement (from left: Bishop Abel Muzorewa, Ian Smith, Jeremiah Chirau and Ndabaningi Sithole)


The Rhodesian army continued its "mobile counter-offensive" strategy of holding key positions ("vital asset ground") while carrying out raids into the no-go areas and into neighbouring countries. While often extraordinarily successful in inflicting heavy guerrilla casualties, such raids also on occasion failed to achieve their objectives. In April 1979 special forces carried out a raid on Joshua Nkomo's residence in Lusaka (Zambia) with the stated intention of assassinating him.[113] Nkomo and his family left hastily a few hours before the raid – having clearly been warned that the raid was coming.
In 1979, some special forces units were accused of using counterinsurgent operations as cover for ivory poaching and smuggling. Colonel Reid-Daly (commander of the Selous Scouts) discovered that his phone was bugged and after challenging a superior officer on this issue was court martialled for insubordination. He received the lightest sentence possible, a caution, but he continued to fight his conviction and eventually resigned his commission and left the Army.
By 1978–79, up to 70% of the regular army was composed of black soldiers (though both the army and police reserves remained overwhelmingly white). By 1979 there were also 30 black commissioned officers in the regular army. While there was never any suggestion of disloyalty among the soldiers from predominantly black units (in particular within the Selous Scouts or the Rhodesian African Rifles – RAR), some argue that, by the time of the 1980 election, many of the RAR soldiers voted for Robert Mugabe.[114]
As the result of an Internal Settlement signed on 3 March 1978 between the Rhodesian government and the moderate African nationalist parties, which were not in exile and not involved in the war, elections were held in April 1979. The United African National Council (UANC) party won a majority in this election, and its leader, Abel Muzorewa (a United Methodist Church bishop), became the country's first black prime minister on 1 June 1979. The country's name was changed to Zimbabwe Rhodesia. The internal settlement left control of the country's police, security forces, civil service and judiciary in white hands, for the moment. It assured whites of about one third of the seats in parliament. It was essentially a power-sharing arrangement between whites and blacks which, in the eyes of many, particularly the insurgents, did not amount to majority rule.[115] However, the United States Senate voted to end economic sanctions against Zimbabwe Rhodesia on 12 June.[116]
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU. In spite of offers from Ian Smith, the latter parties declined to participate in an election in which their political position would be insecure and under a proposed constitution which they had played no part in drafting and which was perceived as retaining strong white minority privilege.
Bishop Muzorewa's government did not receive international recognition. The Bush War continued unabated and sanctions were not lifted. The international community refused to accept the validity of any agreement which did not incorporate the main nationalist parties. The British Government (then led by the recently elected Margaret Thatcher) issued invitations to all parties to attend a peace conference at Lancaster House. These negotiations took place in London in late 1979. The three-month-long conference almost failed to reach conclusion, due to disagreements on land reform, but resulted in the Lancaster House Agreement. UDI ended, and Rhodesia temporarily reverted to the status of a British colony (the 'Colony of Southern Rhodesia').[117]
The Lancaster House Agreement further provided for a ceasefire which was followed by an internationally supervised general election, held on February 1980. ZANU led by Robert Mugabe won this election, some alleged,[who?] by terrorising its political opposition, including supporters of ZAPU, through former insurgents that had not confined themselves to the designated guerrilla assembly points, as stipulated by the Lancaster House Agreement. The observers and the newly installed governor Lord Soames were accused of looking the other way, and Mugabe's victory was certified. Nevertheless, few could doubt that Mugabe's support within his majority Shona tribal group was extremely strong. The Rhodesian military seriously considered mounting a coup against a perceived stolen election ("Operation Quartz") to prevent ZANU from taking over the country.[118] The alleged coup was to include the assassination of Mugabe and coordinated assaults on guerrilla assembly points throughout the country. The plan was eventually scuttled, as it was obvious that Mugabe enjoyed widespread support from the black majority despite voter intimidation, as well as the fact that the coup would gain no external support, and a conflagration which would engulf the country was seen as inevitable.
Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)[edit]
Mugabe and the victorious black nationalists were rather less concerned by Operation Quartz than by the possibility that there might be a mass exodus of the white community of the kind that had caused chaos in Mozambique five years earlier. Such an exodus had been prepared for by the South African government. With the agreement of the British Governor of Rhodesia, South African troops had entered the country to secure the road approaches to the Beit Bridge border crossing point. Refugee camps had been prepared in the Transvaal. On the day the election results became known, most white families had prepared contingency plans for flight, including the packing of cars and suitcases.
However, after a meeting with Robert Mugabe and the central committee of ZANU (PF), Ian Smith was reassured that whites could, and should stay in the new Zimbabwe. Mugabe promised that he would abide strictly by the terms of the Lancaster House Agreement and that changes in Zimbabwe would be made gradually and by proper legal process. In a CBS news interview, Mugabe claimed that Rhodesian whites "...are still in control of the economy, the majority being commercial farmers.",[119] Mugabe however, would reverse his commitment to these agreements some years later; the regime began confiscating white owned farm lands. This is widely blamed for leading to the deterioration of the Zimbabwean economy which plagues the country today.[120]
On 18 April 1980 the country became independent as the Republic of Zimbabwe, and its capital, Salisbury, was renamed Harare two years later.
Politics[edit]



Rhodesia






This article is part of a series on the
politics and government of
Rhodesia




Constitutional history



— Overview
1890–1923  BSA Company rule
1923–1980  Southern Rhodesia
1953–1963  Rhodesia–Nyasaland Federation
1965–1979  Rhodesia under UDI
 1979  Zimbabwe Rhodesia (under UDI)









Government


Governor / President
Prime Minister








Legislature



1899–1923  Legislative Council
1924–1970  Legislative Assembly









Elections


General


1924 1928 1933 1934 1939 1946 1948 1954 1958 1962 1965 1970 1974 1977 1979 1980



Legislative Council


1899 1902 1905 1908 1911 1914 1920



Referendums


1922 1934 1953 1961 1964 1969 1979











Political parties


African National Congress
Communist Party
Labour Party
Liberal Party
Rhodesia Party
Rhodesian Action Party
Rhodesian Front
United African National Council
United Federal Party

Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU)


Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU)









Foreign relations



Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI)

Mission in Lisbon
Passport








National symbols


Flag (other flags)
Anthem









Other countries
Atlas








v
t
e





Main article: Politics of Rhodesia




The Presidential flag of Rhodesia.


Although Southern Rhodesia never gained full dominion status within the Commonwealth of Nations, Southern Rhodesians ruled themselves from the attainment of 'Responsible Government' in 1923. Its electoral register had property and education qualifications. Over the years various electoral arrangements made at a national and municipal level upheld these standards. For example, the franchise for the first Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council election in 1899 contained the following requirement:

"voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth £75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of £50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months' continuous residence was also required for qualifications (b) and (c)."

Following Cecil Rhodes's dictum of "equal rights for all civilised men", there was no overt racial component to the franchise. However, the requirement excluded a majority of native blacks from the electorate.
Up until the 1950s, Southern Rhodesia had a vibrant political life with right and left wing parties competing for power. The Rhodesian Labour Party held seats in the Assembly and in municipal councils throughout the 1920s and 1930s. From 1953 to 1958, the prime minister was Garfield Todd, a liberal who did much to promote the development of the Black community through investment in education, housing and healthcare. However, the government forced Todd from office because his proposed reforms were seen by many whites as too radical.
From 1958 onwards, white settler politics consolidated and ossified around resistance to majority rule, setting the stage for UDI. The 1961 Constitution governed Southern Rhodesia and independent Rhodesia up until 1969, using the Westminster Parliamentary System modified by a system of separate voter rolls with differing property and education qualifications, without regard to race. Whites ended up with the majority of Assembly seats.
The 1969 republican constitution established a bicameral Parliament consisting of an indirectly elected Senate and a directly elected House of Assembly, effectively reserving the majority of seats for whites. The office of President had only ceremonial significance with the Prime Minister holding executive power.
The Constitution of the short-lived Zimbabwe Rhodesia, which saw a black-led government elected for the first time, reserved 28 of the 100 parliamentary seats for whites. The independence constitution agreed at Lancaster House watered those provisions down and reserved 20 out of 100 seats for whites in the House of Assembly and 8 out of 40 seats in the Senate. The constitution prohibited Zimbabwe authorities from altering the Constitution for seven years without unanimous consent and required a three-quarters vote in Parliament for a further three years. The government amended the Constitution in 1987 to abolish the seats reserved for whites, and replace the office of Prime Minister with an executive President. In 1990, the government abolished the Senate.
Military and police[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Security Forces
Rhodesian Security Forces consisted of the Rhodesian Army, Royal Rhodesian Air Force, British South Africa Police, Rhodesian Ministry of Internal Affairs (INTAF) and the Guard Force. Despite the impact of economic and diplomatic sanctions, Rhodesia was able to develop and maintain a potent and professional military capability.[121] Time magazine reported in June 1977 that "man for man, the Rhodesian army ranks among the world's finest fighting units."[122]
Foreign relations[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2011) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Throughout the period of its Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965 to 1979), Rhodesia pursued a foreign policy of attempting to secure recognition as an independent country, and insisting that its political system would include 'gradual steps to majority rule.' Ardently anti-communist, Rhodesia tried to present itself to the West as a front-line state against communist expansion in Africa, to little avail. Rhodesia received little international recognition during its existence; recognition only occurred after elections in 1980 and a transition to majority rule.
Rhodesia wished to retain its economic prosperity and also feared communist elements in the rebel forces, and thus felt their policy of a gradual progression to black majority rule was justified. However, the international community refused to accept this rationale, believing that their policies were perpetuating racism. This attitude was part of the larger decolonisation context, during which Western powers such as the United Kingdom, France, and Belgium hastened to grant independence to their colonies in Africa.
Britain and the UDI[edit]
Rhodesia was originally a British colony. Although decolonisation in Africa had begun after World War II, it began accelerating in the early 1960s, causing Britain to negotiate independence rapidly with several of its colonies. During this period, it adopted a foreign policy called NIBMAR, or No Independence Before Majority African Rule, mandating democratic reforms that placed governance in the hands of the majority black Africans. The governing white minority of Rhodesia, led by Ian Smith, opposed the policy and its implications. On 11 November 1965, Rhodesia's minority white government made a unilateral declaration of independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom, as it became apparent that negotiations would not lead to independence under the white regime.
The United Kingdom government immediately brought in legislation (Southern Rhodesia Act 1965) which formally abolished all Rhodesian government institutions. This move made life difficult for Rhodesian citizens who wished to travel internationally as passports issued by Rhodesia's UDI administration were not recognised as valid;[123] in January 1966, the British issued a statement accepting as valid any passport issued before the declaration of independence and allowing six-month United Kingdom passports to be granted when they expired – provided that the bearer declared they did not intend to aid the UDI Rhodesian government.[124]
Until late 1969, Rhodesia still recognised Queen Elizabeth II as head of state, even though it opposed the British government itself for hindering its goals of independence. The Queen, however, refused to accept the title Queen of Rhodesia. Eventually, the Smith government abandoned attempts to remain loyal to the Crown, and in 1969, a majority of the electorate voted in referendum to declare Rhodesia a republic. They hoped that this move would facilitate recognition as an independent state by the international community, but the issues of white minority control remained and hindered this effort, and like the UDI before it, the proclamation of a republic lacked international recognition.
Sanctions[edit]
After the declaration of independence, and indeed for the entire duration of its existence, Rhodesia did not receive official recognition from any state, although it did maintain diplomatic relations with South Africa, which was then under apartheid. South Africa did not recognise Rhodesia to preserve its fragile positions with other nations, but frequently assisted the republic. Portugal maintained informal relations until the Carnation Revolution of 1974. The day following the declaration of independence, the United Nations Security Council passed a resolution (S/RES/216) calling upon all states not to accord Rhodesia recognition, and to refrain from any assistance. The Security Council also imposed selective mandatory economic sanctions, which were later made comprehensive.
Malawi,[125] Israel, South Africa, Portugal, and Iran did not comply with economic sanctions against Rhodesia.[126] The US, despite voting in favor of the sanctions at the UNSC, violated them to buy chrome ore from Rhodesia.[127] Kenneth Kaunda, president of Zambia, also accused western oil companies of violating the sanctions and selling oil to Rhodesia.[128]
International perspective[edit]
Rhodesia's Unilateral Declaration of Independence from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965 was promptly condemned by the international community. The United Nations Security Council Resolution 216 of 12 November 1965 called "upon all States not to recognise this illegal racist minority regime in Southern Rhodesia."[129]
Rhodesia campaigned for international acceptance and invoked the doctrine of non-intervention in internal affairs as justification for rebuking external criticism of its internal policies. However, the emerging doctrine of self-determination in colonial situations meant that most nations regarded Rhodesia as illegitimate.
Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia, took a pragmatic approach towards Rhodesia. Kenneth Kaunda, heavily dependent on access through Rhodesia for his nation's copper ore exports, fuel, and power imports unofficially worked with the Rhodesian government. Rhodesia still allowed Zambia to export and import its goods through its territory to Mozambique ports, despite the Zambian government's official policy of hostility and non-recognition of the post-UDI Smith Administration.
The United States, like all other Western nations, refused to recognise Rhodesia, but unlike others allowed its Consulate-General to function as a communications conduit between the American government in Washington, D.C., and the Rhodesian government in Salisbury. When Rhodesia set up an information office in Washington, D.C., OAS nations loudly protested. The US government responded by saying the Rhodesian mission and its staff had no official diplomatic status and violated no US laws.
Portugal pursued a middle path with Rhodesia. While not officially recognising Rhodesia under Ian Smith, the government of António Salazar did permit Rhodesia to establish a representative mission in Lisbon, and permitted Rhodesian exports and imports through their colony of Mozambique. The Portuguese government in power at that time, authoritarian and ardently anti-communist, gave active behind-the-scenes support in Rhodesia's fight against the guerrilla groups.
South Africa, itself under international pressure as a white minority government, pursued a policy of détente with the black African states at the time. These states wanted South Africa to pressure Ian Smith to accept a faster transition to majority rule in Rhodesia, in return for pledges of non-interference in South Africa's internal affairs. Prime Minister John Vorster, believing majority rule in Rhodesia would lead to international acceptance for South Africa, used a number of tactics to pressure Smith. The South African government held up shipments of fuel and ammunition and pulled out friendly South African forces from Rhodesia. The combined loss of Mozambique and the loss of support from South Africa dealt critical blows to the Rhodesian government.
Diplomatic relations[edit]
After the UDI, Rhodesia maintained several overseas missions, including Pretoria,[130] and until 1975, Lisbon in Portugal and Lourenço Marques (now Maputo) in Mozambique.[131]
Since 1961, Rhodesia had had an "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" with South Africa, heading a "Rhodesian Diplomatic Mission" or de facto embassy.[132] Before South Africa left the Commonwealth that year, the then Southern Rhodesia had exchanged High Commissioners with the then Union of South Africa, but following the change in status, the Republic now had a "South African Diplomatic Mission" in Salisbury.[133]
During 1965, the government of Rhodesia made moves to establish a mission in Lisbon separate from the British Embassy, with its own accredited representative, having previously been able to establish its own consulate in Lourenço Marques, capital of Portuguese Mozambique.[134] This prompted protests from the British government, which was determined that the representative, Harry Reedman, should be a nominal member of the British Ambassador's staff.[135] For their part, the Portuguese authorities sought a compromise whereby they would accept Reedman as an independent representative but deny him diplomatic status.[136]
The Rhodesian Information Office in Washington remained open following UDI, but its director, Ken Towsey, and his staff were deprived of their diplomatic status.[137] Previously, there had been a "Minister for Rhodesian Affairs" operating under the aegis of the British Embassy in Washington,[138] as well representatives in Tokyo and Bonn.[139] Following the country's independence as Zimbabwe, Towsey became chargé d'affaires at the new Embassy.[140]
The High Commission in London, known as Rhodesia House, continued to function until it was closed in 1969 following the decision by white Rhodesians in a referendum to make the country a republic, along with the "British Residual Mission" in Salisbury.[141] Prior to its closure, the mission flew the newly adopted Flag of Rhodesia, considered illegal by the Foreign Office, prompting calls by Labour MP Willie Hamilton for its removal.[142]
In Australia, the federal government in Canberra sought to close the Rhodesian Information Centre in Sydney,[143] but it remained open, operating under the jurisdiction of the state of New South Wales.[144] In 1973, the Labor government of Gough Whitlam cut post and telephone links to the Centre, but this was ruled illegal by the High Court.[145] An office was also established in Paris, but this was closed down by the French government in 1977.[146]
Similarly, the United States recalled its consul-general from Salisbury, and reduced consular staff,[147] but did not move to close its consulate until the declaration of a republic in 1970.[148] South Africa, however, retained its "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" after UDI,[149] which allowed it to continue to recognise British sovereignty as well as to deal with the de facto authority of the government of Ian Smith.[150]
The South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury became the only such mission remaining in the country after 1975,[151] when Portugal downgraded its mission to consul level,[152] having recalled its consul-general in Salisbury in May 1970.[153] After Zimbabwe's independence, the new government closed its missions in Pretoria and Cape Town, only maintaining a trade mission in Johannesburg,[154] while the South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury was also closed.[155]
Results[edit]
Continuing civil war and a lack of international support eventually led the Rhodesian government to submit to an agreement with the UK in 1979. This led to internationally supervised elections, won by Zimbabwe African National Union - Patriotic Front and Robert Mugabe, establishing the internationally recognised Zimbabwe.
Legacy[edit]
In the ten years after independence, around 60% of the white population of Zimbabwe emigrated, most to South Africa and to other mainly white, English speaking countries where they formed expatriate communities. Politically within Zimbabwe, the consolidation of power by Robert Mugabe continued through the 1980s. Following amendments to the country's constitution in 1987, parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished, and an executive presidency was created, held by Mugabe. Many expatriates and some of the whites who stayed in Zimbabwe became deeply nostalgic for Rhodesia. These individuals are known as "Rhodies." Native whites who are more accepting of the new order are known as "Zimbos."
While as Rhodesia, the country was once considered the breadbasket of Africa. Today, Zimbabwe is a net importer of foodstuffs, with the European Union and United States providing emergency food relief as humanitarian aid on a regular basis.[156] The nation has suffered profound economic and social decline in the past twenty years. Recently the agriculture sector has started to do well since the availability of expertise and machines has improved supported mainly by China.[157][158]
Zimbabwe also suffered from a crippling inflation rate, as the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe had a policy of printing money to satisfy government debts, which introduces excessive currency into the economic system which led to the demise of the local currency. This policy caused the inflation rate to soar from 32% in 1998 (considered extremely high by most economic standards) to an astonishing 11,200,000% by 2007. Monetary aid by the International Monetary Fund has been suspended due to the Zimbabwe government's defaulting on past loans, inability to stabilise its own economy, and its inability to stem corruption and advance human rights.[156] In 2009, Zimbabwe abandoned its currency, relying instead on foreign currencies such as the South African rand, the US dollar, the Botswana pula, the euro and the British pound, among others.[159]
In 2008 elections, Mugabe garnered 41%, Simba Makoni 10% and Morgan Tsvangirai 48% of the votes cast for president forcing a runoff election called by the Zimbabwe Electoral Commission (ZEC). In the months leading to the run-off, instances of extreme violence between the two major parties (ZANU PF and MDC) led Tsvangirai to withdraw from the election. In February 2009, a power-sharing accord was reached which resulted in the Zimbabwe Government of National Unity of 2009. The accord was, essentially, to create the position of "Prime Minister" for Tsvangirai, who served in that role from 2009 to 2013. Mugabe retained the title of President.
Rhodesian media[edit]
The main newspapers were the Rhodesia Herald in Salisbury and The Chronicle in Bulawayo. Following UDI, in 1976, the state-run Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation (RBC) took over the privately owned Rhodesian Television (RTV) service, in which it had previously acquired a 51 per cent stake.[160] Among the news magazines published in Rhodesia under UDI were the Illustrated Life Rhodesia, while The Valiant Years by Beryl Salt told the history of Rhodesia from 1890 to 1978 entirely through the medium of facsimile reproduction of articles and headlines from Rhodesian newspapers.[161]
References[edit]


^ a b Rowland, J. Reid. "Constitutional History of Rhodesia: An outline".  in Berlyn, Phillippa (April 1978). The Quiet Man: A Biography of the Hon. Ian Douglas Smith. Salisbury: M. O. Collins. pp. 240–256. OCLC 4282978. 
^

Palley, Claire (1966). The Constitutional History and Law of Southern Rhodesia 1888–1965, with Special Reference to Imperial Control (First ed.). Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 742–743. OCLC 406157. 


^ a b c d Duignan, Peter (1986), Politics and Government in African States 1960–1985, Croom Helm Ltd, ISBN 0-7099-1475-X 
^ Volume V: Africa, Australia, and Southern Islands. Lands and Peoples: The World in Color. The Grolier Society of Canada Ltd 1955. Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 54-11291. p 19-109.
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t Nelson, Harold (1983), Zimbabwe: a country study, The American University (Washington, D.C.), ISBN 0160015987 
^ "Rhodesia – Mzilikaze to Smith". Rhodesia.nl. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "The Cabinet Papers | Rhodesia and the Central African Federation". Nationalarchives.gov.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "History of Zimbabwe". Historyworld.net. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645 - Authority for date of annexation having been 12 September 1923
^ a b Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia by Vera Gowlland-Debbas
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645
^ Southern Rhodesia Constitution Letters Patent 1923
^ "Parliament". Rhodesia.me.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Full text of "Southern Rhodesia 1890–1950; A Record of Sixty Years Progress"". Archive.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbambwe". Sapst.org. 22 December 1987. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Weitzer, Ronald. Transforming Settler States: Communal Conflict and Internal Security in Northern Ireland and Zimbabwe. pp. 1–206. 
^ afrikantraveler (16 May 2012). "Rhodesia: A Failed Attempt to Maintain Racism into the 21st Century". The African File. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Hastings Kamuzu Banda Biography – Detoured on Road to Become a Doctor, Pursued Degrees with Diligence, Spoke Out Against Racism – JRank Articles". Biography.jrank.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Novak, Andrew. "Academia.edu | Sport and Racial Discrimination in Colonial Zimbabwe: A Reanalysis | Andrew Novak". Independent.academia.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Wills, A.J. (1967). "Three Territories". An Introduction to the History of Central Africa (2nd ed.). Durban: Oxford University Press. p. Appendix IV. ISBN 0-620-06410-2. Retrieved 10 September 2012. 
^ "Database – Uppsala Conflict Data Program". UCDP. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "On Board the Tiger". Rhodesia.nl. 9 October 1968. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA PSYOP 1965". Psywarrior.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A brief history of Zimbabwe". Zimembassy.se. 18 April 1980. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Smith, Ian (1997). The Great Betrayal. London: Blake Publishing Ltd. pp. 74–256. ISBN 1-85782-176-9. 
^ "Chronology: Rhodesia UDI: Road to Settlement" (PDF). Lse.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Principled failure: British policy toward Rhodesia, 1971–72 | Assorted Materials: Johnny Ryan". Johnnyryan.wordpress.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA: DEFINITION OF THE FIVE PRINCIPLES (Hansard, 16 December 1970)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 16 December 1970. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Chronology for Europeans in Zimbabwe". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A Brief History of Zimbabwe – Part 1: Early Kingdoms to UDI". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cowell, Alan (21 November 2007). "Ian Smith, Defiant Symbol of White Rule in Africa, Is Dead at 88". The New York Times. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbabwe (country)". Talktalk.co.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Policy For Rhodesia from theTribune Magazine Archive". Archive.tribunemagazine.co.uk. 23 September 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "White referendum in Southern Rhodesia is overwhelmingly in support of Ian Smith's proposal for independence. | South African History Online". Sahistory.org.za. 6 November 1964. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "British South Rhodesia (1964–1980)". Uca.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Elections in Zimbabwe". Africanelections.tripod.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Lunch with Harold Wilson | Pop Theory". Clivebarnett.wordpress.com. 12 September 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia: The Last Thread". TIME. 30 December 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Chris McGreal (13 April 2008). "There are many villains to blame for Zimbabwe's decade of horror | World news | The Observer". London: Guardian. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Mungazi, Dickson. Last Defenders of the Laager: Ian D. Smith and F.W. de Klerk. pp. 1–288. 
^ a b c d Raftopolous, Brian. Becoming Zimbabwe: A History from the pre-colonial period to 2008. pp. 1–298. 
^ a b c d e f g h Raeburn, Michael. We are everywhere: Narratives from Rhodesian guerillas. pp. 1–209. 
^ "Issue 6, Spring 2011". Genocidepreventionnow.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA (Hansard, 21 January 1969)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 21 January 1969. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Question of Southern Rhodesia". undocs.org. United Nations. 12 October 1965. A/RES/2012(XX). Retrieved 17 March 2017. 
^ "Southern Times-Learning From Rhodesia". Southerntimesafrica.com. 12 November 1965. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Resolution 221 (1966) of 9 April 1966". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Gowlland-Debbas, Vera (1990), Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers, ISBN 0-7923-0811-5 
^ "The Secretary of State, Washington" (PDF). Gwu.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Okoth, Assa (2006), A History of Africa: Volume 2: 1915–1995, East African Educational Publishers Ltd, ISBN 9966-25-358-0 
^ "When Sanctions Worked: The Case of Rhodesia Reexamined". Africafocus.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia Unilateral Declaration of Independence 1965 – Online exhibition". Commonwealth.sas.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Meredith, Martin. The Past is Another Country. p. 218. 
^ "1970:Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". BBC News. 2 March 1970. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "Chemistry – Ian Smith". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Chemistry – Humphrey Gibbs". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Herald, Salisbury, 13 to 20 September 1968
^ "Stella Madzimbamuto (Appellant) v Desmond William Lardner Burke and Frederick Phillip George (Respondents)" (PDF). Jurisafrica.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "In re James (an insolvent)". Uniset.ca. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Lauterpacht, Elihu. International Law Reports (Volume 39). pp. 1–78. 
^ http://archive.lib.msu.edu/DMC/African%20Journals/pdfs/Journal%20of%20the%20University%20of%20Zimbabwe/vol3n1/juz003001001.pdf
^ "HMS Tiger". Barrylockyer.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Smock, David R. "The Forgotten Rhodesians". Foreign Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cockram, B. "Rhodesia Rides A Tiger" (PDF). South African Institute of International Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "2 March 1970 – Rhodesia Declared a Republic". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "BBC ON THIS DAY - 2 - 1970: Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". bbc.co.uk. 
^ a b c Clayton, Anthony. Frontiersmen: Warfare in Africa since 1950. pp. 1–260. 
^ Dr. Sue Onslow. "UDI: 40 Years On". LSE. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ Michael Hartnack (2005). "40 years in wilderness after UDI declaration". The Herald. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "What's Wrong With Trade Sanctions". Cato Institute. 23 December 1985. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Brownell, Josiah. Collapse of Rhodesia: Population Demographics and the Politics of Race. pp. 1–255. 
^ "Zimbabwe Rejects Sellout!" (PDF). American Committee on Africa. 1 February 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Zvobgo, Chengetai. A History of Zimbabwe, 1890–2000 and Postscript, Zimbabwe, 2001–2008. pp. 1–410. 
^ "1972: Rhodesia's former leader arrested". BBC. 18 January 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ "Insurgency in Rhodesia, 1957–1973: An Account and Assessment". International Institute for Strategic Studies. 1973. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Shamuyarira, Nathan. Crisis in Rhodesia. pp. 202–203. 
^ Palm Beach Post, Miami, 26 March 1959
^ "The Rhodesian Agreement: Aspects and Prospects". South African Institute of International Affairs. 1978. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Moorcraft and McLaughlin, Peter, Paul (2008). The Rhodesian War: A Military History. pp. 1–200. 
^ "Rhodesian Air Force Anti Terrorist Operations (COINOPS)". rhodesianforces.org. 2012. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Spring, William (1986). The Long Fields: Zimbabwe Since Independence. p. 38. 
^ a b "APF newsletter, "Appraisal of Rhodesia in 1975"". Archived from the original on 31 May 2009. 
^ Ian Beckett. "Report on Bush War, paragraph 10". 
^ The Guardian, 21 April 2000 British Multimillionaire bankrolls Mugabe party
^ Brookings Institution: p156, study on conflict resolution
^ "Peace talks fail". BBC news. 26 August 1975. Retrieved 27 November 2007. 
^ "Rhodesia: A Strike At the Lifeline". Rand Daily Mail via TIME magazine. 1976. p. 2. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ "A Strike at the Lifeline". TIME magazine. 1976. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ APF Newsletter, 1976 :Rhodesia's "Protected" Blacks
^ "Operation Agila, "The British Empire's Last Sunset"". NZ History. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ a b "BBC ON THIS DAY | 24 | 1976: White rule in Rhodesia to end". BBC News. 24 September 1976. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ APF newsletter, 1976: appraisal of Rhodesia in 1976
^ "Cold War Studies Project". lse.ac.uk. 
^ Time magazine, 7 August 1978: Rhodesia faces collapse
^ Time magazine, 1 August 1978: taking the chicken run
^ Major Charles Lohman and Major Robert MacPherson. ""Rhodesia: Tactical Victory, Strategic Defeat" WAR SINCE 1945 SEMINAR AND SYMPOSIUM, US Marine Corps Command and Staff College, June 1983 – See Chapter 3". Scribd.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Worldwide:"PK"
^ The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p 291
^ Newsnet report : saboteurs hit Zimbabwean military, partisan comment
^ Time magazine, October 1977 : The Land of Opportunity
^ a b c d Glenn Cross, "Dirty War: Rhodesia and Chemical Biological Warfare, 1975-1980," Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, 2017
^ Ed Bird. Special Branch War: Slaughter in the Rhodesian Bush Southern Ndebele land, 1976-1980. Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, Ltd. 2014.
^ Jim Parker, "Assignment Selous Scouts: The Inside Story of a Rhodesian Special Branch Officer". Johannesburg, South Africa: Galago Press, 2006
^ Chandré Gould and Peter Folb. "Project Coast: Apartheid’s Chemical and Biological Warfare Programme". Geneva: United Nations Institute for Disarmament Research, 2002.
^ a b Southern African News Feature: the plague wars
^ The Guardian, 15 July 2003: obituary of sixth Marquess of Salisbury
^ Nick Downie report: caution, partisan comment
^ 2nd Lt CJE Vincent BCR who was present when Lord Cecil was killed
^ The Viscount Disasters – The Story
^ The Atlantic Monthly : The Fragility of Domestic Energy, see page 5
^ Selby thesis: ZWNEWS.com, p 88
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War, para 7.
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War.
^ BBC "On this day" report :1 June 1979.
^ Senate Votes Down A Move To Preserve Rhodesia Sanctions; Arms-Bill Veto Threatened White House Says 52-to-41 Margin Shows President Has Support to Prevent an Override, 13 June 1979. The New York Times.
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Allport, R. "Operation Quartz – Rhodesia 1980" (PDF). memoriesofrhodesia.com. 
^ Video on YouTube
^ "Ian Smith's farm seized in Zimbabwe as Robert Mugabe eyes election". BBC News. 7 December 2012. 
^ Rogers 1998, p. 41
^ "The World: The Military: A Mission Impossible". Time. New York. 13 June 1977. Retrieved 3 December 2011. 
^ The Southern Rhodesia (Property in Passports) Order 1965 provided that they were the property of the British government, allowing them to be impounded if presented by anyone arriving at a port of entry. See Hansard, HC 5ser vol 721 col 696.
^ The statement is printed in Hansard HC 5ser vol 723 col 4.
^ http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,836951,00.html
^ http://www.southafricaproject.info/rhodesia_and_south_africa.html
^ https://library.cqpress.com/cqalmanac/document.php?id=cqal75-1214210
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1978/09/22/zambian-to-meet-with-callaghan-on-un-oil-sanction-violations/bdd35f61-e9cb-463f-a319-38981df92cf3/
^ Wikisource:United Nations Security Council Resolution 216
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 52
^ Rhodesians to quit Lisbon, Glasgow Herald, 1 May 1975, page 4
^ Report of the Secretary for Information, Immigration, and Tourism
^ Diplomacy with a Difference: the Commonwealth Office of High Commissioner, 1880-2006, Lorna Lloyd, BRILL, 2007, page 240
^ John Arthur KINSEY, Esq., Consul-General for the Federation at Lourenco Marques, London Gazette, 5th June 1959
^ Rhodesia's Man in Lisbon: Objective Said To Be Achieved, The Glasgow Herald, 22 September 1965. page 9
^ International Diplomacy and Colonial Retreat, Kent Fedorowich, Martin Thomas Routledge, 2013, page 186
^ Goldberg Back British Stand In U.N. Session,Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, November 13, 1965
^ Isolated States: A Comparative Analysis, Deon Geldenhuys, Cambridge University Press, 1990, page 62
^ Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Vera Gowlland-Debbas, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 1990
^ Rhodesia's Lobbyist Back for Mugabe, The Washington Post, June 26, 1980
^ RHODESIA, Hansard, HC Deb 24 June 1969 vol 785 cc1218-27
^ M.P. CALLS FOR REMOVAL OF RHODESIAN FLAG IN STRAND, The Glasgow Herald, January 4, 1969, page 1
^ Rhodesia Office Will Be Closed, The Age, April 3, 1972
^ The Nationals: The Progressive, Country, and National Party in New South Wales 1919-2006, Paul Davey, Federation Press, 2006 page 223
^ [rathall+rhodesia++Minister+of+Finance+and+of+Posts+and+ Telecommunications&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=whitlam Africa Contemporary Record: Annual Survey and Documents, Volume 6], Colin Legum, Africana Publishing Company, 1974
^ US Not Closing Rhodesian Office, The Lewiston Daily Sun, August 27, 1977, page 8
^ US To Restrict Sales To Rhodesia, Reading Eagle, December 12, 1965
^ The Superpowers and Africa: The Constraints of a Rivalry, 1960-1990, Zaki Laïdi University of Chicago Press, 1990, page 55
^ Foreign Affairs for New States: Some Questions of Credentials, Peter John Boyce, University of Queensland Press, January 1977, page 13
^ Confrontation and Accommodation in Southern Africa: The Limits of Independence, Kenneth W. Grundy, University of California Press, 1973, page 257
^ Native Vs. Settler: Ethnic Conflict in Israel/Palestine, Northern Ireland, and South Africa, Thomas G. Mitchell Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000, page 141
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 77
^ Portugal Severs Key Link With Rhodesia, Sarasota Herald-Tribune, April 27, 1970
^ Coming To Terms: Zimbabwe in the International Arena, Richard Schwartz I.B.Tauris, 2001, page 68
^ Salisbury whites queue up to flee, The Age, July 8, 1980
^ a b "The World Factbook". cia.gov. 
^ Published in 2010, research by Ian Scoones on land reform in Masvingo, Zimbabwe.
^ GDP percentage growth 2010 and Tobabcco auctions 2010
^ BBC News, 29 January 2009: Zimbabwe abandons its currency
^ Broadcasting: An Introduction, John R. Bittner, Prentice-Hall International, 1980, page 263
^ Salt, Beryl (1978). The Valiant Years. 


External links[edit]





This article's use of external links may not follow Wikipedia's policies or guidelines. Please improve this article by removing excessive or inappropriate external links, and converting useful links where appropriate into footnote references. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Find more aboutRhodesiaat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Rhodesian Bush War historical research / discussion forum
Rhodesian Bush War Photographs




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rhodesia.



The Viscount disasters of 1978 and 1979
Ironing the lawn in Salisbury – the last days of Rhodesia (The Guardian)
Ian Beckett, an account of the Bush War (in 2 parts)
Rhodesian and South African Military History – An extensive collection of histories and analysis of Rhodesian and South African military operations, to the early 1980s
Window on Rhodesia- An archive of the history and life of Rhodesia.
1975 BBC report on the failure of negotiations between the Rhodesian government and the black nationalists
The Brookings Institution : Managing Ethnic Conflict in Africa – Rhodesia/Zimbabwe
Selby, Angus (2006) "Commercial Farmers and the State: Interest Group Politics and Land Reform in Zimbabwe, 1890–2005", PhD Thesis, Oxford University
Rhodesia Roll of Honour – Those who died in defence of UDI
Constitution of Rhodesia
Rhodesian aviation and comment

Audio and video[edit]

Audio of Ian Smith's radio address announcing UDI
2 years of independence, 1967 Rhodesian MoI film (7 mins) on YouTube
Rhodesia to Zimbabwe, collection of film clips (6 mins) on YouTube
Songs of UDI, 3 songs from 1977 (9 mins) on YouTube







v
t
e


Southern Rhodesia / Rhodesia articles




1890–1923: Company rule; 1923–80: Southern Rhodesia; 1953–63: Federation; 1965–79: Rhodesia under UDI; 1979: Zimbabwe Rhodesia under UDI; 1980–present: Zimbabwe



History



Pre-colonial
Rudd Concession
Company rule

Pioneer Column
First Matabele War
Shangani Patrol
Second Matabele War
Second Boer War
First World War


Southern Rhodesia

colonial history
Second World War
Malayan Emergency involvement
Federation


Unilateral Declaration of Independence

Bush War
1975 Victoria Falls Conference
1976 Geneva Conference
Internal Settlement
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
Lancaster House Agreement


Zimbabwe





Geography







Chimanimani Mountains
Cities and towns
Limpopo River
Zambezi River








Politics







Constitutional history
Districts
Elections
Governor
Mission in Lisbon
Municipalities
Police
Political parties
Central Africa Party
Confederate Party
Dominion Party
Federal Party
Responsible Government Association (RGA)
Rhodesian Action Party (RAP)
Rhodesian Front (RF)
Rhodesia Labour Party (RLP)
Southern Rhodesia African National Congress (SRANC)
Southern Rhodesia Communist Party (SRCP)
Southern Rhodesia Liberal Party (SRLP)
United Federal Party (UFP)
United National Federal Party (UNFP)
United Rhodesia Party
President
Prime Minister
Provinces
Security Forces








Economy







Dollar (currency from 1970)
Pound (currency to 1970)
Reserve Bank
Stock Exchange
Telecommunications
Tourism
Transportation








Society







List of Rhodesians
Public holidays
Rhodesiana





Demographics




Ethnic groups
(diaspora)




Black



Hungwe
Kunda
Lemba
Manyika
Ndebele
Rusape Jews
Shona
Tokaleya
Tonga





White



Afrikaners
British
Greeks
Jews
"Rhodies"





Others



Coloureds (Goffals)
Indians








Languages



Afrikaans
English (South African)
Shona
Sindebele








Symbols



Animal
Anthem
Coat of arms
Emblem
Flags

national


Flower











Category
Portal












v
t
e


Commonwealth realms and dominions



Current



Antigua and Barbuda (monarchy)
Australia (monarchy)
Bahamas (monarchy)
Barbados (monarchy)
Belize (monarchy)
Canada (monarchy)
Grenada (monarchy)
Jamaica (monarchy)
Realm of New Zealand

Cook Islands
New Zealand
Niue


Papua New Guinea (monarchy)
Saint Kitts and Nevis (monarchy)
Saint Lucia (monarchy)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines (monarchy)
Solomon Islands (monarchy)
Tuvalu (monarchy)
United Kingdom (monarchy)





Former



Ceylon
Fiji (monarchy)
The Gambia
Ghana
Guyana
India1
Ireland1 (monarchy)
Kenya
Malawi
Malta
Mauritius
Newfoundland2
Nigeria
Pakistan
Rhodesia3
Sierra Leone
South Africa (monarchy)
Tanganyika
Trinidad and Tobago
Uganda








1 Dominion, became republic before adoption of the term "realm"
2 Dominion, never ratified Statute of Westminster 1931, London-based external government 1934–1949, annexed by Canada in 1949
3 Rhodesia unilaterally declared independence as a realm in 1965, but this was not recognised internationally. Declared itself a republic in 1970.











 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rhodesia&oldid=790867687"					
Categories: Former countries in AfricaStates and territories established in 1965States and territories disestablished in 1979RhodesiaBritish colonisation in AfricaBritish EmpireFormer British colonies and protectorates in AfricaFormer polities of the Cold WarFormer republicsFormer territorial entities in AfricaFormer unrecognized countriesHistory of RhodesiaHistory of ZimbabweOligarchy1965 establishments in Africa1979 disestablishments in Africa1965 establishments in Rhodesia1970s disestablishments in Rhodesia1965 establishments in the British Empire1979 disestablishments in the United KingdomWhite supremacy in AfricaEnglish-speaking countries and territoriesHidden categories: EngvarB from August 2014Use dmy dates from August 2014Use South African English from April 2016All Wikipedia articles written in South African EnglishArticles containing Latin-language textFormer country articles requiring maintenancePages using infobox former country with unknown parametersArticles containing Shona-language textAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2017Articles needing additional references from February 2011All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia external links cleanup from October 2012Wikipedia spam cleanup from October 2012Zimbabwe articles missing geocoordinate dataAll articles needing coordinates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةБеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGalego한국어Bahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიLadinoLatviešuLigureLumbaartМакедонскиमराठीمازِرونیBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 16:58.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rhodesia - Wikipedia






















 






Rhodesia

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Rhodesian)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the unrecognised state of Rhodesia. For the British colony, see Southern Rhodesia. For other uses, see Rhodesia (disambiguation).


Rhodesia


Unrecognised state






1965–1979










Flag (1968)



Coat of arms





Motto
Sit Nomine Digna (Latin)
"May she be worthy of the name"


Anthem
"Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia" (1974–1979)








Royal anthem
"God Save the Queen" (1965–1970)























Capital
Salisbury


Languages
English (official)
Afrikaans, Shona and Ndebele widely spoken


Government
Constitutional monarchy (1965–70)
Parliamentary republic (1970–79)


Head of State



 • 
Monarch
1965–1970

Elizabeth II (Unrecognised by Elizabeth II)


 • 
President
1970–1975

Clifford Dupont (First)


 • 
1979
Henry Everard (Acting president) (Last)


Prime Minister



 • 
1965–1979
Ian Smith


Legislature
Parliament


 • 
Upper house
Senate


 • 
Lower house
House of Assembly


Historical era
Cold War


 • 
Independence (UDI)
11 November 1965


 • 
Republic declared
2 March 1970


 • 
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
1 June 1979


 • 
Republic of Zimbabwe
18 April 1980


Area


 • 
1978
390,580 km2 (150,800 sq mi)


Population


 • 
1978 est.
6,930,000 


     Density
18/km2 (46/sq mi)


Currency
Rhodesian pound (1965–1970)
Rhodesian dollar (1970–1979)







Preceded by
Succeeded by






Southern Rhodesia






Zimbabwe Rhodesia









Today part of
 Zimbabwe


a. The government recognised Queen Elizabeth II as the official Head of State from 1965 to 1970. The highest official of Rhodesia held the title "Officer Administering the Government" (OAtG) as he acted in lieu of the official Governor, who remained at his post but was ignored. After Rhodesia became a republic in March 1970, the President replaced the OAtG as the highest official and the Governor returned to London.


Rhodesia (/roʊˈdiːʒə/), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe. With its capital in Salisbury (now Harare), Rhodesia was considered a de facto successor state to the former British colony of Southern Rhodesia (which had achieved responsible government in 1923).
During an effort to delay an immediate transition to black majority rule, Rhodesia's predominantly white government issued its own Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965. The UDI administration initially sought recognition as an autonomous realm within the Commonwealth of Nations, but reconstituted itself as a republic in 1970.
Following a brutal guerrilla war fought with two African nationalist organisations (Robert Mugabe's ZANU and Joshua Nkomo's ZAPU), Rhodesian premier Ian Smith conceded to bi-racial democracy in 1978. However, a provisional government subsequently headed by Smith and his moderate colleague Abel Muzorewa failed in appeasing international critics or halting the bloodshed. By December 1979, Muzorewa had replaced Smith as Prime Minister and secured an agreement with the militant nationalists, allowing Rhodesia to briefly revert to colonial status pending elections under a universal franchise. It finally achieved internationally recognised independence in April 1980; the nation was concurrently renamed the Republic of Zimbabwe.
A wholly landlocked area, Rhodesia was bordered by South Africa to the south, Bechuanaland (later Botswana) to the southwest, Zambia to the northwest, and Mozambique (a Portuguese province until 1975) to the east. The state was named after Cecil Rhodes, whose British South Africa Company acquired the land in the late 19th century.



Contents


1 Nomenclature
2 History

2.1 Background
2.2 Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)

2.2.1 Impact of UDI


2.3 The Bush War
2.4 End of the Bush War

2.4.1 Late 1970s
2.4.2 Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas
2.4.3 Security Situation Erodes Rapidly


2.5 End of UDI (1979)
2.6 Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)


3 Politics
4 Military and police
5 Foreign relations

5.1 Britain and the UDI
5.2 Sanctions
5.3 International perspective
5.4 Diplomatic relations
5.5 Results


6 Legacy

6.1 Rhodesian media


7 References
8 External links

8.1 Audio and video





Nomenclature[edit]
The official name of the country, according to the constitution adopted concurrently with the Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) in 1965, was Rhodesia. This was not the case under British law, however, which considered the territory's legal name to be Southern Rhodesia, the name given to the country in 1898 during the British South Africa Company's administration of the Rhodesias, and retained by the self-governing colony of Southern Rhodesia after the end of Company rule in 1923.[1]
This naming dispute dated back to October 1964, when Northern Rhodesia became independent from Britain and concurrently changed its name to Zambia. The Southern Rhodesian colonial government in Salisbury felt that in the absence of a "Northern" Rhodesia, the continued use of "Southern" was superfluous. It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government. Salisbury went on using the shortened name in an official manner nevertheless,[2] while the British government continued referring to the country as Southern Rhodesia. This situation continued throughout the UDI period.[1] The shortened name was used by many people including the British government in the House of Commons.
The British government maintained this stance regarding the June–December 1979 successor state of Zimbabwe Rhodesia, and when Zimbabwe Rhodesia returned to colonial status from December 1979 to April 1980, it was as "Southern Rhodesia". Southern Rhodesia subsequently gained international recognition of its independence in April 1980, when it became the Republic of Zimbabwe.
History[edit]



Part of a series on the



History of Zimbabwe





Ancient history


Mapungubwe Kingdom
c.1075–1220


Zimbabwe Kingdom
c.1220–1450


Mutapa Kingdom
c.1450–1760


Torwa dynasty
c.1450–1683





White settlement pre-1923


Rozwi Empire
c.1684–1834


Matabeleland
1838–1894


Rudd Concession
1888


BSA Company rule
1890–1923


First Matabele War
1893–1894


Second Matabele War
1896–1897


World War I involvement
1914–1918


Colony of Southern Rhodesia
1923–1980


World War II involvement
1939–1945


Malayan Emergency
involvement
1948–1960


Federation with Northern
Rhodesia and Nyasaland
1953–1963


Rhodesian Bush War
1964–1979



Unilateral Declaration of
Independence (UDI)

1965


Rhodesia under UDI
1965–1979


Zimbabwe-Rhodesia
June–Dec 1979



Lancaster House Agreement

Dec 1979


British Dependency
1979–1980


Zimbabwe
1980–present


Gukurahundi
1982–1987


Second Congo War
1998–2003





 Zimbabwe portal





v
t
e





Main article: History of Rhodesia
Background[edit]
Until after World War II, the landlocked British possession of Southern Rhodesia was not developed as an indigenous African territory, but rather as a unique state which reflected its multiracial character.[3] This situation certainly made it very different from other lands which existed under colonial rule, as many Europeans had arrived to make permanent homes, populating the towns as traders or settling to farm the most productive soils.[4][5] In 1922, faced with the decision to join the Union of South Africa as a fifth province or accept nearly full internal autonomy, the electorate cast its vote against South African integration.[6][7][8]
In view of the outcome of the referendum, the territory was annexed by the United Kingdom on 12 September 1923.[9][10][11][12] Shortly after annexation, on 1 October 1923, the first constitution for the new Colony of Southern Rhodesia came into force.[11][13] Under this constitution, Southern Rhodesia was given the right to elect its own thirty-member legislature, premier, and cabinet—although the British Crown retained a formal veto over measures affecting natives and dominated foreign policy.[14][15][16]
The Rhodesian authorities provided compensation when the government nationalised enterprises such as the country's railroads, consistently refused to radically alleviate unemployment, and shied from filling civil service posts with partisan appointees. By colonial standards, public services were well-organised and praised for their efficiency.[3]
In 1953, Southern Rhodesia merged with the two other British Central African states to form the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland – a loose association that placed defence and economic direction under a central government but left many domestic affairs under the control of its constituent territories.[17] As it began to appear that decolonisation was inevitable and indigenous black populations were pressing heavily for change,[3] the federation was dissolved in 1963.[18][19][20]

Numbers of white and black inhabitants before and during the Central African Federation[21]

Year
Southern Rhodesia
Northern Rhodesia
Nyasaland
Total


White
Black
White
Black
White
Black
White
Black


1927
38,200 (3.98%)
922,000 (96.02%)
4,000 (0.4%)
1,000,000 (99.6%)
1,700 (0.13%)
1,350,000 (99.87%)
43,900 (1.32%)
3,272,000 (98.68%)


1946
80,500 (4.79%)
1,600,000 (95.21%)
21,919 (1.32%)
1,634,980 (97.68%)
2,300 (0.10%)
2,340,000 (99.90%)
104,719 (1.84%)
5,574,980 (98.16%)


1955
150,000 (5.88%)
2,400,000 (94.12%)
65,000 (3.02%)
2,085,000 (96.98%)
6,300 (0.25%)
2,550,000 (99.75%)
221,300 (3.05%)
7,035,000 (96.95%)


1960
223,000 (7.30%)
2,830,000 (92.70%)
76,000 (3.14%)
2,340,000 (96.85%)
9,300 (0.33%)
2,810,000 (99.66%)
308,300 (3.72%)
7,980,000 (96.28%)


Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)[edit]
Although prepared to grant formal independence to Southern Rhodesia (now Rhodesia), the British government had adopted a policy of no independence before majority rule, dictating that colonies with a substantial population of European settlers would not receive independence except under conditions of majority rule.[22][23][24] Rhodesian colonials initially balked at the suggestion; some felt they had a right to absolute political control, at least for the time being, despite their relatively small numbers.[17][25] The authorities were also disturbed by the post-independence chaos which was plaguing other African nations at the time.[26] However, once Rhodesia had been introduced as a topic for discussion in international bodies, extension of the status quo became a matter of concern to the world community and a serious embarrassment to the United Kingdom.[5]
After the federal break-up in 1963, then-Prime Minister Alec Douglas-Home insisted that preconditions on independence talks hinge on what he termed the "five principles" – unimpeded progress to majority rule, assurance against any future legislation decidedly detrimental to black interests, "improvement in the political status" of local Africans, moves towards ending racial discrimination, and agreement on a settlement which could be "acceptable to the whole population".[27][28][29][30] Harold Wilson and his incoming Labour government took an even harder line on demanding that these points be legitimately addressed before an independence agenda could be set.[5]
By 1964, growing dissatisfaction with the ongoing negotiations ousted Salisbury's incumbent Winston Field, replacing him with Ian Smith, deputy chairman of the conservative Rhodesian Front party.[31][32][33] Smith, the colony's first Rhodesian-born leader, soon came to personify resistance to liberals in British government and those agitating for change at home.[5] He ruled out acceptance for all five of the proposed principles as they stood,[34] implying instead that Rhodesia was already legally entitled to independence—a claim which was overwhelmingly endorsed by registered voters in a referendum.[35][36][37]
Emboldened by the results of this referendum and the subsequent general election, Rhodesia now threatened to assume her own sovereignty without British consent. Harold Wilson countered by warning that such an irregular procedure would be considered treasonous, although he specifically rejected using armed force against the English "kith and kin" in Africa.[38][39][40] Wilson's refusal to consider a military option encouraged Smith to proceed with his plans. Talks quickly broke down, and final efforts in October to achieve a settlement floundered; the Rhodesian Front remained unwilling to accept what were regarded as unacceptably drastic terms and the British would settle for nothing less – it was a formula doomed to failure.[5]




Ian Smith signs the Unilateral Declaration of Independence.



The mantle of the pioneers has fallen on our shoulders to sustain civilisation in a primitive country.
— Ian Smith, 11 November 1965, upon the announcement of UDI[41]

On 11 November 1965, following a brief but solemn consensus, Rhodesia's leading statesmen issued their country's unilateral declaration of independence (UDI).[3][42][43] This was immediately denounced as an "act of rebellion against the Crown" in the United Kingdom, and Wilson promised that the illegal action would be short-lived.[44][45] However, few seemed to initially realise that Rhodesia was no longer within the Commonwealth's direct sphere of influence and British rule was now a constitutional fiction; Salisbury remained virtually immune to credible metropolitan leverage.[17]
On 12 October 1965, the United Nations General Assembly had noted the repeated threats of the Rhodesian authorities "to declare unilaterally the independence of Southern Rhodesia, in order to perpetuate minority rule", and called upon Wilson to use all means at his disposal (including military force) to prevent the Rhodesian Front from asserting independence.[46] After UDI was proclaimed, UN officials branded Ian Smith's government as an "illegal racist minority regime"[47] and called on member states to sever economic ties with Rhodesia, recommending sanctions on petroleum products and military hardware.[5] In December 1966, these measures became mandatory, extending to bar the purchase of Rhodesian tobacco, chrome, copper, asbestos, sugar, meat, and hides.[5]
Britain, having already adopted extensive sanctions of its own, dispatched a Royal Navy squadron to monitor oil deliveries in the port of Beira in Mozambique, from which a strategic pipeline ran to Umtali in Rhodesia. The warships were to deter "by force, if necessary, vessels reasonably believed to be carrying oil destined for (Southern) Rhodesia".[48][49]
Some nations, such as Switzerland, and West Germany, which were not UN members, conducted business legally with Rhodesia – the latter remained the Smith government's largest trading partner in Western Europe until 1973, when Bonn joined the UN.[5] Japan continued to accept more Rhodesian exports than any other nation, and Iran provided oil.[50] The Portuguese government marketed Rhodesian products as its own, via false certificates of origin and disguised trade channels.[51] South Africa openly refused to observe the UN sanctions.[52][53] A 1971 amendment passed in the United States permitted American firms to go on importing Rhodesian chromium and nickel as normal.[54]
Despite the poor showing of sanctions, Rhodesia found it nearly impossible to obtain diplomatic recognition abroad. In 1970, the US government had made it clear that the UDI would not be recognised "under [any] circumstances".[55] Even Smith's ideological allies in Pretoria, although sympathetic, failed to recognise the new country on an equal level.[56]
Initially, the state retained its pledged loyalty to Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom, recognising her as Queen of Rhodesia.[5] When Smith and Deputy Prime Minister Clifford Dupont called on colonial Governor, Sir Humphrey Gibbs, to formally notify him of the UDI, Gibbs condemned the UDI as an act of treason. After Smith formally announced the UDI on the radio, Gibbs sacked the entire cabinet on orders from Whitehall. However, he was unable to enact any concrete actions to foster a return to legality. Government ministers simply ignored his notices, pointing out that UDI made his office obsolete. Even so, Gibbs continued to occupy his residence in Salisbury until 1970, when he vacated the premises and left Rhodesia following the declaration of a republic.[57] He had effectively been superseded before then; on 20 December 1965, Smith named Dupont as "Officer Administering the Government"; an earlier attempt to have him named as Governor-General of Rhodesia was dismissed out of hand.[5]
In September 1968, the Appellate Division of the Rhodesian High Court ruled that Ian Smith's administration had become the de jure government of the country, not merely the de facto one.[58] To support his decision, Chief Justice Sir Hugh Beadle used several statements made by Hugo Grotius, who maintained that there was no way in which a nation could rightly claim to be governing a particular territory – if it was waging a war against that territory. Beadle argued that due to Britain's economic war against Rhodesia, she could not (at the same point) be described as governing Rhodesia.[59][60] Resulting court decisions held that the rebel government "could lawfully do anything its predecessors could lawfully have done".[61]
A Salisbury commission chaired by prominent lawyer W.R. Waley was appointed to study constitutional options open to the Rhodesian authorities as of April 1968, but reaching a further settlement with the British was ruled out early on.[17][62] Waley, although insistent that "Europeans must surrender any belief in permanent European domination", also testified that majority rule was not desirable immediately.[5]
Talks aimed at easing the differences between Rhodesia and the United Kingdom were carried out aboard Royal Navy vessels once in December 1966 and again in October 1968.[63][64][65] Both efforts failed to achieve agreement, although Harold Wilson added a sixth principle to the five he had previously enunciated: "it would be necessary to ensure that, regardless of race, there was no oppression of the majority by the minority or of [any] minority by the majority." Rhodesian resolve stiffened following a failure to reach a new settlement, with more radical elements of the Rhodesian Front calling for a republican constitution.[5]
During a two-proposition referendum held in 1969, the proposal for severing all remaining ties to the British Crown passed by a majority of 61,130 votes to 14,327.[5] Rhodesia declared itself a republic on 2 March 1970. Under the new constitution, a president served as ceremonial head of state, with the prime minister nominally reporting to him.[66] Some in Rhodesian government had hoped in vain that the declaration of a republic would finally prompt other nations to grant recognition.[67]
Impact of UDI[edit]
The years following Rhodesia's UDI saw an unfolding series of economic, military, and political pressures placed on the country which eventually brought about majority rule, a totality of these factors rather than any one the reason for introducing change.[68] In 2005, a conference at the London School of Economics which discussed Rhodesia's independence concluded that UDI was sparked by an existing racial conflict complicated by Cold War intrigues.[69]
Critics of UDI sought to maintain that Ian Smith intended only to safeguard the privileges of an entrenched colonial elite at the expense of the impoverished African community. According to this logic, UDI created a vacuum of oppression which was eventually filled by Robert Mugabe's present dictatorship.[70] Smith and his supporters continued to defend their actions, however, by claiming that the Rhodesian majority was too inexperienced at the time to manage effectively a developed nation.[26]
At large, the European population's emerging attitude to UDI was tense. Many white Rhodesians had seen themselves as nothing less than fully fledged members of the British Empire, carrying on the same rugged values and frontier spirit of the early Englishmen who had settled in 1890.[42] But such confidence was rudely shaken by Whitehall's refusal to grant independence on their terms. After 1965, there were those who continued to claim that they were collectively upholders of principle and defenders of such values against the twin threats of communism, manifested through the militant black nationalists, and – ironically – the decadence of Britain herself.[42] Often repeated appeals to the Christian heritage of their pioneer ancestors in "defending the free world" reflected these beliefs.[42]
African parties displayed initial horror at Smith's declaration, with one ZANU official stating, "...for all those who cherish freedom and a meaningful life, UDI has set a collision course which cannot be altered. 11 November 1965 [has] marked the turning point of the struggle for freedom in that land from a constitutional and political one to primarily a military struggle."[43] It would, however, be several years before even the most radical nationalists chose to develop a coherent strategy revolving around armed resistance, preferring instead to create opportunities for external intervention.[43]
Because Rhodesian exports were generally competitive and had previously been entitled to preferential treatment on the British market, the former colony did not recognise the need for escalating the pace of diversification before independence. Following the UDI, however, Rhodesia began to demonstrate that she had the potential to develop a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency.[26][71] After the Rhodesian Front began introducing incentives accorded to domestic production, industrial output expanded dramatically. A rigid system of countermeasures enacted to combat sanctions succeeded in blunting their impact for at least a decade.[5] Over the next nine years Rhodesian companies, spiting the freezing of their assets and blocking of overseas accounts, also perfected cunning techniques of sanctions evasion through both local and foreign subsidiaries, which operated on a clandestine trade network.[5]
From 1968 until 1970, there was virtually no further dialogue between Rhodesia and the UK. This altered immediately after the ascension of Edward Heath, who reopened negotiations.[72] Smith remained optimistic that Heath would do his utmost to remedy Anglo-Rhodesian relations, although disappointed that he continued to adhere publicly to the original "five principles" proposed by Alec Douglas-Home, now foreign secretary. In November 1971, Douglas-Home renewed contacts with Salisbury and announced a proposed agreement which would be satisfactory to both sides – it recognised Rhodesia's 1969 constitution as the legal frame of government, while agreeing that gradual legislative representation was an acceptable formula for unhindered advance to majority rule.[5] Nevertheless, the new settlement, if approved, would also implement an immediate improvement in black political status, offer a means to terminate racial discrimination, and provide a solid guarantee against retrogressive constitutional amendments.[73]
Implementation of the proposed settlement hinged on popular acceptance, but the Rhodesian government consistently refused to submit it to a universal referendum.[5] A twenty four-member commission headed by an eminent jurist, Lord Pearce, was therefore tasked with ascertaining public opinion on the subject.[74] In 1972, the commission began interviewing interest groups and sampling opinions – although concern was expressed over the widespread apathy encountered.[26] According to every published finding, whites were in favour of the settlement, and Rhodesians of mixed or Asian background generally pleased, while black reaction was resoundingly negative.[72][75] As many as thirty African chiefs and politicians voiced their opposition, prompting Britain to withdraw from the proposals on the grounds of the commission's report.[74]
The Bush War[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Bush War
As early as 1960, minority rule in Southern Rhodesia was already being challenged by a rising tide of political violence led by African nationalists such as Joshua Nkomo and Ndabaningi Sithole. After their public campaigns were initially suppressed, many believed that negotiation was completely incapable of meeting their aspirations. Petrol bombings by radicals became increasingly common, with the Zimbabwe Review observing in 1961, "for the first time home-made petrol bombs were used by freedom fighters in Salisbury against settler establishments."[76] It was officially noted that between January and September 1962 alone, 33 bombings were carried out, in addition to 27 acts of attempted sabotage on communications. In that same period, nationalists were implicated in arson targeting 18 schools and 10 churches.[43] Nkomo's Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU) subsequently disclosed that it had formed a military wing (Zimbabwe People's Revolutionary Army, ZIPRA), and 'the decision to start bringing in arms and ammunition and to send young men away for sabotage training' had already been made. The Rhodesian authorities responded by banning ZAPU and driving its supporters underground.[77] Frustrated by their repeated failures, nationalists also conducted a campaign of terror against black Africans, murdering those who had either identified with the colonial administration or had simply failed to demonstrate their allegiance to the cause.[43] To protect civilians, emergency laws were imposed, broadening the legal definition of unlawful gatherings and giving the police greater powers to crack down on agitators or subversives.[78] The death sentence was also introduced for terrorism involving explosives and arson.[5]
A crisis of confidence soon resulted across ZAPU, which was already suffering from poor morale, compounded by tribal and ideological factionalism. In 1963, party dissidents rejected Joshua Nkomo's authority and formed their own organisation, the Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU) – which worked out its own strategy for impressing international opinion, undermining white assurance, and achieving a complete breakdown of order. By August 1964, ZANU, which had brutally intimidated neutrals and opponents alike, was outlawed by authorities as well.[79]
ZANU's agenda was inward-looking, leftist, and pan-Africanist in nature. Ndabaningi Sithole and avowed Marxist Robert Mugabe, its most prominent leaders, demanded a one party Zimbabwean state with majority rule and a public monopoly on land.[5] After being forced from Rhodesia, they continued to operate in exile, creating occupation groups representing urban workers, miners, and peasant farmers. ZANU also attracted professionals, students, and feminists to its ranks. While ZAPU theoretically continued to command the allegiance of most Ndebele and Shona activists, Sithole and Mugabe drew their support from the Mashonaland countryside.[5]
After the UDI, ZANU officials mapped an elaborate plan for the "liberation of Zimbabwe" which called for attacks on white farmers, destruction of cash crops, disrupting electricity in urban areas, and petrol bombings.[43] Sithole and Nkomo both insisted on the need for armed struggle, but disagreed on the means to go about it. For example, ZAPU tended to follow Soviet thinking, placing an emphasis on sophisticated weaponry in the hopes of winning a conventional battle like the Viet Minh at Dien Bien Phu. ZANU preferred to politicise populations in areas which they intended to seize.[68] Neither force, however, had acquired basic knowledge of guerrilla warfare. Debate on political theory and insurgent tactics became the obsession of nationalists at this stage.[43]




Soldier interrogates Rhodesian villagers about insurgent activity in late 1977. This photograph became one of the most enduring images of the bush war.


In April 1966, two Zimbabwe African National Liberation Army (ZANLA – the military wing of ZANU) units, having received prior training at Nanjing Military College, crossed into Rhodesia from Zambia. They were armed with SKS carbines, Chinese hand grenades, explosives, and communist pamphlets, having been issued vague instructions to sabotage important installations before killing white persons indiscriminately.[43] At least five guerrillas were simply arrested before getting very far. Another seven hoped to destroy a pylon carrying electricity to Sinoia in the northwest. Their faulty demolitions were uncovered by the Rhodesian Security Forces and the men easily tracked to a nearby ranch on 28 April, where they were shot resisting capture.[68][80][81] This event is considered to have been the first engagement of what came to be known as the "Bush War" in Rhodesia and the "Second Chimurenga" (or rebellion in Shona) by supporters of the guerrillas.[82]
The campaign proper is generally considered to have started in 1972 with the Attack on Altena Farm, despite the minor threat already represented by the nationalist movements in the 1960s.
After unsuccessful appeals to Britain and the United States for military assistance, Robert Mugabe, who was based in Mozambique after that country's independence from Portugal in 1975, led ZANU to seek support from the People's Republic of China and countries of the Soviet Bloc. Joshua Nkomo, based in Zambia and also supported by the Soviet Union, led ZAPU.[83] ZANU and ZAPU together formed 'the Patriotic Front'. Broadly, ZANLA recruited mainly from Mashonaland and Manicaland provinces, whilst the ZIPRA recruited from Mashonaland West, Midlands and Matabeleland provinces of Zimbabwe.
After the collapse of Portuguese rule in Mozambique in 1974–75, it was no longer viable for the Smith regime to sustain white minority rule indefinitely. By this time, even South Africa's Vorster had come to this view. While Vorster was unwilling to make concessions to his own country's blacks, he concluded that white minority rule was not sustainable in a country where blacks outnumbered whites 22:1.[83] In 1978, there were 270,000 Rhodesians of European descent and more than six million Africans.[84]
International business groups involved in the country (e.g. Lonrho) transferred their support from the Rhodesian government to black nationalist parties. Business leaders and politicians feted Nkomo on his visits to Europe. ZANU also attracted business supporters who saw the course that future events were likely to take.[85] Funding and arms support provided by supporters, particularly from the Soviet Union and its allies in the latter 1970s, allowed both ZIPRA and the ZANLA to acquire more sophisticated weaponry, thereby increasing the military pressure that the guerrillas were able to place on Rhodesia.
Until 1972, containing the guerrillas was little more than a police action. Even as late as August 1975 when Rhodesian government and black nationalist leaders met at Victoria Falls for negotiations brokered by South Africa and Zambia, the talks never got beyond the procedural phase.[86] Rhodesian representatives made it clear they were prepared to fight an all out war to prevent majority rule.[87] However, the situation changed dramatically after the end of Portuguese colonial rule in Mozambique in 1975. Rhodesia now found itself almost entirely surrounded by hostile states and even South Africa, its only real ally, pressed for a settlement.

Having let slip one chance after another of reaching an accommodation with more moderate black leaders, Rhodesia's whites seem to have made the tragic choice of facing black nationalism over the barrel of a gun rather than the conference table. The downhill road toward a race war in Rhodesia is becoming increasingly slippery with blood.
— Rand Daily Mail editorial, May 1976[88]

At this point, ZANU's alliance with FRELIMO (the Liberation Front of Mozambique) and the porous border between Mozambique and eastern Rhodesia enabled large-scale training and infiltration of ZANU/ZANLA fighters. The governments of Zambia and Botswana were also emboldened sufficiently to allow resistance movement bases to be set up in their territories. Guerrillas began to launch operations deep inside Rhodesia, attacking roads, railways, economic targets and isolated security force positions, in 1976.[89]




Rhodesian servicewoman takes aim with her Browning Hi-Power 9×19mm semi-automatic pistol; from a 1976 army recruitment poster


The government adopted a 'strategic hamlets' policy of the kind used in Malaya and Vietnam to restrict the influence of insurgents over the population of rural areas. Local people were forced to relocate to protected villages (PVs) which were strictly controlled and guarded by the government against rebel atrocities. The protected villages were compared by the guerrillas to concentration camps. Some contemporary accounts claim that this interference in the lives of local residents induced many of them who had previously been neutral to support the guerrillas.[90]
The war degenerated into rounds of increasing brutality from all three parties involved (ZANU and ZAPU, and the Rhodesian Army fighting off their attacks). Mike Subritzky, a former NZ Army ceasefire monitor in Rhodesia, in 1980 described the war as "both bloody and brutal and brought out the very worst in the opposing combatants on all three sides."[91]
End of the Bush War[edit]









The geographical situation in 1965 (left, on UDI) and 1975 (right, after the independence of Mozambique and Angola from Portugal). Green: Rhodesia; purple: friendly nations; orange: hostile states.


Rhodesia began to lose vital economic and military support from South Africa, which, while sympathetic to the white minority government, never accorded it diplomatic recognition. The South African government placed limits on the fuel and munitions they supplied to the Rhodesian military. They also withdrew the personnel and equipment that they had previously provided to aid the war effort, though covert military support continued.[92]
In 1976, the South African government and United States governments worked together to place pressure on Smith to agree to a form of majority rule. In response to the initiative of US Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, in 1976 Ian Smith accepted the principle of black majority rule within two years.[92] The Rhodesians now offered more concessions, but those concessions, focused on reaching an "internal settlement" with moderate black leaders, were insufficient to end the war.
At the time, some Rhodesians said the still embittered history between the British-dominated Rhodesia and the Afrikaner-dominated South Africa partly led South African government to withdraw its aid to Rhodesia. Ian Smith said in his memoirs that even though many white South Africans supported Rhodesia, South African Prime Minister John Vorster's policy of détente with the Black African states ended up with Rhodesia being offered as the "sacrificial lamb" to buy more time for South Africa. Other observers perceived South Africa's distancing itself from Rhodesia as being an early move in the process that led to majority rule in South Africa itself.[93]

In 1976 South Africa saw settlement of the Rhodesian question as vital on several fronts: to cauterise the wound of the psychological blow … caused by her defeat in the Angolan conflict; to pre-empt possible Cuban intervention in Rhodesia and the possibility of South Africa being sucked into another Cold War regional conflict without the support and endorsement of the western powers
— Dr Sue Onslow, South Africa and UDI[94]


In the latter 1970s, the militants had successfully put the economy of Rhodesia under significant pressure while the numbers of guerrillas in the country were steadily increasing.[95][96] The government abandoned its early strategy of trying to defend the borders in favour of trying to defend key economic areas and lines of communication with South Africa, while the rest of the countryside became a patchwork of "no-go areas".
Late 1970s[edit]
By the late 1970s, Rhodesia's front-line forces contained about 25,000 regular troops and police – backed up by relatively strong army and police reserves.[97] Its mechanised contingent consisted of light armoured cars and improvised mine-protected armoured personnel carriers, complemented by eight tanks (Polish built T-55LD tanks), delivered in the last year of the war. The Rhodesian Air Force operated an assortment of both Canberra light bombers, Hawker Hunter fighter bombers, older de Havilland Vampire jets as well as a somewhat antiquated, but still potent, helicopter arm. These forces, including highly trained special operations units, were capable of launching devastating raids on resistance movement camps outside the country, as in Operation Dingo in 1977 and other similar operations.
Nevertheless, guerrilla pressure inside the country itself was steadily increasing in the latter 1970s. By 1978–79, the war had become a contest between the guerrilla warfare placing ever increasing pressure on the Rhodesian regime and civil population and the Rhodesian government's strategy of trying to hold off the militants until external recognition for a compromise political settlement with moderate black leaders could be secured.
By this time, the need to cut a deal was apparent to most Rhodesians, but not to all. Ian Smith had dismissed his intransigent Defence Minister, P. K. van der Byl, as early as 1976.[98] "PK" had been a hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opposition or the international community since before UDI.

...it is better to fight to the last man and the last cartridge and die with some honour. Because, what is being presented to us here is a degree of humiliation...
— P. K. van der Byl in 1977, commenting on a British peace plan.[99]

Van der Byl eventually retired to his country estate outside Cape Town, but there were elements in Rhodesia, mainly embittered former security force personnel, who forcibly opposed majority rule up to and well beyond the establishment of majority rule.[100] New white immigrants continued to arrive in Rhodesia right up to the eve of majority rule.[101]
Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas[edit]
Main article: Rhodesia and weapons of mass destruction
The program's primary purpose was to kill guerrillas whether they were recruits transiting to camps in Mozambique or guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia. The CBW effort took on the guerrilla threat from three fronts.[102] First, the effort aimed to eliminate guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia through contaminated supplies either provided by contact men, recovered from hidden caches, or stolen from rural stores.[103] Secondly, the effort worked to contaminate water supplies along guerrilla infiltration routes into Rhodesia, forcing the guerrillas either to travel through arid regions to carry more water and less ammunition or travel through areas patrolled by the security forces.[104] Finally, the Rhodesians sought to hit the guerrillas in their camps in Mozambique by poisoning food, beverages, and medicines.
The chemicals most used in the Rhodesian program were parathion (an organophosphate insecticide) and thallium (a heavy metal commonly found in rodenticide).[105] The Rhodesians selected for use also included Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera) and possibly Bacillus anthracis (causative agent of anthrax). They also looked at using Rickettsia prowazekii (causative agent of epidemic typhus), and Salmonella typhi (causative agent of typhoid fever), and toxins—such as ricin and botulinum toxin.[102]
Biological agents, namely Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera), had some impact on the fighting capability of ZANLA.[106] Some former officers of the Rhodesian Security Forces alleged that anthrax was covertly used by Rhodesian psy-ops units during the late 1970s, but these statements are unfounded. Rhodesia never possessed the capability to produce anthrax spores on the scale needed for widespread dissemination.[102] Use of anthracis, ricin, or botulinum toxin would have been confined to assassination attempts.[102] Some more-merited allegations are that the South African government's top-secret chemical and biological weapons program, a progenitor of Project Coast, used Rhodesia as a "laboratory".[106]
Security Situation Erodes Rapidly[edit]
The work of journalists such as Lord Richard Cecil, son of the Marquess of Salisbury, stiffened the morale of Rhodesians and their overseas supporters.[107] Lord Richard produced regular news reports such as the Thames TV 'Frontline Rhodesia' features. These reports typically contrasted the incompetent insurgents with the "superbly professional" government troops.[108] A group of ZANLA fighters killed Lord Richard on 20 April 1978 when he was accompanying a Rhodesian airborne unit employed in Fire Force Operations.[109]
The shooting down on 3 September 1978 of the civilian Vickers Viscount airliner Hunyani, Air Rhodesia Flight RH825, in the Kariba area by ZIPRA fighters using a surface-to-air missile, with the subsequent massacre of its survivors, is widely considered to be the event that finally destroyed the Rhodesians' will to continue the war. Although militarily insignificant, the loss of this aircraft (and a second Viscount, the Umniati, in 1979) demonstrated the reach of resistance movements extended to Rhodesian civil society.[110]
The Rhodesians' means to continue the war were also eroding fast. In December 1978, a ZANLA unit penetrated the outskirts of Salisbury and fired a volley of rockets and incendiary device rounds into the main oil storage depot – the most heavily defended economic asset in the country. The storage tanks burned for five days, giving off a column of smoke that could be seen 130 kilometres (80 mi) away. Five hundred thousand barrels (79,000 m3) of petroleum product (comprising Rhodesia's strategic oil reserve) were lost.[111]
The government's defence spending increased from R$30 million, 8.5% of the national budget in 1971 to 1972, to R$400 m in 1978 to 1979, 47% of the national budget. In 1980, the post-independence government of Zimbabwe inherited a US$500 million national debt.[112]
End of UDI (1979)[edit]




Signing the Rhodesian Internal Settlement (from left: Bishop Abel Muzorewa, Ian Smith, Jeremiah Chirau and Ndabaningi Sithole)


The Rhodesian army continued its "mobile counter-offensive" strategy of holding key positions ("vital asset ground") while carrying out raids into the no-go areas and into neighbouring countries. While often extraordinarily successful in inflicting heavy guerrilla casualties, such raids also on occasion failed to achieve their objectives. In April 1979 special forces carried out a raid on Joshua Nkomo's residence in Lusaka (Zambia) with the stated intention of assassinating him.[113] Nkomo and his family left hastily a few hours before the raid – having clearly been warned that the raid was coming.
In 1979, some special forces units were accused of using counterinsurgent operations as cover for ivory poaching and smuggling. Colonel Reid-Daly (commander of the Selous Scouts) discovered that his phone was bugged and after challenging a superior officer on this issue was court martialled for insubordination. He received the lightest sentence possible, a caution, but he continued to fight his conviction and eventually resigned his commission and left the Army.
By 1978–79, up to 70% of the regular army was composed of black soldiers (though both the army and police reserves remained overwhelmingly white). By 1979 there were also 30 black commissioned officers in the regular army. While there was never any suggestion of disloyalty among the soldiers from predominantly black units (in particular within the Selous Scouts or the Rhodesian African Rifles – RAR), some argue that, by the time of the 1980 election, many of the RAR soldiers voted for Robert Mugabe.[114]
As the result of an Internal Settlement signed on 3 March 1978 between the Rhodesian government and the moderate African nationalist parties, which were not in exile and not involved in the war, elections were held in April 1979. The United African National Council (UANC) party won a majority in this election, and its leader, Abel Muzorewa (a United Methodist Church bishop), became the country's first black prime minister on 1 June 1979. The country's name was changed to Zimbabwe Rhodesia. The internal settlement left control of the country's police, security forces, civil service and judiciary in white hands, for the moment. It assured whites of about one third of the seats in parliament. It was essentially a power-sharing arrangement between whites and blacks which, in the eyes of many, particularly the insurgents, did not amount to majority rule.[115] However, the United States Senate voted to end economic sanctions against Zimbabwe Rhodesia on 12 June.[116]
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU. In spite of offers from Ian Smith, the latter parties declined to participate in an election in which their political position would be insecure and under a proposed constitution which they had played no part in drafting and which was perceived as retaining strong white minority privilege.
Bishop Muzorewa's government did not receive international recognition. The Bush War continued unabated and sanctions were not lifted. The international community refused to accept the validity of any agreement which did not incorporate the main nationalist parties. The British Government (then led by the recently elected Margaret Thatcher) issued invitations to all parties to attend a peace conference at Lancaster House. These negotiations took place in London in late 1979. The three-month-long conference almost failed to reach conclusion, due to disagreements on land reform, but resulted in the Lancaster House Agreement. UDI ended, and Rhodesia temporarily reverted to the status of a British colony (the 'Colony of Southern Rhodesia').[117]
The Lancaster House Agreement further provided for a ceasefire which was followed by an internationally supervised general election, held on February 1980. ZANU led by Robert Mugabe won this election, some alleged,[who?] by terrorising its political opposition, including supporters of ZAPU, through former insurgents that had not confined themselves to the designated guerrilla assembly points, as stipulated by the Lancaster House Agreement. The observers and the newly installed governor Lord Soames were accused of looking the other way, and Mugabe's victory was certified. Nevertheless, few could doubt that Mugabe's support within his majority Shona tribal group was extremely strong. The Rhodesian military seriously considered mounting a coup against a perceived stolen election ("Operation Quartz") to prevent ZANU from taking over the country.[118] The alleged coup was to include the assassination of Mugabe and coordinated assaults on guerrilla assembly points throughout the country. The plan was eventually scuttled, as it was obvious that Mugabe enjoyed widespread support from the black majority despite voter intimidation, as well as the fact that the coup would gain no external support, and a conflagration which would engulf the country was seen as inevitable.
Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)[edit]
Mugabe and the victorious black nationalists were rather less concerned by Operation Quartz than by the possibility that there might be a mass exodus of the white community of the kind that had caused chaos in Mozambique five years earlier. Such an exodus had been prepared for by the South African government. With the agreement of the British Governor of Rhodesia, South African troops had entered the country to secure the road approaches to the Beit Bridge border crossing point. Refugee camps had been prepared in the Transvaal. On the day the election results became known, most white families had prepared contingency plans for flight, including the packing of cars and suitcases.
However, after a meeting with Robert Mugabe and the central committee of ZANU (PF), Ian Smith was reassured that whites could, and should stay in the new Zimbabwe. Mugabe promised that he would abide strictly by the terms of the Lancaster House Agreement and that changes in Zimbabwe would be made gradually and by proper legal process. In a CBS news interview, Mugabe claimed that Rhodesian whites "...are still in control of the economy, the majority being commercial farmers.",[119] Mugabe however, would reverse his commitment to these agreements some years later; the regime began confiscating white owned farm lands. This is widely blamed for leading to the deterioration of the Zimbabwean economy which plagues the country today.[120]
On 18 April 1980 the country became independent as the Republic of Zimbabwe, and its capital, Salisbury, was renamed Harare two years later.
Politics[edit]



Rhodesia






This article is part of a series on the
politics and government of
Rhodesia




Constitutional history



— Overview
1890–1923  BSA Company rule
1923–1980  Southern Rhodesia
1953–1963  Rhodesia–Nyasaland Federation
1965–1979  Rhodesia under UDI
 1979  Zimbabwe Rhodesia (under UDI)









Government


Governor / President
Prime Minister








Legislature



1899–1923  Legislative Council
1924–1970  Legislative Assembly









Elections


General


1924 1928 1933 1934 1939 1946 1948 1954 1958 1962 1965 1970 1974 1977 1979 1980



Legislative Council


1899 1902 1905 1908 1911 1914 1920



Referendums


1922 1934 1953 1961 1964 1969 1979











Political parties


African National Congress
Communist Party
Labour Party
Liberal Party
Rhodesia Party
Rhodesian Action Party
Rhodesian Front
United African National Council
United Federal Party

Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU)


Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU)









Foreign relations



Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI)

Mission in Lisbon
Passport








National symbols


Flag (other flags)
Anthem









Other countries
Atlas








v
t
e





Main article: Politics of Rhodesia




The Presidential flag of Rhodesia.


Although Southern Rhodesia never gained full dominion status within the Commonwealth of Nations, Southern Rhodesians ruled themselves from the attainment of 'Responsible Government' in 1923. Its electoral register had property and education qualifications. Over the years various electoral arrangements made at a national and municipal level upheld these standards. For example, the franchise for the first Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council election in 1899 contained the following requirement:

"voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth £75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of £50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months' continuous residence was also required for qualifications (b) and (c)."

Following Cecil Rhodes's dictum of "equal rights for all civilised men", there was no overt racial component to the franchise. However, the requirement excluded a majority of native blacks from the electorate.
Up until the 1950s, Southern Rhodesia had a vibrant political life with right and left wing parties competing for power. The Rhodesian Labour Party held seats in the Assembly and in municipal councils throughout the 1920s and 1930s. From 1953 to 1958, the prime minister was Garfield Todd, a liberal who did much to promote the development of the Black community through investment in education, housing and healthcare. However, the government forced Todd from office because his proposed reforms were seen by many whites as too radical.
From 1958 onwards, white settler politics consolidated and ossified around resistance to majority rule, setting the stage for UDI. The 1961 Constitution governed Southern Rhodesia and independent Rhodesia up until 1969, using the Westminster Parliamentary System modified by a system of separate voter rolls with differing property and education qualifications, without regard to race. Whites ended up with the majority of Assembly seats.
The 1969 republican constitution established a bicameral Parliament consisting of an indirectly elected Senate and a directly elected House of Assembly, effectively reserving the majority of seats for whites. The office of President had only ceremonial significance with the Prime Minister holding executive power.
The Constitution of the short-lived Zimbabwe Rhodesia, which saw a black-led government elected for the first time, reserved 28 of the 100 parliamentary seats for whites. The independence constitution agreed at Lancaster House watered those provisions down and reserved 20 out of 100 seats for whites in the House of Assembly and 8 out of 40 seats in the Senate. The constitution prohibited Zimbabwe authorities from altering the Constitution for seven years without unanimous consent and required a three-quarters vote in Parliament for a further three years. The government amended the Constitution in 1987 to abolish the seats reserved for whites, and replace the office of Prime Minister with an executive President. In 1990, the government abolished the Senate.
Military and police[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Security Forces
Rhodesian Security Forces consisted of the Rhodesian Army, Royal Rhodesian Air Force, British South Africa Police, Rhodesian Ministry of Internal Affairs (INTAF) and the Guard Force. Despite the impact of economic and diplomatic sanctions, Rhodesia was able to develop and maintain a potent and professional military capability.[121] Time magazine reported in June 1977 that "man for man, the Rhodesian army ranks among the world's finest fighting units."[122]
Foreign relations[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2011) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Throughout the period of its Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965 to 1979), Rhodesia pursued a foreign policy of attempting to secure recognition as an independent country, and insisting that its political system would include 'gradual steps to majority rule.' Ardently anti-communist, Rhodesia tried to present itself to the West as a front-line state against communist expansion in Africa, to little avail. Rhodesia received little international recognition during its existence; recognition only occurred after elections in 1980 and a transition to majority rule.
Rhodesia wished to retain its economic prosperity and also feared communist elements in the rebel forces, and thus felt their policy of a gradual progression to black majority rule was justified. However, the international community refused to accept this rationale, believing that their policies were perpetuating racism. This attitude was part of the larger decolonisation context, during which Western powers such as the United Kingdom, France, and Belgium hastened to grant independence to their colonies in Africa.
Britain and the UDI[edit]
Rhodesia was originally a British colony. Although decolonisation in Africa had begun after World War II, it began accelerating in the early 1960s, causing Britain to negotiate independence rapidly with several of its colonies. During this period, it adopted a foreign policy called NIBMAR, or No Independence Before Majority African Rule, mandating democratic reforms that placed governance in the hands of the majority black Africans. The governing white minority of Rhodesia, led by Ian Smith, opposed the policy and its implications. On 11 November 1965, Rhodesia's minority white government made a unilateral declaration of independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom, as it became apparent that negotiations would not lead to independence under the white regime.
The United Kingdom government immediately brought in legislation (Southern Rhodesia Act 1965) which formally abolished all Rhodesian government institutions. This move made life difficult for Rhodesian citizens who wished to travel internationally as passports issued by Rhodesia's UDI administration were not recognised as valid;[123] in January 1966, the British issued a statement accepting as valid any passport issued before the declaration of independence and allowing six-month United Kingdom passports to be granted when they expired – provided that the bearer declared they did not intend to aid the UDI Rhodesian government.[124]
Until late 1969, Rhodesia still recognised Queen Elizabeth II as head of state, even though it opposed the British government itself for hindering its goals of independence. The Queen, however, refused to accept the title Queen of Rhodesia. Eventually, the Smith government abandoned attempts to remain loyal to the Crown, and in 1969, a majority of the electorate voted in referendum to declare Rhodesia a republic. They hoped that this move would facilitate recognition as an independent state by the international community, but the issues of white minority control remained and hindered this effort, and like the UDI before it, the proclamation of a republic lacked international recognition.
Sanctions[edit]
After the declaration of independence, and indeed for the entire duration of its existence, Rhodesia did not receive official recognition from any state, although it did maintain diplomatic relations with South Africa, which was then under apartheid. South Africa did not recognise Rhodesia to preserve its fragile positions with other nations, but frequently assisted the republic. Portugal maintained informal relations until the Carnation Revolution of 1974. The day following the declaration of independence, the United Nations Security Council passed a resolution (S/RES/216) calling upon all states not to accord Rhodesia recognition, and to refrain from any assistance. The Security Council also imposed selective mandatory economic sanctions, which were later made comprehensive.
Malawi,[125] Israel, South Africa, Portugal, and Iran did not comply with economic sanctions against Rhodesia.[126] The US, despite voting in favor of the sanctions at the UNSC, violated them to buy chrome ore from Rhodesia.[127] Kenneth Kaunda, president of Zambia, also accused western oil companies of violating the sanctions and selling oil to Rhodesia.[128]
International perspective[edit]
Rhodesia's Unilateral Declaration of Independence from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965 was promptly condemned by the international community. The United Nations Security Council Resolution 216 of 12 November 1965 called "upon all States not to recognise this illegal racist minority regime in Southern Rhodesia."[129]
Rhodesia campaigned for international acceptance and invoked the doctrine of non-intervention in internal affairs as justification for rebuking external criticism of its internal policies. However, the emerging doctrine of self-determination in colonial situations meant that most nations regarded Rhodesia as illegitimate.
Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia, took a pragmatic approach towards Rhodesia. Kenneth Kaunda, heavily dependent on access through Rhodesia for his nation's copper ore exports, fuel, and power imports unofficially worked with the Rhodesian government. Rhodesia still allowed Zambia to export and import its goods through its territory to Mozambique ports, despite the Zambian government's official policy of hostility and non-recognition of the post-UDI Smith Administration.
The United States, like all other Western nations, refused to recognise Rhodesia, but unlike others allowed its Consulate-General to function as a communications conduit between the American government in Washington, D.C., and the Rhodesian government in Salisbury. When Rhodesia set up an information office in Washington, D.C., OAS nations loudly protested. The US government responded by saying the Rhodesian mission and its staff had no official diplomatic status and violated no US laws.
Portugal pursued a middle path with Rhodesia. While not officially recognising Rhodesia under Ian Smith, the government of António Salazar did permit Rhodesia to establish a representative mission in Lisbon, and permitted Rhodesian exports and imports through their colony of Mozambique. The Portuguese government in power at that time, authoritarian and ardently anti-communist, gave active behind-the-scenes support in Rhodesia's fight against the guerrilla groups.
South Africa, itself under international pressure as a white minority government, pursued a policy of détente with the black African states at the time. These states wanted South Africa to pressure Ian Smith to accept a faster transition to majority rule in Rhodesia, in return for pledges of non-interference in South Africa's internal affairs. Prime Minister John Vorster, believing majority rule in Rhodesia would lead to international acceptance for South Africa, used a number of tactics to pressure Smith. The South African government held up shipments of fuel and ammunition and pulled out friendly South African forces from Rhodesia. The combined loss of Mozambique and the loss of support from South Africa dealt critical blows to the Rhodesian government.
Diplomatic relations[edit]
After the UDI, Rhodesia maintained several overseas missions, including Pretoria,[130] and until 1975, Lisbon in Portugal and Lourenço Marques (now Maputo) in Mozambique.[131]
Since 1961, Rhodesia had had an "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" with South Africa, heading a "Rhodesian Diplomatic Mission" or de facto embassy.[132] Before South Africa left the Commonwealth that year, the then Southern Rhodesia had exchanged High Commissioners with the then Union of South Africa, but following the change in status, the Republic now had a "South African Diplomatic Mission" in Salisbury.[133]
During 1965, the government of Rhodesia made moves to establish a mission in Lisbon separate from the British Embassy, with its own accredited representative, having previously been able to establish its own consulate in Lourenço Marques, capital of Portuguese Mozambique.[134] This prompted protests from the British government, which was determined that the representative, Harry Reedman, should be a nominal member of the British Ambassador's staff.[135] For their part, the Portuguese authorities sought a compromise whereby they would accept Reedman as an independent representative but deny him diplomatic status.[136]
The Rhodesian Information Office in Washington remained open following UDI, but its director, Ken Towsey, and his staff were deprived of their diplomatic status.[137] Previously, there had been a "Minister for Rhodesian Affairs" operating under the aegis of the British Embassy in Washington,[138] as well representatives in Tokyo and Bonn.[139] Following the country's independence as Zimbabwe, Towsey became chargé d'affaires at the new Embassy.[140]
The High Commission in London, known as Rhodesia House, continued to function until it was closed in 1969 following the decision by white Rhodesians in a referendum to make the country a republic, along with the "British Residual Mission" in Salisbury.[141] Prior to its closure, the mission flew the newly adopted Flag of Rhodesia, considered illegal by the Foreign Office, prompting calls by Labour MP Willie Hamilton for its removal.[142]
In Australia, the federal government in Canberra sought to close the Rhodesian Information Centre in Sydney,[143] but it remained open, operating under the jurisdiction of the state of New South Wales.[144] In 1973, the Labor government of Gough Whitlam cut post and telephone links to the Centre, but this was ruled illegal by the High Court.[145] An office was also established in Paris, but this was closed down by the French government in 1977.[146]
Similarly, the United States recalled its consul-general from Salisbury, and reduced consular staff,[147] but did not move to close its consulate until the declaration of a republic in 1970.[148] South Africa, however, retained its "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" after UDI,[149] which allowed it to continue to recognise British sovereignty as well as to deal with the de facto authority of the government of Ian Smith.[150]
The South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury became the only such mission remaining in the country after 1975,[151] when Portugal downgraded its mission to consul level,[152] having recalled its consul-general in Salisbury in May 1970.[153] After Zimbabwe's independence, the new government closed its missions in Pretoria and Cape Town, only maintaining a trade mission in Johannesburg,[154] while the South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury was also closed.[155]
Results[edit]
Continuing civil war and a lack of international support eventually led the Rhodesian government to submit to an agreement with the UK in 1979. This led to internationally supervised elections, won by Zimbabwe African National Union - Patriotic Front and Robert Mugabe, establishing the internationally recognised Zimbabwe.
Legacy[edit]
In the ten years after independence, around 60% of the white population of Zimbabwe emigrated, most to South Africa and to other mainly white, English speaking countries where they formed expatriate communities. Politically within Zimbabwe, the consolidation of power by Robert Mugabe continued through the 1980s. Following amendments to the country's constitution in 1987, parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished, and an executive presidency was created, held by Mugabe. Many expatriates and some of the whites who stayed in Zimbabwe became deeply nostalgic for Rhodesia. These individuals are known as "Rhodies." Native whites who are more accepting of the new order are known as "Zimbos."
While as Rhodesia, the country was once considered the breadbasket of Africa. Today, Zimbabwe is a net importer of foodstuffs, with the European Union and United States providing emergency food relief as humanitarian aid on a regular basis.[156] The nation has suffered profound economic and social decline in the past twenty years. Recently the agriculture sector has started to do well since the availability of expertise and machines has improved supported mainly by China.[157][158]
Zimbabwe also suffered from a crippling inflation rate, as the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe had a policy of printing money to satisfy government debts, which introduces excessive currency into the economic system which led to the demise of the local currency. This policy caused the inflation rate to soar from 32% in 1998 (considered extremely high by most economic standards) to an astonishing 11,200,000% by 2007. Monetary aid by the International Monetary Fund has been suspended due to the Zimbabwe government's defaulting on past loans, inability to stabilise its own economy, and its inability to stem corruption and advance human rights.[156] In 2009, Zimbabwe abandoned its currency, relying instead on foreign currencies such as the South African rand, the US dollar, the Botswana pula, the euro and the British pound, among others.[159]
In 2008 elections, Mugabe garnered 41%, Simba Makoni 10% and Morgan Tsvangirai 48% of the votes cast for president forcing a runoff election called by the Zimbabwe Electoral Commission (ZEC). In the months leading to the run-off, instances of extreme violence between the two major parties (ZANU PF and MDC) led Tsvangirai to withdraw from the election. In February 2009, a power-sharing accord was reached which resulted in the Zimbabwe Government of National Unity of 2009. The accord was, essentially, to create the position of "Prime Minister" for Tsvangirai, who served in that role from 2009 to 2013. Mugabe retained the title of President.
Rhodesian media[edit]
The main newspapers were the Rhodesia Herald in Salisbury and The Chronicle in Bulawayo. Following UDI, in 1976, the state-run Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation (RBC) took over the privately owned Rhodesian Television (RTV) service, in which it had previously acquired a 51 per cent stake.[160] Among the news magazines published in Rhodesia under UDI were the Illustrated Life Rhodesia, while The Valiant Years by Beryl Salt told the history of Rhodesia from 1890 to 1978 entirely through the medium of facsimile reproduction of articles and headlines from Rhodesian newspapers.[161]
References[edit]


^ a b Rowland, J. Reid. "Constitutional History of Rhodesia: An outline".  in Berlyn, Phillippa (April 1978). The Quiet Man: A Biography of the Hon. Ian Douglas Smith. Salisbury: M. O. Collins. pp. 240–256. OCLC 4282978. 
^

Palley, Claire (1966). The Constitutional History and Law of Southern Rhodesia 1888–1965, with Special Reference to Imperial Control (First ed.). Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 742–743. OCLC 406157. 


^ a b c d Duignan, Peter (1986), Politics and Government in African States 1960–1985, Croom Helm Ltd, ISBN 0-7099-1475-X 
^ Volume V: Africa, Australia, and Southern Islands. Lands and Peoples: The World in Color. The Grolier Society of Canada Ltd 1955. Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 54-11291. p 19-109.
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t Nelson, Harold (1983), Zimbabwe: a country study, The American University (Washington, D.C.), ISBN 0160015987 
^ "Rhodesia – Mzilikaze to Smith". Rhodesia.nl. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "The Cabinet Papers | Rhodesia and the Central African Federation". Nationalarchives.gov.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "History of Zimbabwe". Historyworld.net. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645 - Authority for date of annexation having been 12 September 1923
^ a b Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia by Vera Gowlland-Debbas
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645
^ Southern Rhodesia Constitution Letters Patent 1923
^ "Parliament". Rhodesia.me.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Full text of "Southern Rhodesia 1890–1950; A Record of Sixty Years Progress"". Archive.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbambwe". Sapst.org. 22 December 1987. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Weitzer, Ronald. Transforming Settler States: Communal Conflict and Internal Security in Northern Ireland and Zimbabwe. pp. 1–206. 
^ afrikantraveler (16 May 2012). "Rhodesia: A Failed Attempt to Maintain Racism into the 21st Century". The African File. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Hastings Kamuzu Banda Biography – Detoured on Road to Become a Doctor, Pursued Degrees with Diligence, Spoke Out Against Racism – JRank Articles". Biography.jrank.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Novak, Andrew. "Academia.edu | Sport and Racial Discrimination in Colonial Zimbabwe: A Reanalysis | Andrew Novak". Independent.academia.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Wills, A.J. (1967). "Three Territories". An Introduction to the History of Central Africa (2nd ed.). Durban: Oxford University Press. p. Appendix IV. ISBN 0-620-06410-2. Retrieved 10 September 2012. 
^ "Database – Uppsala Conflict Data Program". UCDP. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "On Board the Tiger". Rhodesia.nl. 9 October 1968. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA PSYOP 1965". Psywarrior.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A brief history of Zimbabwe". Zimembassy.se. 18 April 1980. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Smith, Ian (1997). The Great Betrayal. London: Blake Publishing Ltd. pp. 74–256. ISBN 1-85782-176-9. 
^ "Chronology: Rhodesia UDI: Road to Settlement" (PDF). Lse.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Principled failure: British policy toward Rhodesia, 1971–72 | Assorted Materials: Johnny Ryan". Johnnyryan.wordpress.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA: DEFINITION OF THE FIVE PRINCIPLES (Hansard, 16 December 1970)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 16 December 1970. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Chronology for Europeans in Zimbabwe". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A Brief History of Zimbabwe – Part 1: Early Kingdoms to UDI". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cowell, Alan (21 November 2007). "Ian Smith, Defiant Symbol of White Rule in Africa, Is Dead at 88". The New York Times. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbabwe (country)". Talktalk.co.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Policy For Rhodesia from theTribune Magazine Archive". Archive.tribunemagazine.co.uk. 23 September 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "White referendum in Southern Rhodesia is overwhelmingly in support of Ian Smith's proposal for independence. | South African History Online". Sahistory.org.za. 6 November 1964. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "British South Rhodesia (1964–1980)". Uca.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Elections in Zimbabwe". Africanelections.tripod.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Lunch with Harold Wilson | Pop Theory". Clivebarnett.wordpress.com. 12 September 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia: The Last Thread". TIME. 30 December 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Chris McGreal (13 April 2008). "There are many villains to blame for Zimbabwe's decade of horror | World news | The Observer". London: Guardian. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Mungazi, Dickson. Last Defenders of the Laager: Ian D. Smith and F.W. de Klerk. pp. 1–288. 
^ a b c d Raftopolous, Brian. Becoming Zimbabwe: A History from the pre-colonial period to 2008. pp. 1–298. 
^ a b c d e f g h Raeburn, Michael. We are everywhere: Narratives from Rhodesian guerillas. pp. 1–209. 
^ "Issue 6, Spring 2011". Genocidepreventionnow.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA (Hansard, 21 January 1969)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 21 January 1969. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Question of Southern Rhodesia". undocs.org. United Nations. 12 October 1965. A/RES/2012(XX). Retrieved 17 March 2017. 
^ "Southern Times-Learning From Rhodesia". Southerntimesafrica.com. 12 November 1965. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Resolution 221 (1966) of 9 April 1966". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Gowlland-Debbas, Vera (1990), Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers, ISBN 0-7923-0811-5 
^ "The Secretary of State, Washington" (PDF). Gwu.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Okoth, Assa (2006), A History of Africa: Volume 2: 1915–1995, East African Educational Publishers Ltd, ISBN 9966-25-358-0 
^ "When Sanctions Worked: The Case of Rhodesia Reexamined". Africafocus.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia Unilateral Declaration of Independence 1965 – Online exhibition". Commonwealth.sas.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Meredith, Martin. The Past is Another Country. p. 218. 
^ "1970:Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". BBC News. 2 March 1970. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "Chemistry – Ian Smith". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Chemistry – Humphrey Gibbs". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Herald, Salisbury, 13 to 20 September 1968
^ "Stella Madzimbamuto (Appellant) v Desmond William Lardner Burke and Frederick Phillip George (Respondents)" (PDF). Jurisafrica.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "In re James (an insolvent)". Uniset.ca. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Lauterpacht, Elihu. International Law Reports (Volume 39). pp. 1–78. 
^ http://archive.lib.msu.edu/DMC/African%20Journals/pdfs/Journal%20of%20the%20University%20of%20Zimbabwe/vol3n1/juz003001001.pdf
^ "HMS Tiger". Barrylockyer.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Smock, David R. "The Forgotten Rhodesians". Foreign Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cockram, B. "Rhodesia Rides A Tiger" (PDF). South African Institute of International Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "2 March 1970 – Rhodesia Declared a Republic". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "BBC ON THIS DAY - 2 - 1970: Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". bbc.co.uk. 
^ a b c Clayton, Anthony. Frontiersmen: Warfare in Africa since 1950. pp. 1–260. 
^ Dr. Sue Onslow. "UDI: 40 Years On". LSE. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ Michael Hartnack (2005). "40 years in wilderness after UDI declaration". The Herald. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "What's Wrong With Trade Sanctions". Cato Institute. 23 December 1985. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Brownell, Josiah. Collapse of Rhodesia: Population Demographics and the Politics of Race. pp. 1–255. 
^ "Zimbabwe Rejects Sellout!" (PDF). American Committee on Africa. 1 February 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Zvobgo, Chengetai. A History of Zimbabwe, 1890–2000 and Postscript, Zimbabwe, 2001–2008. pp. 1–410. 
^ "1972: Rhodesia's former leader arrested". BBC. 18 January 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ "Insurgency in Rhodesia, 1957–1973: An Account and Assessment". International Institute for Strategic Studies. 1973. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Shamuyarira, Nathan. Crisis in Rhodesia. pp. 202–203. 
^ Palm Beach Post, Miami, 26 March 1959
^ "The Rhodesian Agreement: Aspects and Prospects". South African Institute of International Affairs. 1978. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Moorcraft and McLaughlin, Peter, Paul (2008). The Rhodesian War: A Military History. pp. 1–200. 
^ "Rhodesian Air Force Anti Terrorist Operations (COINOPS)". rhodesianforces.org. 2012. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Spring, William (1986). The Long Fields: Zimbabwe Since Independence. p. 38. 
^ a b "APF newsletter, "Appraisal of Rhodesia in 1975"". Archived from the original on 31 May 2009. 
^ Ian Beckett. "Report on Bush War, paragraph 10". 
^ The Guardian, 21 April 2000 British Multimillionaire bankrolls Mugabe party
^ Brookings Institution: p156, study on conflict resolution
^ "Peace talks fail". BBC news. 26 August 1975. Retrieved 27 November 2007. 
^ "Rhodesia: A Strike At the Lifeline". Rand Daily Mail via TIME magazine. 1976. p. 2. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ "A Strike at the Lifeline". TIME magazine. 1976. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ APF Newsletter, 1976 :Rhodesia's "Protected" Blacks
^ "Operation Agila, "The British Empire's Last Sunset"". NZ History. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ a b "BBC ON THIS DAY | 24 | 1976: White rule in Rhodesia to end". BBC News. 24 September 1976. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ APF newsletter, 1976: appraisal of Rhodesia in 1976
^ "Cold War Studies Project". lse.ac.uk. 
^ Time magazine, 7 August 1978: Rhodesia faces collapse
^ Time magazine, 1 August 1978: taking the chicken run
^ Major Charles Lohman and Major Robert MacPherson. ""Rhodesia: Tactical Victory, Strategic Defeat" WAR SINCE 1945 SEMINAR AND SYMPOSIUM, US Marine Corps Command and Staff College, June 1983 – See Chapter 3". Scribd.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Worldwide:"PK"
^ The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p 291
^ Newsnet report : saboteurs hit Zimbabwean military, partisan comment
^ Time magazine, October 1977 : The Land of Opportunity
^ a b c d Glenn Cross, "Dirty War: Rhodesia and Chemical Biological Warfare, 1975-1980," Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, 2017
^ Ed Bird. Special Branch War: Slaughter in the Rhodesian Bush Southern Ndebele land, 1976-1980. Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, Ltd. 2014.
^ Jim Parker, "Assignment Selous Scouts: The Inside Story of a Rhodesian Special Branch Officer". Johannesburg, South Africa: Galago Press, 2006
^ Chandré Gould and Peter Folb. "Project Coast: Apartheid’s Chemical and Biological Warfare Programme". Geneva: United Nations Institute for Disarmament Research, 2002.
^ a b Southern African News Feature: the plague wars
^ The Guardian, 15 July 2003: obituary of sixth Marquess of Salisbury
^ Nick Downie report: caution, partisan comment
^ 2nd Lt CJE Vincent BCR who was present when Lord Cecil was killed
^ The Viscount Disasters – The Story
^ The Atlantic Monthly : The Fragility of Domestic Energy, see page 5
^ Selby thesis: ZWNEWS.com, p 88
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War, para 7.
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War.
^ BBC "On this day" report :1 June 1979.
^ Senate Votes Down A Move To Preserve Rhodesia Sanctions; Arms-Bill Veto Threatened White House Says 52-to-41 Margin Shows President Has Support to Prevent an Override, 13 June 1979. The New York Times.
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Allport, R. "Operation Quartz – Rhodesia 1980" (PDF). memoriesofrhodesia.com. 
^ Video on YouTube
^ "Ian Smith's farm seized in Zimbabwe as Robert Mugabe eyes election". BBC News. 7 December 2012. 
^ Rogers 1998, p. 41
^ "The World: The Military: A Mission Impossible". Time. New York. 13 June 1977. Retrieved 3 December 2011. 
^ The Southern Rhodesia (Property in Passports) Order 1965 provided that they were the property of the British government, allowing them to be impounded if presented by anyone arriving at a port of entry. See Hansard, HC 5ser vol 721 col 696.
^ The statement is printed in Hansard HC 5ser vol 723 col 4.
^ http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,836951,00.html
^ http://www.southafricaproject.info/rhodesia_and_south_africa.html
^ https://library.cqpress.com/cqalmanac/document.php?id=cqal75-1214210
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1978/09/22/zambian-to-meet-with-callaghan-on-un-oil-sanction-violations/bdd35f61-e9cb-463f-a319-38981df92cf3/
^ Wikisource:United Nations Security Council Resolution 216
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 52
^ Rhodesians to quit Lisbon, Glasgow Herald, 1 May 1975, page 4
^ Report of the Secretary for Information, Immigration, and Tourism
^ Diplomacy with a Difference: the Commonwealth Office of High Commissioner, 1880-2006, Lorna Lloyd, BRILL, 2007, page 240
^ John Arthur KINSEY, Esq., Consul-General for the Federation at Lourenco Marques, London Gazette, 5th June 1959
^ Rhodesia's Man in Lisbon: Objective Said To Be Achieved, The Glasgow Herald, 22 September 1965. page 9
^ International Diplomacy and Colonial Retreat, Kent Fedorowich, Martin Thomas Routledge, 2013, page 186
^ Goldberg Back British Stand In U.N. Session,Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, November 13, 1965
^ Isolated States: A Comparative Analysis, Deon Geldenhuys, Cambridge University Press, 1990, page 62
^ Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Vera Gowlland-Debbas, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 1990
^ Rhodesia's Lobbyist Back for Mugabe, The Washington Post, June 26, 1980
^ RHODESIA, Hansard, HC Deb 24 June 1969 vol 785 cc1218-27
^ M.P. CALLS FOR REMOVAL OF RHODESIAN FLAG IN STRAND, The Glasgow Herald, January 4, 1969, page 1
^ Rhodesia Office Will Be Closed, The Age, April 3, 1972
^ The Nationals: The Progressive, Country, and National Party in New South Wales 1919-2006, Paul Davey, Federation Press, 2006 page 223
^ [rathall+rhodesia++Minister+of+Finance+and+of+Posts+and+ Telecommunications&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=whitlam Africa Contemporary Record: Annual Survey and Documents, Volume 6], Colin Legum, Africana Publishing Company, 1974
^ US Not Closing Rhodesian Office, The Lewiston Daily Sun, August 27, 1977, page 8
^ US To Restrict Sales To Rhodesia, Reading Eagle, December 12, 1965
^ The Superpowers and Africa: The Constraints of a Rivalry, 1960-1990, Zaki Laïdi University of Chicago Press, 1990, page 55
^ Foreign Affairs for New States: Some Questions of Credentials, Peter John Boyce, University of Queensland Press, January 1977, page 13
^ Confrontation and Accommodation in Southern Africa: The Limits of Independence, Kenneth W. Grundy, University of California Press, 1973, page 257
^ Native Vs. Settler: Ethnic Conflict in Israel/Palestine, Northern Ireland, and South Africa, Thomas G. Mitchell Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000, page 141
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 77
^ Portugal Severs Key Link With Rhodesia, Sarasota Herald-Tribune, April 27, 1970
^ Coming To Terms: Zimbabwe in the International Arena, Richard Schwartz I.B.Tauris, 2001, page 68
^ Salisbury whites queue up to flee, The Age, July 8, 1980
^ a b "The World Factbook". cia.gov. 
^ Published in 2010, research by Ian Scoones on land reform in Masvingo, Zimbabwe.
^ GDP percentage growth 2010 and Tobabcco auctions 2010
^ BBC News, 29 January 2009: Zimbabwe abandons its currency
^ Broadcasting: An Introduction, John R. Bittner, Prentice-Hall International, 1980, page 263
^ Salt, Beryl (1978). The Valiant Years. 


External links[edit]





This article's use of external links may not follow Wikipedia's policies or guidelines. Please improve this article by removing excessive or inappropriate external links, and converting useful links where appropriate into footnote references. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Find more aboutRhodesiaat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Rhodesian Bush War historical research / discussion forum
Rhodesian Bush War Photographs




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rhodesia.



The Viscount disasters of 1978 and 1979
Ironing the lawn in Salisbury – the last days of Rhodesia (The Guardian)
Ian Beckett, an account of the Bush War (in 2 parts)
Rhodesian and South African Military History – An extensive collection of histories and analysis of Rhodesian and South African military operations, to the early 1980s
Window on Rhodesia- An archive of the history and life of Rhodesia.
1975 BBC report on the failure of negotiations between the Rhodesian government and the black nationalists
The Brookings Institution : Managing Ethnic Conflict in Africa – Rhodesia/Zimbabwe
Selby, Angus (2006) "Commercial Farmers and the State: Interest Group Politics and Land Reform in Zimbabwe, 1890–2005", PhD Thesis, Oxford University
Rhodesia Roll of Honour – Those who died in defence of UDI
Constitution of Rhodesia
Rhodesian aviation and comment

Audio and video[edit]

Audio of Ian Smith's radio address announcing UDI
2 years of independence, 1967 Rhodesian MoI film (7 mins) on YouTube
Rhodesia to Zimbabwe, collection of film clips (6 mins) on YouTube
Songs of UDI, 3 songs from 1977 (9 mins) on YouTube







v
t
e


Southern Rhodesia / Rhodesia articles




1890–1923: Company rule; 1923–80: Southern Rhodesia; 1953–63: Federation; 1965–79: Rhodesia under UDI; 1979: Zimbabwe Rhodesia under UDI; 1980–present: Zimbabwe



History



Pre-colonial
Rudd Concession
Company rule

Pioneer Column
First Matabele War
Shangani Patrol
Second Matabele War
Second Boer War
First World War


Southern Rhodesia

colonial history
Second World War
Malayan Emergency involvement
Federation


Unilateral Declaration of Independence

Bush War
1975 Victoria Falls Conference
1976 Geneva Conference
Internal Settlement
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
Lancaster House Agreement


Zimbabwe





Geography







Chimanimani Mountains
Cities and towns
Limpopo River
Zambezi River








Politics







Constitutional history
Districts
Elections
Governor
Mission in Lisbon
Municipalities
Police
Political parties
Central Africa Party
Confederate Party
Dominion Party
Federal Party
Responsible Government Association (RGA)
Rhodesian Action Party (RAP)
Rhodesian Front (RF)
Rhodesia Labour Party (RLP)
Southern Rhodesia African National Congress (SRANC)
Southern Rhodesia Communist Party (SRCP)
Southern Rhodesia Liberal Party (SRLP)
United Federal Party (UFP)
United National Federal Party (UNFP)
United Rhodesia Party
President
Prime Minister
Provinces
Security Forces








Economy







Dollar (currency from 1970)
Pound (currency to 1970)
Reserve Bank
Stock Exchange
Telecommunications
Tourism
Transportation








Society







List of Rhodesians
Public holidays
Rhodesiana





Demographics




Ethnic groups
(diaspora)




Black



Hungwe
Kunda
Lemba
Manyika
Ndebele
Rusape Jews
Shona
Tokaleya
Tonga





White



Afrikaners
British
Greeks
Jews
"Rhodies"





Others



Coloureds (Goffals)
Indians








Languages



Afrikaans
English (South African)
Shona
Sindebele








Symbols



Animal
Anthem
Coat of arms
Emblem
Flags

national


Flower











Category
Portal












v
t
e


Commonwealth realms and dominions



Current



Antigua and Barbuda (monarchy)
Australia (monarchy)
Bahamas (monarchy)
Barbados (monarchy)
Belize (monarchy)
Canada (monarchy)
Grenada (monarchy)
Jamaica (monarchy)
Realm of New Zealand

Cook Islands
New Zealand
Niue


Papua New Guinea (monarchy)
Saint Kitts and Nevis (monarchy)
Saint Lucia (monarchy)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines (monarchy)
Solomon Islands (monarchy)
Tuvalu (monarchy)
United Kingdom (monarchy)





Former



Ceylon
Fiji (monarchy)
The Gambia
Ghana
Guyana
India1
Ireland1 (monarchy)
Kenya
Malawi
Malta
Mauritius
Newfoundland2
Nigeria
Pakistan
Rhodesia3
Sierra Leone
South Africa (monarchy)
Tanganyika
Trinidad and Tobago
Uganda








1 Dominion, became republic before adoption of the term "realm"
2 Dominion, never ratified Statute of Westminster 1931, London-based external government 1934–1949, annexed by Canada in 1949
3 Rhodesia unilaterally declared independence as a realm in 1965, but this was not recognised internationally. Declared itself a republic in 1970.











 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rhodesia&oldid=790867687"					
Categories: Former countries in AfricaStates and territories established in 1965States and territories disestablished in 1979RhodesiaBritish colonisation in AfricaBritish EmpireFormer British colonies and protectorates in AfricaFormer polities of the Cold WarFormer republicsFormer territorial entities in AfricaFormer unrecognized countriesHistory of RhodesiaHistory of ZimbabweOligarchy1965 establishments in Africa1979 disestablishments in Africa1965 establishments in Rhodesia1970s disestablishments in Rhodesia1965 establishments in the British Empire1979 disestablishments in the United KingdomWhite supremacy in AfricaEnglish-speaking countries and territoriesHidden categories: EngvarB from August 2014Use dmy dates from August 2014Use South African English from April 2016All Wikipedia articles written in South African EnglishArticles containing Latin-language textFormer country articles requiring maintenancePages using infobox former country with unknown parametersArticles containing Shona-language textAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2017Articles needing additional references from February 2011All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia external links cleanup from October 2012Wikipedia spam cleanup from October 2012Zimbabwe articles missing geocoordinate dataAll articles needing coordinates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةБеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGalego한국어Bahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიLadinoLatviešuLigureLumbaartМакедонскиमराठीمازِرونیBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 16:58.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Rhodesia - Wikipedia






















 






Rhodesia

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Rhodesian)

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the unrecognised state of Rhodesia. For the British colony, see Southern Rhodesia. For other uses, see Rhodesia (disambiguation).


Rhodesia


Unrecognised state






1965–1979










Flag (1968)



Coat of arms





Motto
Sit Nomine Digna (Latin)
"May she be worthy of the name"


Anthem
"Rise, O Voices of Rhodesia" (1974–1979)








Royal anthem
"God Save the Queen" (1965–1970)























Capital
Salisbury


Languages
English (official)
Afrikaans, Shona and Ndebele widely spoken


Government
Constitutional monarchy (1965–70)
Parliamentary republic (1970–79)


Head of State



 • 
Monarch
1965–1970

Elizabeth II (Unrecognised by Elizabeth II)


 • 
President
1970–1975

Clifford Dupont (First)


 • 
1979
Henry Everard (Acting president) (Last)


Prime Minister



 • 
1965–1979
Ian Smith


Legislature
Parliament


 • 
Upper house
Senate


 • 
Lower house
House of Assembly


Historical era
Cold War


 • 
Independence (UDI)
11 November 1965


 • 
Republic declared
2 March 1970


 • 
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
1 June 1979


 • 
Republic of Zimbabwe
18 April 1980


Area


 • 
1978
390,580 km2 (150,800 sq mi)


Population


 • 
1978 est.
6,930,000 


     Density
18/km2 (46/sq mi)


Currency
Rhodesian pound (1965–1970)
Rhodesian dollar (1970–1979)







Preceded by
Succeeded by






Southern Rhodesia






Zimbabwe Rhodesia









Today part of
 Zimbabwe


a. The government recognised Queen Elizabeth II as the official Head of State from 1965 to 1970. The highest official of Rhodesia held the title "Officer Administering the Government" (OAtG) as he acted in lieu of the official Governor, who remained at his post but was ignored. After Rhodesia became a republic in March 1970, the President replaced the OAtG as the highest official and the Governor returned to London.


Rhodesia (/roʊˈdiːʒə/), commonly known from 1970 onwards as the Republic of Rhodesia, was an unrecognised state in southern Africa from 1965 to 1979, equivalent in territorial terms to modern Zimbabwe. With its capital in Salisbury (now Harare), Rhodesia was considered a de facto successor state to the former British colony of Southern Rhodesia (which had achieved responsible government in 1923).
During an effort to delay an immediate transition to black majority rule, Rhodesia's predominantly white government issued its own Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965. The UDI administration initially sought recognition as an autonomous realm within the Commonwealth of Nations, but reconstituted itself as a republic in 1970.
Following a brutal guerrilla war fought with two African nationalist organisations (Robert Mugabe's ZANU and Joshua Nkomo's ZAPU), Rhodesian premier Ian Smith conceded to bi-racial democracy in 1978. However, a provisional government subsequently headed by Smith and his moderate colleague Abel Muzorewa failed in appeasing international critics or halting the bloodshed. By December 1979, Muzorewa had replaced Smith as Prime Minister and secured an agreement with the militant nationalists, allowing Rhodesia to briefly revert to colonial status pending elections under a universal franchise. It finally achieved internationally recognised independence in April 1980; the nation was concurrently renamed the Republic of Zimbabwe.
A wholly landlocked area, Rhodesia was bordered by South Africa to the south, Bechuanaland (later Botswana) to the southwest, Zambia to the northwest, and Mozambique (a Portuguese province until 1975) to the east. The state was named after Cecil Rhodes, whose British South Africa Company acquired the land in the late 19th century.



Contents


1 Nomenclature
2 History

2.1 Background
2.2 Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)

2.2.1 Impact of UDI


2.3 The Bush War
2.4 End of the Bush War

2.4.1 Late 1970s
2.4.2 Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas
2.4.3 Security Situation Erodes Rapidly


2.5 End of UDI (1979)
2.6 Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)


3 Politics
4 Military and police
5 Foreign relations

5.1 Britain and the UDI
5.2 Sanctions
5.3 International perspective
5.4 Diplomatic relations
5.5 Results


6 Legacy

6.1 Rhodesian media


7 References
8 External links

8.1 Audio and video





Nomenclature[edit]
The official name of the country, according to the constitution adopted concurrently with the Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI) in 1965, was Rhodesia. This was not the case under British law, however, which considered the territory's legal name to be Southern Rhodesia, the name given to the country in 1898 during the British South Africa Company's administration of the Rhodesias, and retained by the self-governing colony of Southern Rhodesia after the end of Company rule in 1923.[1]
This naming dispute dated back to October 1964, when Northern Rhodesia became independent from Britain and concurrently changed its name to Zambia. The Southern Rhodesian colonial government in Salisbury felt that in the absence of a "Northern" Rhodesia, the continued use of "Southern" was superfluous. It passed legislation to become simply Rhodesia, but the British government refused to approve this on the grounds that the country's name was defined by British legislation and so could not be altered by the colonial government. Salisbury went on using the shortened name in an official manner nevertheless,[2] while the British government continued referring to the country as Southern Rhodesia. This situation continued throughout the UDI period.[1] The shortened name was used by many people including the British government in the House of Commons.
The British government maintained this stance regarding the June–December 1979 successor state of Zimbabwe Rhodesia, and when Zimbabwe Rhodesia returned to colonial status from December 1979 to April 1980, it was as "Southern Rhodesia". Southern Rhodesia subsequently gained international recognition of its independence in April 1980, when it became the Republic of Zimbabwe.
History[edit]



Part of a series on the



History of Zimbabwe





Ancient history


Mapungubwe Kingdom
c.1075–1220


Zimbabwe Kingdom
c.1220–1450


Mutapa Kingdom
c.1450–1760


Torwa dynasty
c.1450–1683





White settlement pre-1923


Rozwi Empire
c.1684–1834


Matabeleland
1838–1894


Rudd Concession
1888


BSA Company rule
1890–1923


First Matabele War
1893–1894


Second Matabele War
1896–1897


World War I involvement
1914–1918


Colony of Southern Rhodesia
1923–1980


World War II involvement
1939–1945


Malayan Emergency
involvement
1948–1960


Federation with Northern
Rhodesia and Nyasaland
1953–1963


Rhodesian Bush War
1964–1979



Unilateral Declaration of
Independence (UDI)

1965


Rhodesia under UDI
1965–1979


Zimbabwe-Rhodesia
June–Dec 1979



Lancaster House Agreement

Dec 1979


British Dependency
1979–1980


Zimbabwe
1980–present


Gukurahundi
1982–1987


Second Congo War
1998–2003





 Zimbabwe portal





v
t
e





Main article: History of Rhodesia
Background[edit]
Until after World War II, the landlocked British possession of Southern Rhodesia was not developed as an indigenous African territory, but rather as a unique state which reflected its multiracial character.[3] This situation certainly made it very different from other lands which existed under colonial rule, as many Europeans had arrived to make permanent homes, populating the towns as traders or settling to farm the most productive soils.[4][5] In 1922, faced with the decision to join the Union of South Africa as a fifth province or accept nearly full internal autonomy, the electorate cast its vote against South African integration.[6][7][8]
In view of the outcome of the referendum, the territory was annexed by the United Kingdom on 12 September 1923.[9][10][11][12] Shortly after annexation, on 1 October 1923, the first constitution for the new Colony of Southern Rhodesia came into force.[11][13] Under this constitution, Southern Rhodesia was given the right to elect its own thirty-member legislature, premier, and cabinet—although the British Crown retained a formal veto over measures affecting natives and dominated foreign policy.[14][15][16]
The Rhodesian authorities provided compensation when the government nationalised enterprises such as the country's railroads, consistently refused to radically alleviate unemployment, and shied from filling civil service posts with partisan appointees. By colonial standards, public services were well-organised and praised for their efficiency.[3]
In 1953, Southern Rhodesia merged with the two other British Central African states to form the Federation of Rhodesia and Nyasaland – a loose association that placed defence and economic direction under a central government but left many domestic affairs under the control of its constituent territories.[17] As it began to appear that decolonisation was inevitable and indigenous black populations were pressing heavily for change,[3] the federation was dissolved in 1963.[18][19][20]

Numbers of white and black inhabitants before and during the Central African Federation[21]

Year
Southern Rhodesia
Northern Rhodesia
Nyasaland
Total


White
Black
White
Black
White
Black
White
Black


1927
38,200 (3.98%)
922,000 (96.02%)
4,000 (0.4%)
1,000,000 (99.6%)
1,700 (0.13%)
1,350,000 (99.87%)
43,900 (1.32%)
3,272,000 (98.68%)


1946
80,500 (4.79%)
1,600,000 (95.21%)
21,919 (1.32%)
1,634,980 (97.68%)
2,300 (0.10%)
2,340,000 (99.90%)
104,719 (1.84%)
5,574,980 (98.16%)


1955
150,000 (5.88%)
2,400,000 (94.12%)
65,000 (3.02%)
2,085,000 (96.98%)
6,300 (0.25%)
2,550,000 (99.75%)
221,300 (3.05%)
7,035,000 (96.95%)


1960
223,000 (7.30%)
2,830,000 (92.70%)
76,000 (3.14%)
2,340,000 (96.85%)
9,300 (0.33%)
2,810,000 (99.66%)
308,300 (3.72%)
7,980,000 (96.28%)


Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965)[edit]
Although prepared to grant formal independence to Southern Rhodesia (now Rhodesia), the British government had adopted a policy of no independence before majority rule, dictating that colonies with a substantial population of European settlers would not receive independence except under conditions of majority rule.[22][23][24] Rhodesian colonials initially balked at the suggestion; some felt they had a right to absolute political control, at least for the time being, despite their relatively small numbers.[17][25] The authorities were also disturbed by the post-independence chaos which was plaguing other African nations at the time.[26] However, once Rhodesia had been introduced as a topic for discussion in international bodies, extension of the status quo became a matter of concern to the world community and a serious embarrassment to the United Kingdom.[5]
After the federal break-up in 1963, then-Prime Minister Alec Douglas-Home insisted that preconditions on independence talks hinge on what he termed the "five principles" – unimpeded progress to majority rule, assurance against any future legislation decidedly detrimental to black interests, "improvement in the political status" of local Africans, moves towards ending racial discrimination, and agreement on a settlement which could be "acceptable to the whole population".[27][28][29][30] Harold Wilson and his incoming Labour government took an even harder line on demanding that these points be legitimately addressed before an independence agenda could be set.[5]
By 1964, growing dissatisfaction with the ongoing negotiations ousted Salisbury's incumbent Winston Field, replacing him with Ian Smith, deputy chairman of the conservative Rhodesian Front party.[31][32][33] Smith, the colony's first Rhodesian-born leader, soon came to personify resistance to liberals in British government and those agitating for change at home.[5] He ruled out acceptance for all five of the proposed principles as they stood,[34] implying instead that Rhodesia was already legally entitled to independence—a claim which was overwhelmingly endorsed by registered voters in a referendum.[35][36][37]
Emboldened by the results of this referendum and the subsequent general election, Rhodesia now threatened to assume her own sovereignty without British consent. Harold Wilson countered by warning that such an irregular procedure would be considered treasonous, although he specifically rejected using armed force against the English "kith and kin" in Africa.[38][39][40] Wilson's refusal to consider a military option encouraged Smith to proceed with his plans. Talks quickly broke down, and final efforts in October to achieve a settlement floundered; the Rhodesian Front remained unwilling to accept what were regarded as unacceptably drastic terms and the British would settle for nothing less – it was a formula doomed to failure.[5]




Ian Smith signs the Unilateral Declaration of Independence.



The mantle of the pioneers has fallen on our shoulders to sustain civilisation in a primitive country.
— Ian Smith, 11 November 1965, upon the announcement of UDI[41]

On 11 November 1965, following a brief but solemn consensus, Rhodesia's leading statesmen issued their country's unilateral declaration of independence (UDI).[3][42][43] This was immediately denounced as an "act of rebellion against the Crown" in the United Kingdom, and Wilson promised that the illegal action would be short-lived.[44][45] However, few seemed to initially realise that Rhodesia was no longer within the Commonwealth's direct sphere of influence and British rule was now a constitutional fiction; Salisbury remained virtually immune to credible metropolitan leverage.[17]
On 12 October 1965, the United Nations General Assembly had noted the repeated threats of the Rhodesian authorities "to declare unilaterally the independence of Southern Rhodesia, in order to perpetuate minority rule", and called upon Wilson to use all means at his disposal (including military force) to prevent the Rhodesian Front from asserting independence.[46] After UDI was proclaimed, UN officials branded Ian Smith's government as an "illegal racist minority regime"[47] and called on member states to sever economic ties with Rhodesia, recommending sanctions on petroleum products and military hardware.[5] In December 1966, these measures became mandatory, extending to bar the purchase of Rhodesian tobacco, chrome, copper, asbestos, sugar, meat, and hides.[5]
Britain, having already adopted extensive sanctions of its own, dispatched a Royal Navy squadron to monitor oil deliveries in the port of Beira in Mozambique, from which a strategic pipeline ran to Umtali in Rhodesia. The warships were to deter "by force, if necessary, vessels reasonably believed to be carrying oil destined for (Southern) Rhodesia".[48][49]
Some nations, such as Switzerland, and West Germany, which were not UN members, conducted business legally with Rhodesia – the latter remained the Smith government's largest trading partner in Western Europe until 1973, when Bonn joined the UN.[5] Japan continued to accept more Rhodesian exports than any other nation, and Iran provided oil.[50] The Portuguese government marketed Rhodesian products as its own, via false certificates of origin and disguised trade channels.[51] South Africa openly refused to observe the UN sanctions.[52][53] A 1971 amendment passed in the United States permitted American firms to go on importing Rhodesian chromium and nickel as normal.[54]
Despite the poor showing of sanctions, Rhodesia found it nearly impossible to obtain diplomatic recognition abroad. In 1970, the US government had made it clear that the UDI would not be recognised "under [any] circumstances".[55] Even Smith's ideological allies in Pretoria, although sympathetic, failed to recognise the new country on an equal level.[56]
Initially, the state retained its pledged loyalty to Elizabeth II of the United Kingdom, recognising her as Queen of Rhodesia.[5] When Smith and Deputy Prime Minister Clifford Dupont called on colonial Governor, Sir Humphrey Gibbs, to formally notify him of the UDI, Gibbs condemned the UDI as an act of treason. After Smith formally announced the UDI on the radio, Gibbs sacked the entire cabinet on orders from Whitehall. However, he was unable to enact any concrete actions to foster a return to legality. Government ministers simply ignored his notices, pointing out that UDI made his office obsolete. Even so, Gibbs continued to occupy his residence in Salisbury until 1970, when he vacated the premises and left Rhodesia following the declaration of a republic.[57] He had effectively been superseded before then; on 20 December 1965, Smith named Dupont as "Officer Administering the Government"; an earlier attempt to have him named as Governor-General of Rhodesia was dismissed out of hand.[5]
In September 1968, the Appellate Division of the Rhodesian High Court ruled that Ian Smith's administration had become the de jure government of the country, not merely the de facto one.[58] To support his decision, Chief Justice Sir Hugh Beadle used several statements made by Hugo Grotius, who maintained that there was no way in which a nation could rightly claim to be governing a particular territory – if it was waging a war against that territory. Beadle argued that due to Britain's economic war against Rhodesia, she could not (at the same point) be described as governing Rhodesia.[59][60] Resulting court decisions held that the rebel government "could lawfully do anything its predecessors could lawfully have done".[61]
A Salisbury commission chaired by prominent lawyer W.R. Waley was appointed to study constitutional options open to the Rhodesian authorities as of April 1968, but reaching a further settlement with the British was ruled out early on.[17][62] Waley, although insistent that "Europeans must surrender any belief in permanent European domination", also testified that majority rule was not desirable immediately.[5]
Talks aimed at easing the differences between Rhodesia and the United Kingdom were carried out aboard Royal Navy vessels once in December 1966 and again in October 1968.[63][64][65] Both efforts failed to achieve agreement, although Harold Wilson added a sixth principle to the five he had previously enunciated: "it would be necessary to ensure that, regardless of race, there was no oppression of the majority by the minority or of [any] minority by the majority." Rhodesian resolve stiffened following a failure to reach a new settlement, with more radical elements of the Rhodesian Front calling for a republican constitution.[5]
During a two-proposition referendum held in 1969, the proposal for severing all remaining ties to the British Crown passed by a majority of 61,130 votes to 14,327.[5] Rhodesia declared itself a republic on 2 March 1970. Under the new constitution, a president served as ceremonial head of state, with the prime minister nominally reporting to him.[66] Some in Rhodesian government had hoped in vain that the declaration of a republic would finally prompt other nations to grant recognition.[67]
Impact of UDI[edit]
The years following Rhodesia's UDI saw an unfolding series of economic, military, and political pressures placed on the country which eventually brought about majority rule, a totality of these factors rather than any one the reason for introducing change.[68] In 2005, a conference at the London School of Economics which discussed Rhodesia's independence concluded that UDI was sparked by an existing racial conflict complicated by Cold War intrigues.[69]
Critics of UDI sought to maintain that Ian Smith intended only to safeguard the privileges of an entrenched colonial elite at the expense of the impoverished African community. According to this logic, UDI created a vacuum of oppression which was eventually filled by Robert Mugabe's present dictatorship.[70] Smith and his supporters continued to defend their actions, however, by claiming that the Rhodesian majority was too inexperienced at the time to manage effectively a developed nation.[26]
At large, the European population's emerging attitude to UDI was tense. Many white Rhodesians had seen themselves as nothing less than fully fledged members of the British Empire, carrying on the same rugged values and frontier spirit of the early Englishmen who had settled in 1890.[42] But such confidence was rudely shaken by Whitehall's refusal to grant independence on their terms. After 1965, there were those who continued to claim that they were collectively upholders of principle and defenders of such values against the twin threats of communism, manifested through the militant black nationalists, and – ironically – the decadence of Britain herself.[42] Often repeated appeals to the Christian heritage of their pioneer ancestors in "defending the free world" reflected these beliefs.[42]
African parties displayed initial horror at Smith's declaration, with one ZANU official stating, "...for all those who cherish freedom and a meaningful life, UDI has set a collision course which cannot be altered. 11 November 1965 [has] marked the turning point of the struggle for freedom in that land from a constitutional and political one to primarily a military struggle."[43] It would, however, be several years before even the most radical nationalists chose to develop a coherent strategy revolving around armed resistance, preferring instead to create opportunities for external intervention.[43]
Because Rhodesian exports were generally competitive and had previously been entitled to preferential treatment on the British market, the former colony did not recognise the need for escalating the pace of diversification before independence. Following the UDI, however, Rhodesia began to demonstrate that she had the potential to develop a greater degree of economic self-sufficiency.[26][71] After the Rhodesian Front began introducing incentives accorded to domestic production, industrial output expanded dramatically. A rigid system of countermeasures enacted to combat sanctions succeeded in blunting their impact for at least a decade.[5] Over the next nine years Rhodesian companies, spiting the freezing of their assets and blocking of overseas accounts, also perfected cunning techniques of sanctions evasion through both local and foreign subsidiaries, which operated on a clandestine trade network.[5]
From 1968 until 1970, there was virtually no further dialogue between Rhodesia and the UK. This altered immediately after the ascension of Edward Heath, who reopened negotiations.[72] Smith remained optimistic that Heath would do his utmost to remedy Anglo-Rhodesian relations, although disappointed that he continued to adhere publicly to the original "five principles" proposed by Alec Douglas-Home, now foreign secretary. In November 1971, Douglas-Home renewed contacts with Salisbury and announced a proposed agreement which would be satisfactory to both sides – it recognised Rhodesia's 1969 constitution as the legal frame of government, while agreeing that gradual legislative representation was an acceptable formula for unhindered advance to majority rule.[5] Nevertheless, the new settlement, if approved, would also implement an immediate improvement in black political status, offer a means to terminate racial discrimination, and provide a solid guarantee against retrogressive constitutional amendments.[73]
Implementation of the proposed settlement hinged on popular acceptance, but the Rhodesian government consistently refused to submit it to a universal referendum.[5] A twenty four-member commission headed by an eminent jurist, Lord Pearce, was therefore tasked with ascertaining public opinion on the subject.[74] In 1972, the commission began interviewing interest groups and sampling opinions – although concern was expressed over the widespread apathy encountered.[26] According to every published finding, whites were in favour of the settlement, and Rhodesians of mixed or Asian background generally pleased, while black reaction was resoundingly negative.[72][75] As many as thirty African chiefs and politicians voiced their opposition, prompting Britain to withdraw from the proposals on the grounds of the commission's report.[74]
The Bush War[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Bush War
As early as 1960, minority rule in Southern Rhodesia was already being challenged by a rising tide of political violence led by African nationalists such as Joshua Nkomo and Ndabaningi Sithole. After their public campaigns were initially suppressed, many believed that negotiation was completely incapable of meeting their aspirations. Petrol bombings by radicals became increasingly common, with the Zimbabwe Review observing in 1961, "for the first time home-made petrol bombs were used by freedom fighters in Salisbury against settler establishments."[76] It was officially noted that between January and September 1962 alone, 33 bombings were carried out, in addition to 27 acts of attempted sabotage on communications. In that same period, nationalists were implicated in arson targeting 18 schools and 10 churches.[43] Nkomo's Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU) subsequently disclosed that it had formed a military wing (Zimbabwe People's Revolutionary Army, ZIPRA), and 'the decision to start bringing in arms and ammunition and to send young men away for sabotage training' had already been made. The Rhodesian authorities responded by banning ZAPU and driving its supporters underground.[77] Frustrated by their repeated failures, nationalists also conducted a campaign of terror against black Africans, murdering those who had either identified with the colonial administration or had simply failed to demonstrate their allegiance to the cause.[43] To protect civilians, emergency laws were imposed, broadening the legal definition of unlawful gatherings and giving the police greater powers to crack down on agitators or subversives.[78] The death sentence was also introduced for terrorism involving explosives and arson.[5]
A crisis of confidence soon resulted across ZAPU, which was already suffering from poor morale, compounded by tribal and ideological factionalism. In 1963, party dissidents rejected Joshua Nkomo's authority and formed their own organisation, the Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU) – which worked out its own strategy for impressing international opinion, undermining white assurance, and achieving a complete breakdown of order. By August 1964, ZANU, which had brutally intimidated neutrals and opponents alike, was outlawed by authorities as well.[79]
ZANU's agenda was inward-looking, leftist, and pan-Africanist in nature. Ndabaningi Sithole and avowed Marxist Robert Mugabe, its most prominent leaders, demanded a one party Zimbabwean state with majority rule and a public monopoly on land.[5] After being forced from Rhodesia, they continued to operate in exile, creating occupation groups representing urban workers, miners, and peasant farmers. ZANU also attracted professionals, students, and feminists to its ranks. While ZAPU theoretically continued to command the allegiance of most Ndebele and Shona activists, Sithole and Mugabe drew their support from the Mashonaland countryside.[5]
After the UDI, ZANU officials mapped an elaborate plan for the "liberation of Zimbabwe" which called for attacks on white farmers, destruction of cash crops, disrupting electricity in urban areas, and petrol bombings.[43] Sithole and Nkomo both insisted on the need for armed struggle, but disagreed on the means to go about it. For example, ZAPU tended to follow Soviet thinking, placing an emphasis on sophisticated weaponry in the hopes of winning a conventional battle like the Viet Minh at Dien Bien Phu. ZANU preferred to politicise populations in areas which they intended to seize.[68] Neither force, however, had acquired basic knowledge of guerrilla warfare. Debate on political theory and insurgent tactics became the obsession of nationalists at this stage.[43]




Soldier interrogates Rhodesian villagers about insurgent activity in late 1977. This photograph became one of the most enduring images of the bush war.


In April 1966, two Zimbabwe African National Liberation Army (ZANLA – the military wing of ZANU) units, having received prior training at Nanjing Military College, crossed into Rhodesia from Zambia. They were armed with SKS carbines, Chinese hand grenades, explosives, and communist pamphlets, having been issued vague instructions to sabotage important installations before killing white persons indiscriminately.[43] At least five guerrillas were simply arrested before getting very far. Another seven hoped to destroy a pylon carrying electricity to Sinoia in the northwest. Their faulty demolitions were uncovered by the Rhodesian Security Forces and the men easily tracked to a nearby ranch on 28 April, where they were shot resisting capture.[68][80][81] This event is considered to have been the first engagement of what came to be known as the "Bush War" in Rhodesia and the "Second Chimurenga" (or rebellion in Shona) by supporters of the guerrillas.[82]
The campaign proper is generally considered to have started in 1972 with the Attack on Altena Farm, despite the minor threat already represented by the nationalist movements in the 1960s.
After unsuccessful appeals to Britain and the United States for military assistance, Robert Mugabe, who was based in Mozambique after that country's independence from Portugal in 1975, led ZANU to seek support from the People's Republic of China and countries of the Soviet Bloc. Joshua Nkomo, based in Zambia and also supported by the Soviet Union, led ZAPU.[83] ZANU and ZAPU together formed 'the Patriotic Front'. Broadly, ZANLA recruited mainly from Mashonaland and Manicaland provinces, whilst the ZIPRA recruited from Mashonaland West, Midlands and Matabeleland provinces of Zimbabwe.
After the collapse of Portuguese rule in Mozambique in 1974–75, it was no longer viable for the Smith regime to sustain white minority rule indefinitely. By this time, even South Africa's Vorster had come to this view. While Vorster was unwilling to make concessions to his own country's blacks, he concluded that white minority rule was not sustainable in a country where blacks outnumbered whites 22:1.[83] In 1978, there were 270,000 Rhodesians of European descent and more than six million Africans.[84]
International business groups involved in the country (e.g. Lonrho) transferred their support from the Rhodesian government to black nationalist parties. Business leaders and politicians feted Nkomo on his visits to Europe. ZANU also attracted business supporters who saw the course that future events were likely to take.[85] Funding and arms support provided by supporters, particularly from the Soviet Union and its allies in the latter 1970s, allowed both ZIPRA and the ZANLA to acquire more sophisticated weaponry, thereby increasing the military pressure that the guerrillas were able to place on Rhodesia.
Until 1972, containing the guerrillas was little more than a police action. Even as late as August 1975 when Rhodesian government and black nationalist leaders met at Victoria Falls for negotiations brokered by South Africa and Zambia, the talks never got beyond the procedural phase.[86] Rhodesian representatives made it clear they were prepared to fight an all out war to prevent majority rule.[87] However, the situation changed dramatically after the end of Portuguese colonial rule in Mozambique in 1975. Rhodesia now found itself almost entirely surrounded by hostile states and even South Africa, its only real ally, pressed for a settlement.

Having let slip one chance after another of reaching an accommodation with more moderate black leaders, Rhodesia's whites seem to have made the tragic choice of facing black nationalism over the barrel of a gun rather than the conference table. The downhill road toward a race war in Rhodesia is becoming increasingly slippery with blood.
— Rand Daily Mail editorial, May 1976[88]

At this point, ZANU's alliance with FRELIMO (the Liberation Front of Mozambique) and the porous border between Mozambique and eastern Rhodesia enabled large-scale training and infiltration of ZANU/ZANLA fighters. The governments of Zambia and Botswana were also emboldened sufficiently to allow resistance movement bases to be set up in their territories. Guerrillas began to launch operations deep inside Rhodesia, attacking roads, railways, economic targets and isolated security force positions, in 1976.[89]




Rhodesian servicewoman takes aim with her Browning Hi-Power 9×19mm semi-automatic pistol; from a 1976 army recruitment poster


The government adopted a 'strategic hamlets' policy of the kind used in Malaya and Vietnam to restrict the influence of insurgents over the population of rural areas. Local people were forced to relocate to protected villages (PVs) which were strictly controlled and guarded by the government against rebel atrocities. The protected villages were compared by the guerrillas to concentration camps. Some contemporary accounts claim that this interference in the lives of local residents induced many of them who had previously been neutral to support the guerrillas.[90]
The war degenerated into rounds of increasing brutality from all three parties involved (ZANU and ZAPU, and the Rhodesian Army fighting off their attacks). Mike Subritzky, a former NZ Army ceasefire monitor in Rhodesia, in 1980 described the war as "both bloody and brutal and brought out the very worst in the opposing combatants on all three sides."[91]
End of the Bush War[edit]









The geographical situation in 1965 (left, on UDI) and 1975 (right, after the independence of Mozambique and Angola from Portugal). Green: Rhodesia; purple: friendly nations; orange: hostile states.


Rhodesia began to lose vital economic and military support from South Africa, which, while sympathetic to the white minority government, never accorded it diplomatic recognition. The South African government placed limits on the fuel and munitions they supplied to the Rhodesian military. They also withdrew the personnel and equipment that they had previously provided to aid the war effort, though covert military support continued.[92]
In 1976, the South African government and United States governments worked together to place pressure on Smith to agree to a form of majority rule. In response to the initiative of US Secretary of State Henry Kissinger, in 1976 Ian Smith accepted the principle of black majority rule within two years.[92] The Rhodesians now offered more concessions, but those concessions, focused on reaching an "internal settlement" with moderate black leaders, were insufficient to end the war.
At the time, some Rhodesians said the still embittered history between the British-dominated Rhodesia and the Afrikaner-dominated South Africa partly led South African government to withdraw its aid to Rhodesia. Ian Smith said in his memoirs that even though many white South Africans supported Rhodesia, South African Prime Minister John Vorster's policy of détente with the Black African states ended up with Rhodesia being offered as the "sacrificial lamb" to buy more time for South Africa. Other observers perceived South Africa's distancing itself from Rhodesia as being an early move in the process that led to majority rule in South Africa itself.[93]

In 1976 South Africa saw settlement of the Rhodesian question as vital on several fronts: to cauterise the wound of the psychological blow … caused by her defeat in the Angolan conflict; to pre-empt possible Cuban intervention in Rhodesia and the possibility of South Africa being sucked into another Cold War regional conflict without the support and endorsement of the western powers
— Dr Sue Onslow, South Africa and UDI[94]


In the latter 1970s, the militants had successfully put the economy of Rhodesia under significant pressure while the numbers of guerrillas in the country were steadily increasing.[95][96] The government abandoned its early strategy of trying to defend the borders in favour of trying to defend key economic areas and lines of communication with South Africa, while the rest of the countryside became a patchwork of "no-go areas".
Late 1970s[edit]
By the late 1970s, Rhodesia's front-line forces contained about 25,000 regular troops and police – backed up by relatively strong army and police reserves.[97] Its mechanised contingent consisted of light armoured cars and improvised mine-protected armoured personnel carriers, complemented by eight tanks (Polish built T-55LD tanks), delivered in the last year of the war. The Rhodesian Air Force operated an assortment of both Canberra light bombers, Hawker Hunter fighter bombers, older de Havilland Vampire jets as well as a somewhat antiquated, but still potent, helicopter arm. These forces, including highly trained special operations units, were capable of launching devastating raids on resistance movement camps outside the country, as in Operation Dingo in 1977 and other similar operations.
Nevertheless, guerrilla pressure inside the country itself was steadily increasing in the latter 1970s. By 1978–79, the war had become a contest between the guerrilla warfare placing ever increasing pressure on the Rhodesian regime and civil population and the Rhodesian government's strategy of trying to hold off the militants until external recognition for a compromise political settlement with moderate black leaders could be secured.
By this time, the need to cut a deal was apparent to most Rhodesians, but not to all. Ian Smith had dismissed his intransigent Defence Minister, P. K. van der Byl, as early as 1976.[98] "PK" had been a hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opposition or the international community since before UDI.

...it is better to fight to the last man and the last cartridge and die with some honour. Because, what is being presented to us here is a degree of humiliation...
— P. K. van der Byl in 1977, commenting on a British peace plan.[99]

Van der Byl eventually retired to his country estate outside Cape Town, but there were elements in Rhodesia, mainly embittered former security force personnel, who forcibly opposed majority rule up to and well beyond the establishment of majority rule.[100] New white immigrants continued to arrive in Rhodesia right up to the eve of majority rule.[101]
Use of Poisons Against Guerrillas[edit]
Main article: Rhodesia and weapons of mass destruction
The program's primary purpose was to kill guerrillas whether they were recruits transiting to camps in Mozambique or guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia. The CBW effort took on the guerrilla threat from three fronts.[102] First, the effort aimed to eliminate guerrillas operating inside Rhodesia through contaminated supplies either provided by contact men, recovered from hidden caches, or stolen from rural stores.[103] Secondly, the effort worked to contaminate water supplies along guerrilla infiltration routes into Rhodesia, forcing the guerrillas either to travel through arid regions to carry more water and less ammunition or travel through areas patrolled by the security forces.[104] Finally, the Rhodesians sought to hit the guerrillas in their camps in Mozambique by poisoning food, beverages, and medicines.
The chemicals most used in the Rhodesian program were parathion (an organophosphate insecticide) and thallium (a heavy metal commonly found in rodenticide).[105] The Rhodesians selected for use also included Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera) and possibly Bacillus anthracis (causative agent of anthrax). They also looked at using Rickettsia prowazekii (causative agent of epidemic typhus), and Salmonella typhi (causative agent of typhoid fever), and toxins—such as ricin and botulinum toxin.[102]
Biological agents, namely Vibrio cholerae (causative agent of cholera), had some impact on the fighting capability of ZANLA.[106] Some former officers of the Rhodesian Security Forces alleged that anthrax was covertly used by Rhodesian psy-ops units during the late 1970s, but these statements are unfounded. Rhodesia never possessed the capability to produce anthrax spores on the scale needed for widespread dissemination.[102] Use of anthracis, ricin, or botulinum toxin would have been confined to assassination attempts.[102] Some more-merited allegations are that the South African government's top-secret chemical and biological weapons program, a progenitor of Project Coast, used Rhodesia as a "laboratory".[106]
Security Situation Erodes Rapidly[edit]
The work of journalists such as Lord Richard Cecil, son of the Marquess of Salisbury, stiffened the morale of Rhodesians and their overseas supporters.[107] Lord Richard produced regular news reports such as the Thames TV 'Frontline Rhodesia' features. These reports typically contrasted the incompetent insurgents with the "superbly professional" government troops.[108] A group of ZANLA fighters killed Lord Richard on 20 April 1978 when he was accompanying a Rhodesian airborne unit employed in Fire Force Operations.[109]
The shooting down on 3 September 1978 of the civilian Vickers Viscount airliner Hunyani, Air Rhodesia Flight RH825, in the Kariba area by ZIPRA fighters using a surface-to-air missile, with the subsequent massacre of its survivors, is widely considered to be the event that finally destroyed the Rhodesians' will to continue the war. Although militarily insignificant, the loss of this aircraft (and a second Viscount, the Umniati, in 1979) demonstrated the reach of resistance movements extended to Rhodesian civil society.[110]
The Rhodesians' means to continue the war were also eroding fast. In December 1978, a ZANLA unit penetrated the outskirts of Salisbury and fired a volley of rockets and incendiary device rounds into the main oil storage depot – the most heavily defended economic asset in the country. The storage tanks burned for five days, giving off a column of smoke that could be seen 130 kilometres (80 mi) away. Five hundred thousand barrels (79,000 m3) of petroleum product (comprising Rhodesia's strategic oil reserve) were lost.[111]
The government's defence spending increased from R$30 million, 8.5% of the national budget in 1971 to 1972, to R$400 m in 1978 to 1979, 47% of the national budget. In 1980, the post-independence government of Zimbabwe inherited a US$500 million national debt.[112]
End of UDI (1979)[edit]




Signing the Rhodesian Internal Settlement (from left: Bishop Abel Muzorewa, Ian Smith, Jeremiah Chirau and Ndabaningi Sithole)


The Rhodesian army continued its "mobile counter-offensive" strategy of holding key positions ("vital asset ground") while carrying out raids into the no-go areas and into neighbouring countries. While often extraordinarily successful in inflicting heavy guerrilla casualties, such raids also on occasion failed to achieve their objectives. In April 1979 special forces carried out a raid on Joshua Nkomo's residence in Lusaka (Zambia) with the stated intention of assassinating him.[113] Nkomo and his family left hastily a few hours before the raid – having clearly been warned that the raid was coming.
In 1979, some special forces units were accused of using counterinsurgent operations as cover for ivory poaching and smuggling. Colonel Reid-Daly (commander of the Selous Scouts) discovered that his phone was bugged and after challenging a superior officer on this issue was court martialled for insubordination. He received the lightest sentence possible, a caution, but he continued to fight his conviction and eventually resigned his commission and left the Army.
By 1978–79, up to 70% of the regular army was composed of black soldiers (though both the army and police reserves remained overwhelmingly white). By 1979 there were also 30 black commissioned officers in the regular army. While there was never any suggestion of disloyalty among the soldiers from predominantly black units (in particular within the Selous Scouts or the Rhodesian African Rifles – RAR), some argue that, by the time of the 1980 election, many of the RAR soldiers voted for Robert Mugabe.[114]
As the result of an Internal Settlement signed on 3 March 1978 between the Rhodesian government and the moderate African nationalist parties, which were not in exile and not involved in the war, elections were held in April 1979. The United African National Council (UANC) party won a majority in this election, and its leader, Abel Muzorewa (a United Methodist Church bishop), became the country's first black prime minister on 1 June 1979. The country's name was changed to Zimbabwe Rhodesia. The internal settlement left control of the country's police, security forces, civil service and judiciary in white hands, for the moment. It assured whites of about one third of the seats in parliament. It was essentially a power-sharing arrangement between whites and blacks which, in the eyes of many, particularly the insurgents, did not amount to majority rule.[115] However, the United States Senate voted to end economic sanctions against Zimbabwe Rhodesia on 12 June.[116]
While the 1979 election was described by the Rhodesian government as non-racial and democratic, it did not include the main nationalist parties ZANU and ZAPU. In spite of offers from Ian Smith, the latter parties declined to participate in an election in which their political position would be insecure and under a proposed constitution which they had played no part in drafting and which was perceived as retaining strong white minority privilege.
Bishop Muzorewa's government did not receive international recognition. The Bush War continued unabated and sanctions were not lifted. The international community refused to accept the validity of any agreement which did not incorporate the main nationalist parties. The British Government (then led by the recently elected Margaret Thatcher) issued invitations to all parties to attend a peace conference at Lancaster House. These negotiations took place in London in late 1979. The three-month-long conference almost failed to reach conclusion, due to disagreements on land reform, but resulted in the Lancaster House Agreement. UDI ended, and Rhodesia temporarily reverted to the status of a British colony (the 'Colony of Southern Rhodesia').[117]
The Lancaster House Agreement further provided for a ceasefire which was followed by an internationally supervised general election, held on February 1980. ZANU led by Robert Mugabe won this election, some alleged,[who?] by terrorising its political opposition, including supporters of ZAPU, through former insurgents that had not confined themselves to the designated guerrilla assembly points, as stipulated by the Lancaster House Agreement. The observers and the newly installed governor Lord Soames were accused of looking the other way, and Mugabe's victory was certified. Nevertheless, few could doubt that Mugabe's support within his majority Shona tribal group was extremely strong. The Rhodesian military seriously considered mounting a coup against a perceived stolen election ("Operation Quartz") to prevent ZANU from taking over the country.[118] The alleged coup was to include the assassination of Mugabe and coordinated assaults on guerrilla assembly points throughout the country. The plan was eventually scuttled, as it was obvious that Mugabe enjoyed widespread support from the black majority despite voter intimidation, as well as the fact that the coup would gain no external support, and a conflagration which would engulf the country was seen as inevitable.
Republic of Zimbabwe (1980)[edit]
Mugabe and the victorious black nationalists were rather less concerned by Operation Quartz than by the possibility that there might be a mass exodus of the white community of the kind that had caused chaos in Mozambique five years earlier. Such an exodus had been prepared for by the South African government. With the agreement of the British Governor of Rhodesia, South African troops had entered the country to secure the road approaches to the Beit Bridge border crossing point. Refugee camps had been prepared in the Transvaal. On the day the election results became known, most white families had prepared contingency plans for flight, including the packing of cars and suitcases.
However, after a meeting with Robert Mugabe and the central committee of ZANU (PF), Ian Smith was reassured that whites could, and should stay in the new Zimbabwe. Mugabe promised that he would abide strictly by the terms of the Lancaster House Agreement and that changes in Zimbabwe would be made gradually and by proper legal process. In a CBS news interview, Mugabe claimed that Rhodesian whites "...are still in control of the economy, the majority being commercial farmers.",[119] Mugabe however, would reverse his commitment to these agreements some years later; the regime began confiscating white owned farm lands. This is widely blamed for leading to the deterioration of the Zimbabwean economy which plagues the country today.[120]
On 18 April 1980 the country became independent as the Republic of Zimbabwe, and its capital, Salisbury, was renamed Harare two years later.
Politics[edit]



Rhodesia






This article is part of a series on the
politics and government of
Rhodesia




Constitutional history



— Overview
1890–1923  BSA Company rule
1923–1980  Southern Rhodesia
1953–1963  Rhodesia–Nyasaland Federation
1965–1979  Rhodesia under UDI
 1979  Zimbabwe Rhodesia (under UDI)









Government


Governor / President
Prime Minister








Legislature



1899–1923  Legislative Council
1924–1970  Legislative Assembly









Elections


General


1924 1928 1933 1934 1939 1946 1948 1954 1958 1962 1965 1970 1974 1977 1979 1980



Legislative Council


1899 1902 1905 1908 1911 1914 1920



Referendums


1922 1934 1953 1961 1964 1969 1979











Political parties


African National Congress
Communist Party
Labour Party
Liberal Party
Rhodesia Party
Rhodesian Action Party
Rhodesian Front
United African National Council
United Federal Party

Zimbabwe African National Union (ZANU)


Zimbabwe African People's Union (ZAPU)









Foreign relations



Unilateral Declaration of Independence (UDI)

Mission in Lisbon
Passport








National symbols


Flag (other flags)
Anthem









Other countries
Atlas








v
t
e





Main article: Politics of Rhodesia




The Presidential flag of Rhodesia.


Although Southern Rhodesia never gained full dominion status within the Commonwealth of Nations, Southern Rhodesians ruled themselves from the attainment of 'Responsible Government' in 1923. Its electoral register had property and education qualifications. Over the years various electoral arrangements made at a national and municipal level upheld these standards. For example, the franchise for the first Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council election in 1899 contained the following requirement:

"voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth £75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of £50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months' continuous residence was also required for qualifications (b) and (c)."

Following Cecil Rhodes's dictum of "equal rights for all civilised men", there was no overt racial component to the franchise. However, the requirement excluded a majority of native blacks from the electorate.
Up until the 1950s, Southern Rhodesia had a vibrant political life with right and left wing parties competing for power. The Rhodesian Labour Party held seats in the Assembly and in municipal councils throughout the 1920s and 1930s. From 1953 to 1958, the prime minister was Garfield Todd, a liberal who did much to promote the development of the Black community through investment in education, housing and healthcare. However, the government forced Todd from office because his proposed reforms were seen by many whites as too radical.
From 1958 onwards, white settler politics consolidated and ossified around resistance to majority rule, setting the stage for UDI. The 1961 Constitution governed Southern Rhodesia and independent Rhodesia up until 1969, using the Westminster Parliamentary System modified by a system of separate voter rolls with differing property and education qualifications, without regard to race. Whites ended up with the majority of Assembly seats.
The 1969 republican constitution established a bicameral Parliament consisting of an indirectly elected Senate and a directly elected House of Assembly, effectively reserving the majority of seats for whites. The office of President had only ceremonial significance with the Prime Minister holding executive power.
The Constitution of the short-lived Zimbabwe Rhodesia, which saw a black-led government elected for the first time, reserved 28 of the 100 parliamentary seats for whites. The independence constitution agreed at Lancaster House watered those provisions down and reserved 20 out of 100 seats for whites in the House of Assembly and 8 out of 40 seats in the Senate. The constitution prohibited Zimbabwe authorities from altering the Constitution for seven years without unanimous consent and required a three-quarters vote in Parliament for a further three years. The government amended the Constitution in 1987 to abolish the seats reserved for whites, and replace the office of Prime Minister with an executive President. In 1990, the government abolished the Senate.
Military and police[edit]
Main article: Rhodesian Security Forces
Rhodesian Security Forces consisted of the Rhodesian Army, Royal Rhodesian Air Force, British South Africa Police, Rhodesian Ministry of Internal Affairs (INTAF) and the Guard Force. Despite the impact of economic and diplomatic sanctions, Rhodesia was able to develop and maintain a potent and professional military capability.[121] Time magazine reported in June 1977 that "man for man, the Rhodesian army ranks among the world's finest fighting units."[122]
Foreign relations[edit]





This section needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (February 2011) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Throughout the period of its Unilateral Declaration of Independence (1965 to 1979), Rhodesia pursued a foreign policy of attempting to secure recognition as an independent country, and insisting that its political system would include 'gradual steps to majority rule.' Ardently anti-communist, Rhodesia tried to present itself to the West as a front-line state against communist expansion in Africa, to little avail. Rhodesia received little international recognition during its existence; recognition only occurred after elections in 1980 and a transition to majority rule.
Rhodesia wished to retain its economic prosperity and also feared communist elements in the rebel forces, and thus felt their policy of a gradual progression to black majority rule was justified. However, the international community refused to accept this rationale, believing that their policies were perpetuating racism. This attitude was part of the larger decolonisation context, during which Western powers such as the United Kingdom, France, and Belgium hastened to grant independence to their colonies in Africa.
Britain and the UDI[edit]
Rhodesia was originally a British colony. Although decolonisation in Africa had begun after World War II, it began accelerating in the early 1960s, causing Britain to negotiate independence rapidly with several of its colonies. During this period, it adopted a foreign policy called NIBMAR, or No Independence Before Majority African Rule, mandating democratic reforms that placed governance in the hands of the majority black Africans. The governing white minority of Rhodesia, led by Ian Smith, opposed the policy and its implications. On 11 November 1965, Rhodesia's minority white government made a unilateral declaration of independence (UDI) from the United Kingdom, as it became apparent that negotiations would not lead to independence under the white regime.
The United Kingdom government immediately brought in legislation (Southern Rhodesia Act 1965) which formally abolished all Rhodesian government institutions. This move made life difficult for Rhodesian citizens who wished to travel internationally as passports issued by Rhodesia's UDI administration were not recognised as valid;[123] in January 1966, the British issued a statement accepting as valid any passport issued before the declaration of independence and allowing six-month United Kingdom passports to be granted when they expired – provided that the bearer declared they did not intend to aid the UDI Rhodesian government.[124]
Until late 1969, Rhodesia still recognised Queen Elizabeth II as head of state, even though it opposed the British government itself for hindering its goals of independence. The Queen, however, refused to accept the title Queen of Rhodesia. Eventually, the Smith government abandoned attempts to remain loyal to the Crown, and in 1969, a majority of the electorate voted in referendum to declare Rhodesia a republic. They hoped that this move would facilitate recognition as an independent state by the international community, but the issues of white minority control remained and hindered this effort, and like the UDI before it, the proclamation of a republic lacked international recognition.
Sanctions[edit]
After the declaration of independence, and indeed for the entire duration of its existence, Rhodesia did not receive official recognition from any state, although it did maintain diplomatic relations with South Africa, which was then under apartheid. South Africa did not recognise Rhodesia to preserve its fragile positions with other nations, but frequently assisted the republic. Portugal maintained informal relations until the Carnation Revolution of 1974. The day following the declaration of independence, the United Nations Security Council passed a resolution (S/RES/216) calling upon all states not to accord Rhodesia recognition, and to refrain from any assistance. The Security Council also imposed selective mandatory economic sanctions, which were later made comprehensive.
Malawi,[125] Israel, South Africa, Portugal, and Iran did not comply with economic sanctions against Rhodesia.[126] The US, despite voting in favor of the sanctions at the UNSC, violated them to buy chrome ore from Rhodesia.[127] Kenneth Kaunda, president of Zambia, also accused western oil companies of violating the sanctions and selling oil to Rhodesia.[128]
International perspective[edit]
Rhodesia's Unilateral Declaration of Independence from the United Kingdom on 11 November 1965 was promptly condemned by the international community. The United Nations Security Council Resolution 216 of 12 November 1965 called "upon all States not to recognise this illegal racist minority regime in Southern Rhodesia."[129]
Rhodesia campaigned for international acceptance and invoked the doctrine of non-intervention in internal affairs as justification for rebuking external criticism of its internal policies. However, the emerging doctrine of self-determination in colonial situations meant that most nations regarded Rhodesia as illegitimate.
Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia, took a pragmatic approach towards Rhodesia. Kenneth Kaunda, heavily dependent on access through Rhodesia for his nation's copper ore exports, fuel, and power imports unofficially worked with the Rhodesian government. Rhodesia still allowed Zambia to export and import its goods through its territory to Mozambique ports, despite the Zambian government's official policy of hostility and non-recognition of the post-UDI Smith Administration.
The United States, like all other Western nations, refused to recognise Rhodesia, but unlike others allowed its Consulate-General to function as a communications conduit between the American government in Washington, D.C., and the Rhodesian government in Salisbury. When Rhodesia set up an information office in Washington, D.C., OAS nations loudly protested. The US government responded by saying the Rhodesian mission and its staff had no official diplomatic status and violated no US laws.
Portugal pursued a middle path with Rhodesia. While not officially recognising Rhodesia under Ian Smith, the government of António Salazar did permit Rhodesia to establish a representative mission in Lisbon, and permitted Rhodesian exports and imports through their colony of Mozambique. The Portuguese government in power at that time, authoritarian and ardently anti-communist, gave active behind-the-scenes support in Rhodesia's fight against the guerrilla groups.
South Africa, itself under international pressure as a white minority government, pursued a policy of détente with the black African states at the time. These states wanted South Africa to pressure Ian Smith to accept a faster transition to majority rule in Rhodesia, in return for pledges of non-interference in South Africa's internal affairs. Prime Minister John Vorster, believing majority rule in Rhodesia would lead to international acceptance for South Africa, used a number of tactics to pressure Smith. The South African government held up shipments of fuel and ammunition and pulled out friendly South African forces from Rhodesia. The combined loss of Mozambique and the loss of support from South Africa dealt critical blows to the Rhodesian government.
Diplomatic relations[edit]
After the UDI, Rhodesia maintained several overseas missions, including Pretoria,[130] and until 1975, Lisbon in Portugal and Lourenço Marques (now Maputo) in Mozambique.[131]
Since 1961, Rhodesia had had an "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" with South Africa, heading a "Rhodesian Diplomatic Mission" or de facto embassy.[132] Before South Africa left the Commonwealth that year, the then Southern Rhodesia had exchanged High Commissioners with the then Union of South Africa, but following the change in status, the Republic now had a "South African Diplomatic Mission" in Salisbury.[133]
During 1965, the government of Rhodesia made moves to establish a mission in Lisbon separate from the British Embassy, with its own accredited representative, having previously been able to establish its own consulate in Lourenço Marques, capital of Portuguese Mozambique.[134] This prompted protests from the British government, which was determined that the representative, Harry Reedman, should be a nominal member of the British Ambassador's staff.[135] For their part, the Portuguese authorities sought a compromise whereby they would accept Reedman as an independent representative but deny him diplomatic status.[136]
The Rhodesian Information Office in Washington remained open following UDI, but its director, Ken Towsey, and his staff were deprived of their diplomatic status.[137] Previously, there had been a "Minister for Rhodesian Affairs" operating under the aegis of the British Embassy in Washington,[138] as well representatives in Tokyo and Bonn.[139] Following the country's independence as Zimbabwe, Towsey became chargé d'affaires at the new Embassy.[140]
The High Commission in London, known as Rhodesia House, continued to function until it was closed in 1969 following the decision by white Rhodesians in a referendum to make the country a republic, along with the "British Residual Mission" in Salisbury.[141] Prior to its closure, the mission flew the newly adopted Flag of Rhodesia, considered illegal by the Foreign Office, prompting calls by Labour MP Willie Hamilton for its removal.[142]
In Australia, the federal government in Canberra sought to close the Rhodesian Information Centre in Sydney,[143] but it remained open, operating under the jurisdiction of the state of New South Wales.[144] In 1973, the Labor government of Gough Whitlam cut post and telephone links to the Centre, but this was ruled illegal by the High Court.[145] An office was also established in Paris, but this was closed down by the French government in 1977.[146]
Similarly, the United States recalled its consul-general from Salisbury, and reduced consular staff,[147] but did not move to close its consulate until the declaration of a republic in 1970.[148] South Africa, however, retained its "Accredited Diplomatic Representative" after UDI,[149] which allowed it to continue to recognise British sovereignty as well as to deal with the de facto authority of the government of Ian Smith.[150]
The South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury became the only such mission remaining in the country after 1975,[151] when Portugal downgraded its mission to consul level,[152] having recalled its consul-general in Salisbury in May 1970.[153] After Zimbabwe's independence, the new government closed its missions in Pretoria and Cape Town, only maintaining a trade mission in Johannesburg,[154] while the South African Diplomatic Mission in Salisbury was also closed.[155]
Results[edit]
Continuing civil war and a lack of international support eventually led the Rhodesian government to submit to an agreement with the UK in 1979. This led to internationally supervised elections, won by Zimbabwe African National Union - Patriotic Front and Robert Mugabe, establishing the internationally recognised Zimbabwe.
Legacy[edit]
In the ten years after independence, around 60% of the white population of Zimbabwe emigrated, most to South Africa and to other mainly white, English speaking countries where they formed expatriate communities. Politically within Zimbabwe, the consolidation of power by Robert Mugabe continued through the 1980s. Following amendments to the country's constitution in 1987, parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished, and an executive presidency was created, held by Mugabe. Many expatriates and some of the whites who stayed in Zimbabwe became deeply nostalgic for Rhodesia. These individuals are known as "Rhodies." Native whites who are more accepting of the new order are known as "Zimbos."
While as Rhodesia, the country was once considered the breadbasket of Africa. Today, Zimbabwe is a net importer of foodstuffs, with the European Union and United States providing emergency food relief as humanitarian aid on a regular basis.[156] The nation has suffered profound economic and social decline in the past twenty years. Recently the agriculture sector has started to do well since the availability of expertise and machines has improved supported mainly by China.[157][158]
Zimbabwe also suffered from a crippling inflation rate, as the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe had a policy of printing money to satisfy government debts, which introduces excessive currency into the economic system which led to the demise of the local currency. This policy caused the inflation rate to soar from 32% in 1998 (considered extremely high by most economic standards) to an astonishing 11,200,000% by 2007. Monetary aid by the International Monetary Fund has been suspended due to the Zimbabwe government's defaulting on past loans, inability to stabilise its own economy, and its inability to stem corruption and advance human rights.[156] In 2009, Zimbabwe abandoned its currency, relying instead on foreign currencies such as the South African rand, the US dollar, the Botswana pula, the euro and the British pound, among others.[159]
In 2008 elections, Mugabe garnered 41%, Simba Makoni 10% and Morgan Tsvangirai 48% of the votes cast for president forcing a runoff election called by the Zimbabwe Electoral Commission (ZEC). In the months leading to the run-off, instances of extreme violence between the two major parties (ZANU PF and MDC) led Tsvangirai to withdraw from the election. In February 2009, a power-sharing accord was reached which resulted in the Zimbabwe Government of National Unity of 2009. The accord was, essentially, to create the position of "Prime Minister" for Tsvangirai, who served in that role from 2009 to 2013. Mugabe retained the title of President.
Rhodesian media[edit]
The main newspapers were the Rhodesia Herald in Salisbury and The Chronicle in Bulawayo. Following UDI, in 1976, the state-run Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation (RBC) took over the privately owned Rhodesian Television (RTV) service, in which it had previously acquired a 51 per cent stake.[160] Among the news magazines published in Rhodesia under UDI were the Illustrated Life Rhodesia, while The Valiant Years by Beryl Salt told the history of Rhodesia from 1890 to 1978 entirely through the medium of facsimile reproduction of articles and headlines from Rhodesian newspapers.[161]
References[edit]


^ a b Rowland, J. Reid. "Constitutional History of Rhodesia: An outline".  in Berlyn, Phillippa (April 1978). The Quiet Man: A Biography of the Hon. Ian Douglas Smith. Salisbury: M. O. Collins. pp. 240–256. OCLC 4282978. 
^

Palley, Claire (1966). The Constitutional History and Law of Southern Rhodesia 1888–1965, with Special Reference to Imperial Control (First ed.). Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 742–743. OCLC 406157. 


^ a b c d Duignan, Peter (1986), Politics and Government in African States 1960–1985, Croom Helm Ltd, ISBN 0-7099-1475-X 
^ Volume V: Africa, Australia, and Southern Islands. Lands and Peoples: The World in Color. The Grolier Society of Canada Ltd 1955. Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 54-11291. p 19-109.
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t Nelson, Harold (1983), Zimbabwe: a country study, The American University (Washington, D.C.), ISBN 0160015987 
^ "Rhodesia – Mzilikaze to Smith". Rhodesia.nl. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "The Cabinet Papers | Rhodesia and the Central African Federation". Nationalarchives.gov.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "History of Zimbabwe". Historyworld.net. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645 - Authority for date of annexation having been 12 September 1923
^ a b Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia by Vera Gowlland-Debbas
^ Stella Madzibamuto v Desmond William Larder – Burke, Fredrick Phillip George (1969) A.C 645
^ Southern Rhodesia Constitution Letters Patent 1923
^ "Parliament". Rhodesia.me.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Full text of "Southern Rhodesia 1890–1950; A Record of Sixty Years Progress"". Archive.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbambwe". Sapst.org. 22 December 1987. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Weitzer, Ronald. Transforming Settler States: Communal Conflict and Internal Security in Northern Ireland and Zimbabwe. pp. 1–206. 
^ afrikantraveler (16 May 2012). "Rhodesia: A Failed Attempt to Maintain Racism into the 21st Century". The African File. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Hastings Kamuzu Banda Biography – Detoured on Road to Become a Doctor, Pursued Degrees with Diligence, Spoke Out Against Racism – JRank Articles". Biography.jrank.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Novak, Andrew. "Academia.edu | Sport and Racial Discrimination in Colonial Zimbabwe: A Reanalysis | Andrew Novak". Independent.academia.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Wills, A.J. (1967). "Three Territories". An Introduction to the History of Central Africa (2nd ed.). Durban: Oxford University Press. p. Appendix IV. ISBN 0-620-06410-2. Retrieved 10 September 2012. 
^ "Database – Uppsala Conflict Data Program". UCDP. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "On Board the Tiger". Rhodesia.nl. 9 October 1968. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA PSYOP 1965". Psywarrior.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A brief history of Zimbabwe". Zimembassy.se. 18 April 1980. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ a b c d Smith, Ian (1997). The Great Betrayal. London: Blake Publishing Ltd. pp. 74–256. ISBN 1-85782-176-9. 
^ "Chronology: Rhodesia UDI: Road to Settlement" (PDF). Lse.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Principled failure: British policy toward Rhodesia, 1971–72 | Assorted Materials: Johnny Ryan". Johnnyryan.wordpress.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA: DEFINITION OF THE FIVE PRINCIPLES (Hansard, 16 December 1970)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 16 December 1970. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Chronology for Europeans in Zimbabwe". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "A Brief History of Zimbabwe – Part 1: Early Kingdoms to UDI". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cowell, Alan (21 November 2007). "Ian Smith, Defiant Symbol of White Rule in Africa, Is Dead at 88". The New York Times. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Zimbabwe (country)". Talktalk.co.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Policy For Rhodesia from theTribune Magazine Archive". Archive.tribunemagazine.co.uk. 23 September 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "White referendum in Southern Rhodesia is overwhelmingly in support of Ian Smith's proposal for independence. | South African History Online". Sahistory.org.za. 6 November 1964. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "British South Rhodesia (1964–1980)". Uca.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Elections in Zimbabwe". Africanelections.tripod.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Lunch with Harold Wilson | Pop Theory". Clivebarnett.wordpress.com. 12 September 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia: The Last Thread". TIME. 30 December 1966. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Chris McGreal (13 April 2008). "There are many villains to blame for Zimbabwe's decade of horror | World news | The Observer". London: Guardian. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Mungazi, Dickson. Last Defenders of the Laager: Ian D. Smith and F.W. de Klerk. pp. 1–288. 
^ a b c d Raftopolous, Brian. Becoming Zimbabwe: A History from the pre-colonial period to 2008. pp. 1–298. 
^ a b c d e f g h Raeburn, Michael. We are everywhere: Narratives from Rhodesian guerillas. pp. 1–209. 
^ "Issue 6, Spring 2011". Genocidepreventionnow.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "RHODESIA (Hansard, 21 January 1969)". Hansard.millbanksystems.com. 21 January 1969. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Question of Southern Rhodesia". undocs.org. United Nations. 12 October 1965. A/RES/2012(XX). Retrieved 17 March 2017. 
^ "Southern Times-Learning From Rhodesia". Southerntimesafrica.com. 12 November 1965. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees. "Refworld | Resolution 221 (1966) of 9 April 1966". UNHCR. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Gowlland-Debbas, Vera (1990), Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers, ISBN 0-7923-0811-5 
^ "The Secretary of State, Washington" (PDF). Gwu.edu. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Okoth, Assa (2006), A History of Africa: Volume 2: 1915–1995, East African Educational Publishers Ltd, ISBN 9966-25-358-0 
^ "When Sanctions Worked: The Case of Rhodesia Reexamined". Africafocus.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Rhodesia Unilateral Declaration of Independence 1965 – Online exhibition". Commonwealth.sas.ac.uk. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Meredith, Martin. The Past is Another Country. p. 218. 
^ "1970:Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". BBC News. 2 March 1970. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "Chemistry – Ian Smith". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "Chemistry – Humphrey Gibbs". State.chemistrydaily.com. 22 July 2012. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Herald, Salisbury, 13 to 20 September 1968
^ "Stella Madzimbamuto (Appellant) v Desmond William Lardner Burke and Frederick Phillip George (Respondents)" (PDF). Jurisafrica.org. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "In re James (an insolvent)". Uniset.ca. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Lauterpacht, Elihu. International Law Reports (Volume 39). pp. 1–78. 
^ http://archive.lib.msu.edu/DMC/African%20Journals/pdfs/Journal%20of%20the%20University%20of%20Zimbabwe/vol3n1/juz003001001.pdf
^ "HMS Tiger". Barrylockyer.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Smock, David R. "The Forgotten Rhodesians". Foreign Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Cockram, B. "Rhodesia Rides A Tiger" (PDF). South African Institute of International Affairs. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "2 March 1970 – Rhodesia Declared a Republic". Africanhistory.about.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ "BBC ON THIS DAY - 2 - 1970: Ian Smith declares Rhodesia a republic". bbc.co.uk. 
^ a b c Clayton, Anthony. Frontiersmen: Warfare in Africa since 1950. pp. 1–260. 
^ Dr. Sue Onslow. "UDI: 40 Years On". LSE. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ Michael Hartnack (2005). "40 years in wilderness after UDI declaration". The Herald. Retrieved 10 November 2007. 
^ "What's Wrong With Trade Sanctions". Cato Institute. 23 December 1985. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Brownell, Josiah. Collapse of Rhodesia: Population Demographics and the Politics of Race. pp. 1–255. 
^ "Zimbabwe Rejects Sellout!" (PDF). American Committee on Africa. 1 February 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ a b Zvobgo, Chengetai. A History of Zimbabwe, 1890–2000 and Postscript, Zimbabwe, 2001–2008. pp. 1–410. 
^ "1972: Rhodesia's former leader arrested". BBC. 18 January 1972. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ "Insurgency in Rhodesia, 1957–1973: An Account and Assessment". International Institute for Strategic Studies. 1973. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Shamuyarira, Nathan. Crisis in Rhodesia. pp. 202–203. 
^ Palm Beach Post, Miami, 26 March 1959
^ "The Rhodesian Agreement: Aspects and Prospects". South African Institute of International Affairs. 1978. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Moorcraft and McLaughlin, Peter, Paul (2008). The Rhodesian War: A Military History. pp. 1–200. 
^ "Rhodesian Air Force Anti Terrorist Operations (COINOPS)". rhodesianforces.org. 2012. Retrieved 13 October 2012. 
^ Spring, William (1986). The Long Fields: Zimbabwe Since Independence. p. 38. 
^ a b "APF newsletter, "Appraisal of Rhodesia in 1975"". Archived from the original on 31 May 2009. 
^ Ian Beckett. "Report on Bush War, paragraph 10". 
^ The Guardian, 21 April 2000 British Multimillionaire bankrolls Mugabe party
^ Brookings Institution: p156, study on conflict resolution
^ "Peace talks fail". BBC news. 26 August 1975. Retrieved 27 November 2007. 
^ "Rhodesia: A Strike At the Lifeline". Rand Daily Mail via TIME magazine. 1976. p. 2. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ "A Strike at the Lifeline". TIME magazine. 1976. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ APF Newsletter, 1976 :Rhodesia's "Protected" Blacks
^ "Operation Agila, "The British Empire's Last Sunset"". NZ History. Retrieved 23 November 2007. 
^ a b "BBC ON THIS DAY | 24 | 1976: White rule in Rhodesia to end". BBC News. 24 September 1976. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ APF newsletter, 1976: appraisal of Rhodesia in 1976
^ "Cold War Studies Project". lse.ac.uk. 
^ Time magazine, 7 August 1978: Rhodesia faces collapse
^ Time magazine, 1 August 1978: taking the chicken run
^ Major Charles Lohman and Major Robert MacPherson. ""Rhodesia: Tactical Victory, Strategic Defeat" WAR SINCE 1945 SEMINAR AND SYMPOSIUM, US Marine Corps Command and Staff College, June 1983 – See Chapter 3". Scribd.com. Retrieved 9 October 2012. 
^ Rhodesia Worldwide:"PK"
^ The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p 291
^ Newsnet report : saboteurs hit Zimbabwean military, partisan comment
^ Time magazine, October 1977 : The Land of Opportunity
^ a b c d Glenn Cross, "Dirty War: Rhodesia and Chemical Biological Warfare, 1975-1980," Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, 2017
^ Ed Bird. Special Branch War: Slaughter in the Rhodesian Bush Southern Ndebele land, 1976-1980. Solihull, UK: Helion & Company, Ltd. 2014.
^ Jim Parker, "Assignment Selous Scouts: The Inside Story of a Rhodesian Special Branch Officer". Johannesburg, South Africa: Galago Press, 2006
^ Chandré Gould and Peter Folb. "Project Coast: Apartheid’s Chemical and Biological Warfare Programme". Geneva: United Nations Institute for Disarmament Research, 2002.
^ a b Southern African News Feature: the plague wars
^ The Guardian, 15 July 2003: obituary of sixth Marquess of Salisbury
^ Nick Downie report: caution, partisan comment
^ 2nd Lt CJE Vincent BCR who was present when Lord Cecil was killed
^ The Viscount Disasters – The Story
^ The Atlantic Monthly : The Fragility of Domestic Energy, see page 5
^ Selby thesis: ZWNEWS.com, p 88
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War, para 7.
^ Ian Beckett :report on Bush War.
^ BBC "On this day" report :1 June 1979.
^ Senate Votes Down A Move To Preserve Rhodesia Sanctions; Arms-Bill Veto Threatened White House Says 52-to-41 Margin Shows President Has Support to Prevent an Override, 13 June 1979. The New York Times.
^ Southern Rhodesia (Annexation) Order in Council, July 30, 1923 which provided by section 3 thereof: "From and after the coming into operation of this Order the said territories shall be annexed to and form part of His Majesty's Dominions, and shall be known as the Colony of Southern Rhodesia."
^ Allport, R. "Operation Quartz – Rhodesia 1980" (PDF). memoriesofrhodesia.com. 
^ Video on YouTube
^ "Ian Smith's farm seized in Zimbabwe as Robert Mugabe eyes election". BBC News. 7 December 2012. 
^ Rogers 1998, p. 41
^ "The World: The Military: A Mission Impossible". Time. New York. 13 June 1977. Retrieved 3 December 2011. 
^ The Southern Rhodesia (Property in Passports) Order 1965 provided that they were the property of the British government, allowing them to be impounded if presented by anyone arriving at a port of entry. See Hansard, HC 5ser vol 721 col 696.
^ The statement is printed in Hansard HC 5ser vol 723 col 4.
^ http://content.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,836951,00.html
^ http://www.southafricaproject.info/rhodesia_and_south_africa.html
^ https://library.cqpress.com/cqalmanac/document.php?id=cqal75-1214210
^ https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1978/09/22/zambian-to-meet-with-callaghan-on-un-oil-sanction-violations/bdd35f61-e9cb-463f-a319-38981df92cf3/
^ Wikisource:United Nations Security Council Resolution 216
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 52
^ Rhodesians to quit Lisbon, Glasgow Herald, 1 May 1975, page 4
^ Report of the Secretary for Information, Immigration, and Tourism
^ Diplomacy with a Difference: the Commonwealth Office of High Commissioner, 1880-2006, Lorna Lloyd, BRILL, 2007, page 240
^ John Arthur KINSEY, Esq., Consul-General for the Federation at Lourenco Marques, London Gazette, 5th June 1959
^ Rhodesia's Man in Lisbon: Objective Said To Be Achieved, The Glasgow Herald, 22 September 1965. page 9
^ International Diplomacy and Colonial Retreat, Kent Fedorowich, Martin Thomas Routledge, 2013, page 186
^ Goldberg Back British Stand In U.N. Session,Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, November 13, 1965
^ Isolated States: A Comparative Analysis, Deon Geldenhuys, Cambridge University Press, 1990, page 62
^ Collective Responses to Illegal Acts in International Law: United Nations Action in the Question of Southern Rhodesia, Vera Gowlland-Debbas, Martinus Nijhoff Publishers. 1990
^ Rhodesia's Lobbyist Back for Mugabe, The Washington Post, June 26, 1980
^ RHODESIA, Hansard, HC Deb 24 June 1969 vol 785 cc1218-27
^ M.P. CALLS FOR REMOVAL OF RHODESIAN FLAG IN STRAND, The Glasgow Herald, January 4, 1969, page 1
^ Rhodesia Office Will Be Closed, The Age, April 3, 1972
^ The Nationals: The Progressive, Country, and National Party in New South Wales 1919-2006, Paul Davey, Federation Press, 2006 page 223
^ [rathall+rhodesia++Minister+of+Finance+and+of+Posts+and+ Telecommunications&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=whitlam Africa Contemporary Record: Annual Survey and Documents, Volume 6], Colin Legum, Africana Publishing Company, 1974
^ US Not Closing Rhodesian Office, The Lewiston Daily Sun, August 27, 1977, page 8
^ US To Restrict Sales To Rhodesia, Reading Eagle, December 12, 1965
^ The Superpowers and Africa: The Constraints of a Rivalry, 1960-1990, Zaki Laïdi University of Chicago Press, 1990, page 55
^ Foreign Affairs for New States: Some Questions of Credentials, Peter John Boyce, University of Queensland Press, January 1977, page 13
^ Confrontation and Accommodation in Southern Africa: The Limits of Independence, Kenneth W. Grundy, University of California Press, 1973, page 257
^ Native Vs. Settler: Ethnic Conflict in Israel/Palestine, Northern Ireland, and South Africa, Thomas G. Mitchell Greenwood Publishing Group, 2000, page 141
^ Sanctions: The Case of Rhodesia, Harry R. Strack, Syracuse University Press, 1978, page 77
^ Portugal Severs Key Link With Rhodesia, Sarasota Herald-Tribune, April 27, 1970
^ Coming To Terms: Zimbabwe in the International Arena, Richard Schwartz I.B.Tauris, 2001, page 68
^ Salisbury whites queue up to flee, The Age, July 8, 1980
^ a b "The World Factbook". cia.gov. 
^ Published in 2010, research by Ian Scoones on land reform in Masvingo, Zimbabwe.
^ GDP percentage growth 2010 and Tobabcco auctions 2010
^ BBC News, 29 January 2009: Zimbabwe abandons its currency
^ Broadcasting: An Introduction, John R. Bittner, Prentice-Hall International, 1980, page 263
^ Salt, Beryl (1978). The Valiant Years. 


External links[edit]





This article's use of external links may not follow Wikipedia's policies or guidelines. Please improve this article by removing excessive or inappropriate external links, and converting useful links where appropriate into footnote references. (October 2012) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)



Find more aboutRhodesiaat Wikipedia's sister projects

Definitions from Wiktionary
Media from Commons
News from Wikinews
Quotations from Wikiquote
Texts from Wikisource
Textbooks from Wikibooks
Learning resources from Wikiversity



Rhodesian Bush War historical research / discussion forum
Rhodesian Bush War Photographs




Wikimedia Commons has media related to Rhodesia.



The Viscount disasters of 1978 and 1979
Ironing the lawn in Salisbury – the last days of Rhodesia (The Guardian)
Ian Beckett, an account of the Bush War (in 2 parts)
Rhodesian and South African Military History – An extensive collection of histories and analysis of Rhodesian and South African military operations, to the early 1980s
Window on Rhodesia- An archive of the history and life of Rhodesia.
1975 BBC report on the failure of negotiations between the Rhodesian government and the black nationalists
The Brookings Institution : Managing Ethnic Conflict in Africa – Rhodesia/Zimbabwe
Selby, Angus (2006) "Commercial Farmers and the State: Interest Group Politics and Land Reform in Zimbabwe, 1890–2005", PhD Thesis, Oxford University
Rhodesia Roll of Honour – Those who died in defence of UDI
Constitution of Rhodesia
Rhodesian aviation and comment

Audio and video[edit]

Audio of Ian Smith's radio address announcing UDI
2 years of independence, 1967 Rhodesian MoI film (7 mins) on YouTube
Rhodesia to Zimbabwe, collection of film clips (6 mins) on YouTube
Songs of UDI, 3 songs from 1977 (9 mins) on YouTube







v
t
e


Southern Rhodesia / Rhodesia articles




1890–1923: Company rule; 1923–80: Southern Rhodesia; 1953–63: Federation; 1965–79: Rhodesia under UDI; 1979: Zimbabwe Rhodesia under UDI; 1980–present: Zimbabwe



History



Pre-colonial
Rudd Concession
Company rule

Pioneer Column
First Matabele War
Shangani Patrol
Second Matabele War
Second Boer War
First World War


Southern Rhodesia

colonial history
Second World War
Malayan Emergency involvement
Federation


Unilateral Declaration of Independence

Bush War
1975 Victoria Falls Conference
1976 Geneva Conference
Internal Settlement
Zimbabwe Rhodesia
Lancaster House Agreement


Zimbabwe





Geography







Chimanimani Mountains
Cities and towns
Limpopo River
Zambezi River








Politics







Constitutional history
Districts
Elections
Governor
Mission in Lisbon
Municipalities
Police
Political parties
Central Africa Party
Confederate Party
Dominion Party
Federal Party
Responsible Government Association (RGA)
Rhodesian Action Party (RAP)
Rhodesian Front (RF)
Rhodesia Labour Party (RLP)
Southern Rhodesia African National Congress (SRANC)
Southern Rhodesia Communist Party (SRCP)
Southern Rhodesia Liberal Party (SRLP)
United Federal Party (UFP)
United National Federal Party (UNFP)
United Rhodesia Party
President
Prime Minister
Provinces
Security Forces








Economy







Dollar (currency from 1970)
Pound (currency to 1970)
Reserve Bank
Stock Exchange
Telecommunications
Tourism
Transportation








Society







List of Rhodesians
Public holidays
Rhodesiana





Demographics




Ethnic groups
(diaspora)




Black



Hungwe
Kunda
Lemba
Manyika
Ndebele
Rusape Jews
Shona
Tokaleya
Tonga





White



Afrikaners
British
Greeks
Jews
"Rhodies"





Others



Coloureds (Goffals)
Indians








Languages



Afrikaans
English (South African)
Shona
Sindebele








Symbols



Animal
Anthem
Coat of arms
Emblem
Flags

national


Flower











Category
Portal












v
t
e


Commonwealth realms and dominions



Current



Antigua and Barbuda (monarchy)
Australia (monarchy)
Bahamas (monarchy)
Barbados (monarchy)
Belize (monarchy)
Canada (monarchy)
Grenada (monarchy)
Jamaica (monarchy)
Realm of New Zealand

Cook Islands
New Zealand
Niue


Papua New Guinea (monarchy)
Saint Kitts and Nevis (monarchy)
Saint Lucia (monarchy)
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines (monarchy)
Solomon Islands (monarchy)
Tuvalu (monarchy)
United Kingdom (monarchy)





Former



Ceylon
Fiji (monarchy)
The Gambia
Ghana
Guyana
India1
Ireland1 (monarchy)
Kenya
Malawi
Malta
Mauritius
Newfoundland2
Nigeria
Pakistan
Rhodesia3
Sierra Leone
South Africa (monarchy)
Tanganyika
Trinidad and Tobago
Uganda








1 Dominion, became republic before adoption of the term "realm"
2 Dominion, never ratified Statute of Westminster 1931, London-based external government 1934–1949, annexed by Canada in 1949
3 Rhodesia unilaterally declared independence as a realm in 1965, but this was not recognised internationally. Declared itself a republic in 1970.











 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Rhodesia&oldid=790867687"					
Categories: Former countries in AfricaStates and territories established in 1965States and territories disestablished in 1979RhodesiaBritish colonisation in AfricaBritish EmpireFormer British colonies and protectorates in AfricaFormer polities of the Cold WarFormer republicsFormer territorial entities in AfricaFormer unrecognized countriesHistory of RhodesiaHistory of ZimbabweOligarchy1965 establishments in Africa1979 disestablishments in Africa1965 establishments in Rhodesia1970s disestablishments in Rhodesia1965 establishments in the British Empire1979 disestablishments in the United KingdomWhite supremacy in AfricaEnglish-speaking countries and territoriesHidden categories: EngvarB from August 2014Use dmy dates from August 2014Use South African English from April 2016All Wikipedia articles written in South African EnglishArticles containing Latin-language textFormer country articles requiring maintenancePages using infobox former country with unknown parametersArticles containing Shona-language textAll articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2017Articles needing additional references from February 2011All articles needing additional referencesWikipedia external links cleanup from October 2012Wikipedia spam cleanup from October 2012Zimbabwe articles missing geocoordinate dataAll articles needing coordinates 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


AfrikaansالعربيةБеларускаяБългарскиCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEspañolEsperantoEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGalego한국어Bahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaItalianoעבריתქართულიLadinoLatviešuLigureLumbaartМакедонскиमराठीمازِرونیBahasa MelayuNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålਪੰਜਾਬੀPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийScotsSimple EnglishکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнськаاردوTiếng Việt粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 16:58.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















 Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts on Zazzle
























































































			See all results for ""
		





				Search results for ""
			

				Search results for "" in 












See All Results














Sign in







Sell on Zazzle




100% Satisfaction







Shopping Cart (0 items)




View Cart (0 items)

100% Satisfaction Guaranteed














Create Your Own


Invitations & Cards


Clothing & Accessories


Home & Living


Electronics


Office


Baby & Kids


Art


Weddings


Gifts


More 



							Create Your Own


							Invitations & Cards
						

							Clothing & Accessories
						

							Home & Living
						

							Electronics
						

							Office
						

							Baby & Kids
						

							Art
						

							Weddings
						

							Gifts
						
















				Invitations & Cards
				
			
Invitations
Postage
All Greeting Cards



				Home
				
			
Mugs
Pillows
Magnets
Blankets
All Home





				Clothing
				
			
T-Shirts
Leggings
Kids & Baby
All Clothing



				Accessories
				
			
Hats
Buttons
Tote Bags
Zippo Lighters
All Accessories





				Craft Supplies
				
			
Stickers
All Craft Supplies



				Sports & Games
				
			
Playing Cards
Skateboards
All Sports & Games



				Electronics
				
			
Cases
All Electronics





				Office
				
			
Business Cards
Labels
All Office



				Wall Art
				
			
Posters
Canvas Prints
Wood Wall Art
All Wall Art


All Create Your Own 












Looking For Something One-Of-A-Kind?Easily upload photos, artwork, text, and more!

CREATE NOW 















Invitations



Greeting & Holiday Cards



Postage & Accessories




All Invitations & Cards 










				Wedding
				
			
Wedding Invitations
Engagement Party Invites
Bridal Shower Invitations
Save The Date Cards



				Holiday & Seasonal
				
			
Holiday Invitations
Back to School





				Birthday
				
			
Birthday Invitations
Sweet 16 Invitations
Quinceañera Invitations
1st Birthday Invitations
50th Birthday Invitations



				Baby & Pregnancy
				
			
Baby Shower Invitations
Gender Reveal Invitations
Birth Announcements
Pregnancy Announcements





				Religious
				
			
Baptism Invitations
Bar Mitzvah Invitations
Bat Mitzvah Invitations
Communion Invitations



				More to Explore
				
			
Disney Birthday Invitations
Sesame Street Invitations
Moving Announcements
Retirement Party Invites


All Invitations 













				Greeting
				
			
Thank You Cards
Birthday Cards
Anniversary Cards
Congratulations Cards
Sympathy Cards
Get Well Cards
Note Cards





				Postcards
				
			
Save the Date Postcards
Vintage Travel Postcards
RSVP Cards
Thank You Cards
Funny Postcards
Change of Address
All Postcards





				Holiday & Seasonal
				
			
Holiday Cards
Back to School


All Greeting Cards 













				Wedding
				
			
Wedding Postage
Save the Date Postage
RSVP Postage
Bridal Shower Postage
Engagement Postage





				Holiday & Seasonal
				
			
Holiday Postage
2017 Postage



				More to Explore
				
			
Thank You Postage
Photo Postage
Baby Shower Postage





				Mailing Accessories
				
			
Return Address Labels
Envelopes
Invitation Belly Bands
Rubber Stamps
Embossers


All Postage 














Customize Thousands of DesignsDiscover endless design options for any style, any budget, and any occasion.

SHOP NOW 








Send With LoveAdd photos and text with our easily customizable templates.

SHOP NOW 








Signed, Sealed & DeliveredAdd a wedding, baby, or holiday card photo to custom U.S. postage!

SHOP NOW 















T-Shirts



Clothing & Shoes



Accessories











				Popular Designs
				
			
Funny
Cool
Vintage
Emoji
Keep Calm
Geek
80s
Cat
Unicorn
Nurse
Baseball
Under $25





				Holiday & Occasion
				
			
Birthday
Bachelorette
Disney Vacation
Family Reunion



				Political
				
			
Donald Trump
Feminist
Resist



				Awareness
				
			
Breast Cancer
Autism





				Officially Licensed
				
			
Disney
Mickey Mouse
Harry Potter™
Superman
Batman
Wonder Woman
Sesame Street
Looney Tunes


Create Your Own 


All T-Shirts 













				Featured Styles
				
			
T-Shirts
Tank Tops
Sweatshirts
Hoodies
Underwear
Dresses
Polos
Jackets
Jerseys
Activewear
Maternity
Embroidered Shirts





				Men
				
			
Clothing
Shoes



				Women
				
			
Clothing
Shoes



				Kids
				
			
Clothing



				Baby
				
			
Clothing





				Trending
				
			
All-Over-Print Leggings
Cute Bodysuits
Wedding Underwear
Bridesmaid Tank Tops
Flip Flops
Tank Top Collection


All Clothing 


All Shoes 













				Handbags & Wallets
				
			
Totes
Backpacks
Embroidered Bags
Clutches & Evening Bags
Wallets & Card Cases
All Bags



				Luggage & Travel
				
			
Luggage
Luggage Tags
Passport Holders
All Travel





				Jewelry
				
			
Watches
Necklaces
All Jewelry



				Hats
				
			
Embroidered Hats
Trucker Hats
All Hats



				Hair Accessories
				
			
Bandanas
Athletic Headbands





				Suit Accessories
				
			
Ties
Cuff Links
All Suit Accessories



				More to Explore
				
			
Buttons
Keychains
Sunglasses
Scarves
Belts


All Accessories 














Join Our Tee Party!Whether for work or for play our t-shirts make a bold statement.

SHOP NOW 








We've Got You CoveredFrom your head to your toes, find apparel that fits your unique sense of style.

SHOP NOW 








Accessorize ItCustomize fashion accents from our huge selection of bags, hats, watches, and more!

SHOP NOW 















Home



Crafts & Party Supplies



Sports, Toys & Games











				Home Décor
				
			
Pillows & Poufs
Candles
Lamps
Throws & Blankets



				Bedding
				
			
Duvet Covers
Pillowcases
All Bedding



				Storage & Organization
				
			
Key Racks
Cosmetic Storage





				Kitchen & Dining
				
			
Drinkware
Mugs
Refrigerator Magnets
All Kitchen & Dining



				Food & Drink
				
			
Drink Mixes
Chocolate & Treats
All Food & Drink



				Bath & Beauty
				
			
Bathroom Accessories
Compact Mirrors
Nail Art





				Garden & Outdoor
				
			
Outdoor Pillows
Yard Signs
Door Mats



				Garage & Automotive
				
			
Bumper Stickers
License Plates
All Automotive



				Pet Supplies
				
			
Beds
T-Shirts
All Pet Supplies


All Home 













				Party Favors
				
			
Favor Bags
Favor Boxes
Party Shades



				Party Décor
				
			
Banners
Bunting Flags
Paper Party Hats



				Party Tableware
				
			
Paper Plates
Paper Napkins
Paper Placemats
Paper Cups





				Gift Wrapping
				
			
Tissue Paper
Gift Bags
Wrapping Paper
Gift Tags
Stickers
All Gift Wrapping



				Crafting
				
			
Fabric
All Craft Supplies





				Musical Instruments
				
			
Drumsticks
Guitar Picks


All Party Supplies 














				Team Sports
				
			
Baseball
Softball
Basketball
Football
Soccer
Ice Hockey



				Tailgate & Lawn Games
				
			
Frisbees
Pong Tables
Cornhole & Bag Toss





				Outdoor Recreation
				
			
Bicycles
Skateboards



				Game Room
				
			
Mini Basketball hoop
Darts & Equipment
Table Tennis/Ping Pong



				Other Sports
				
			
Yoga & Pilates
Golf





				Toys & Games
				
			
Fidget Spinners
Puzzles
Cribbage
Playing Cards
Poker Chips


All Sports & Games 














Welcome HomeCustomize your very own retreat from outdoor pillows to indoor décor.

SHOP NOW 








Celebrate Your CreativityAdd a special touch to your next event with custom craft and party supplies!

SHOP NOW 








Game OnCelebrate your favorite coach or MVP with custom game gear.

SHOP NOW 















Phone Cases



Tablet & Laptop Accessories



Computer & Audio Accessories




All Electronics 










				iPhone Cases
				
			
iPhone 7
iPhone 7 Plus
iPhone 6/6s
iPhone 6/6s Plus
iPhone SE/5/5s
All iPhone Cases




						Google Cases
					

Pixel
Pixel XL
Nexus





				Samsung Cases
				
			
Galaxy S8
Galaxy S8+
Galaxy S7
Galaxy S7 Edge
Galaxy S6
Galaxy S6 Edge
S6 Edge Plus
All Samsung cases





				More to Explore
				
			
Lifeproof® Cases
OtterBox Cases
Phone Skins
Wallet Cases
All Cases













				Tablet Accessories
				
			
iPad Sleeves
iPad Cases
iPad Covers





				Laptop Accessories
				
			
Laptop Sleeves
Laptop Skins & Decals















				Charging
				
			
Power Banks
USB Charging Stations



				Audio
				
			
Portable Speakers





				Mice & Keyboards
				
			
Mouse Pads
Wireless Mouse





				More to Explore
				
			
iPod Cases
iPod Skins
USB Flash Drives














Gear For Your GadgetsCustomize brands including Case-Mate, OtterBox, Incipio and more!

SHOP NOW 








Dress Your DeviceYour search for the best electronics accessories ends right here!

SHOP NOW 








Pump Up The VolumeFind Bluetooth speakers, iPod cases, headphones, and more.

SHOP NOW 















Business Cards



Stationery



Desk Accessories



Office & School Supplies



Small Business Supplies




All Office 










				Popular Styles
				
			
Minimalist
Professional
Modern
Elegant
Floral
Watercolor
Magnetic





				Professions
				
			
Hair Stylist
Makeup Artist
Photographer
Real Estate





				More to Explore
				
			
Referral
Loyalty
Appointment


All Business Cards 













				Writing Pads
				
			
Notebooks
Post-it® Notes
Notepads
Letterhead
Clipboards





				Cards
				
			
Note Cards
Thank You Cards
Stationery
Postcards





				Envelopes & Seals
				
			
Envelopes
Embossers



				Addressing
				
			
Rubber Stamps
Return Address Labels
Shipping Labels













				Desk Organization
				
			
Business Card Holders
Pen & Pencil Cases





				Tech Accessories
				
			
USB Charging Stations
USB Flash Drives
Speakers
Power Banks





				More to Explore
				
			
Calendars
Mouse Pads
Coasters
Table Lamps













				Writing & Correction
				
			
Pens
Pencils
Erasers
Rulers



				Binders & Folders
				
			
Pocket Folders
Avery 3 Ring Binders
Padfolios





				Presentation Boards
				
			
Erase Boards
Chalkboards



				Name Badges & Plates
				
			
Desktop Name Plates
Name Tags
Badge Holders





				Planners
				
			
Calendars
Journals



				More to Explore
				
			
Door Signs
Awards and Certificates













				Marketing Materials
				
			
Flyers
Rack Cards
Menus & Price List
Loyalty Cards



				Stationery
				
			
Business Cards
Letterhead
Appointment Cards
Note Cards





				Stamps & Ink
				
			
Self Inking Stamps
Pocket Stamps



				Signs & Posters
				
			
Banners
Yard Signs



				Writing Utensils
				
			
Pens
Pencils





				Displays & Packaging
				
			
Gift Bags
Gift Tags
Price Tags




						Visit Business Center
					















Here's My CardCustomize Standard, Large, or Skinny sizes, 11 paper types, and over half a million designs!

SHOP NOW 








Banish Boring Office SuppliesUpdate your office or family command center with custom notebooks, rubber stamps, Post-it® notes and more!

SHOP NOW 








Desk EnvyCreate a desk so stylish, you'll look forward to Monday mornings!

SHOP NOW 








Keep It TogetherInfinite customization possibilities for gear as unique as you.

SHOP NOW 








Small Business, Big ImpressionCreate one-of-a-kind business supplies for your one-of-a-kind business.

SHOP NOW 



















				Clothing & Accessories
				
			
Baby Clothing
Baby Beanies
Baby Bags & Totes
Kids Clothing





				Nursery & Room Décor
				
			
Framed & Finished Art
Wall Stickers & Decals
Night Lights
Wall Plates
Blankets
Pillows & Poufs





				Nursing & Feeding
				
			
Bibs & Bandana Bibs
Burp Cloth
Pacifier & Clips




Baby Boutique 












Oh, Baby!Celebrate the newest arrival with custom birth announcements, stats pillows, name blankets & more!

SHOP NOW 



















				Posters & Prints
				
			
Posters
Photo Prints





				Wall Treatments & Décor
				
			
Wall decals
Marquee Signs
Faux Taxidermy
Clocks





				Framed & Finished Art
				
			
Canvas Prints
Wood Art
Wall Art Sets
Acrylic Art
Metal Art





				More to Explore
				
			
Abstract Art
Black & White Art
Fine Art
Travel Art
Quote Art
Vintage Art


All Art 












Blank Space?Browse thousands of art pieces in categories from fine art to pop culture or create your own.

SHOP NOW 















Invitations & Stationery



Ceremony & Celebrations



Favors & Gifts




All Weddings 










				Wedding Invitation Suite
				
			
Wedding Invitations
Save the Date Cards
Response Cards
Will You Be My Bridesmaid
Thank You Cards
Wedding Announcements





				Celebrations
				
			
Bachelorette Party
Bachelor Party
Bridal Shower
Engagement Party
Rehearsal Dinner



				Anniversary
				
			
Anniversary Invitations
50th Anniversary Invites





				Popular Styles
				
			
Rustic Wedding
Destination Wedding
Beach Wedding
Photo Wedding



				Stamps & Accessories
				
			
Envelopes
Labels
Return Address Stamps
Invitation Belly Bands













				Pre-Wedding
				
			
Engagement
Bridal & Wedding Shower
Bachelorette Party
Bachelor Party
Rehearsal Dinner





				Wedding Décor
				
			
Cake Toppers
Banners
Bunting Flags
Seating Charts
Place Cards
Table Cards
Table Card  Holders
Napkins
Candles
Mason Jars





				Wedding Stationery
				
			
Advice Cards
Wedding Programs
Wine Bottle Labels
Water Bottle Labels
Menus
Guest Books



				Post Wedding
				
			
Hang-Over Signs
Brunch Invitations













				Wedding Favors
				
			
Coasters
Stickers
Favor Bags
Favor Boxes
Gift Tags
Candies & Tins
Sunglasses
Magnets





				Wedding Gifts
				
			
For Bride
For Groom
Wedding Throws
Frames
Glassware & Barware



				Bridal Party Gifts
				
			
For Bridesmaid
For Groomsman
For Parents





				Savor the Memories
				
			
Wedding Albums
Photo Prints
Vow Art



				Anniversary Gifts
				
			
Canvas
Plates
Frames
Clocks
Photo Plaques
Pillows














Vow To WowBuy more and save more! Up to 50% off invitations (details on product page).

SHOP NOW 








An "I Do" That's Uniquely YouCustomize your big day down to the smallest detail.

SHOP NOW 








Show Your AppreciationBecause they traveled, they celebrated, they bustled, and they toasted.

SHOP NOW 



















				Shop by Recipient
				
			
For Him
For Her
For Grandparents
For Teens
For Kids
For Hostess
For Teachers
For Pets



				Seasonal Gifts
				
			
Back to School





				Gift Guide
				
			
Gifts Under $20
Gifts Under $50
Funny Gifts
Photo Gifts
Monogram Gifts
Tech Gifts



				Officially Licensed
				
			
Disney
Warner Brothers
Coca Cola
College & Sports
All Officially Licensed





				Hottest Products
				
			
New Arrivals
T-Shirts
iPhone 7 Cases
Mugs
Jewelry
Watches



				Inspiration
				
			
Artisan Gifts
Zazzle Heart
#Zazzle Inspiration Gallery
Featured Makers
Featured Designers
Designer Collections






						Shop Zazzle Deals
					





						Shop All Categories
					





						Shop Gift Center
					





						Give a Gift Card
					













Gifts For Every OccasionGive a gift they’ll never forget! Created by you, just for them.

SHOP NOW 



















Up to 40% Off Buttons, Labels, Shirts & More    |    15% Off Sitewide    |    Use Code: ZAZB2SAVINGS    |     Ends Monday    |    See Details




















































			See all results for ""
		





				Search results for ""
			

				Search results for "" in 












See All Results































Sign in




Shop


Create


Sell


Gifts




My Orders


My Account




Sell on Zazzle


100% Satisfaction








USA (EN)












Your Cart








Loading






Continue shopping










Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts
				










































Top departments for "rhodesian ridgeback"













 Home Decor & Pets Products
1,928 Products














 Cards & Postage
884 Products














 Clothing & Apparel
1,860 Products














 Office Products & Supplies
674 Products














 Accessories
691 Products














 Craft Supplies
607 Products

















Display:















Show:









Select a value








30
60
90
120
















Sort:









Select a value








Newest
Popular
Price: low-to-high
Price: high-to-low

































Showing All Results




		6,799 results
	





 


			Page 1 of 114
		

 










Related Searches:
ridgebacks, rhodesian ridgebacks, rodesian, 















2 Rhodesian Ridgebacks Mug

$18.75
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback sculpture

$15.85
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Postcard

$1.05
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Shirt

$18.95
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Throw

$88.55
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Prancing Bandana

$17.70
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Return Address Label

$3.30
40% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug

$15.80
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Lucky Hounds Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar 2017

$22.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












RHODESIAN RIDGEBACK Property Laws 2 Frosted Glass Coffee Mug

$22.00
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Pop Art Pillow

$33.55
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dad T-Shirt

$18.95
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Luggage Tag

$10.50
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Tissue Paper

$1.95
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Water Bottle

$23.20
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback with a Wreath Watercolor Napkin

$44.30
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback T-Shirt

$21.35
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












I Love My Two Rhodesian Ridgeback Dogs Mason Jar

$14.12
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Pillow

$32.65
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Lucky Hounds Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar 2016

$22.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Mom Mug

$20.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgebacks Rule Classic Round Sticker

$5.90
40% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar

$22.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback calendar 2016

$22.70
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












2 Rhodesian Ridgebacks Label

$3.30
40% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Card

$3.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Happy Face T-Shirt

$22.75
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












rhodesian ridgeback standing.png tie

$33.50
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Hug Mug

$20.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Monogram T-Shirt

$20.50
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Love Rhodesian Ridgeback Puppy Dog Keychain

$3.70
30% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Card

$3.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug

$16.55
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback baby creeper

$15.80
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Cartoon Pacifier

$12.65
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Keychain

$3.90
30% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












peeping rhodesian ridgeback long apron

$24.55
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Flag Baby Bodysuit

$18.95
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Cartoon Coffee Mug

$17.95
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Silhouette Throw Pillow

$37.60
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback hug bag

$18.95
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












I Love my Rhodesian Ridgeback Pet Leash

$24.25
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Portrait Paper Plate

$1.80
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Jigsaw Puzzle

$19.00
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Sweet Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Luggage Tag

$11.05
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Pair - Starry Night Mouse Pad

$13.00
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Carved Maple iPhone 6 Bumper Case

$44.25
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












rhodesian ridgeback ridge luggage tag

$11.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












I Love my Rhodesian Ridgeback Post-it Notes

$8.40
40% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Prancing Wine Glass Charm

$4.40
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback - Leap Card

$3.30
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Prancing Fleece Blanket

$33.20
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Breed Spine Mug

$20.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar 2015

$22.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Silhouette Air Freshener

$6.65
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Breed Spine T-Shirt

$24.90
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar 2015

$22.15
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback grocery tote

$18.95
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Kawaii Star Rhodesian Ridgeback Baby Creeper

$18.95
25% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS












Rhodesian Ridgeback Postcard

$1.20
15% Off with code ZAZB2SAVINGS










No matches for







Showing All Results




		6,799 results
	





 


			Page 1 of 114
		

 





















Filters







					Department
				





					Department
				



Accessories (691)Art & Posters (81)Cards & Postage (884)Clothing (1,860)Craft Supplies (607)Electronics (379)Home & Pets (1,928)Miscellaneous (152)Office Products (674)











































Recently Viewed Items






















Get exclusive offers:











Sign me up!







Get exclusive offers:






















					We promise 100% satisfaction.
				
				If you don't absolutely love it, we'll take it back!
			




				What we're made of today
			



						Products

						
							you can customize
						




						Makers

						
							who create & produce
						




						Designers

						
							who design artwork
						






						A few helpful links
					





								About
							



								Press
							



								My Account
							







								Track My Order
							



								Return Policy
							



								Tags
							







								Help
							



								Careers
							



								Blog
							







								Zazzle Worldwide
							



USA (EN | ES)
UK

Canada (EN | FR)
Australia
日本
Deutschland
España
Brasil
Sverige
France

See All »






								Content Filter:
								Safe





						Our greater community
					





								About

								
									our company & people
								




								Press
							

































				Copyright © 2000-2017, Zazzle Inc. All rights reserved.
				User Agreement | Privacy Policy


zxgx zxo5 zxo9 z27g4j zb08j zeuzl
				








Top


































 



Rhodesian Ridgeback Products | AKC Shop











































Christmas in July Sale | Get 25% off when buying 2 or more breed items!


















$ 0.00





 AKC.ORG



AKC Experts

	  Login
	
Register























CART $ 0.00














Essentials


Eat & Drink
Dog Bowls
Travel Bowls
Pet Mats



Play
Plush Toys
Fetch Toys
Tug Toys
Interactive Toys
Dog Gift Packs



Rest
Beds
Crates
Crate Mats



Walk
Collars
Leashes
Harnesses






BFF Dog Gift Pack
						 $ 37.99







On-The-Go


Car
Car Covers
Car Seats & Harnesses
Car Barriers



Travel
Travel Bowls
Dog Carriers



Clothing and Active Wear
Dog Jackets and Coats
Dog Sweaters 
Outdoor Adventure
Safety Wear
Dog Accessories






Dog Life Savior Jacket
						 $ 79.99







Grooming & Wellness


Grooming
Shampoos & Conditioners
Dog Grooming Gloves
Dog Ear & Eye Care
Dog Dental Care
Nail & Paw
Skin & Coat
Dog Grooming Kits



Wellness
Dog Stairs
Insect Protection
Cancer Detection Test






Natural Flea and Tick Spray for Dogs
						 $ 12.99







Training


Books & DVDs
Breed Specific Training
Tricks Training
Basic Training



Canine Good Citizen
Books
Materials for Evaluators
Merchandise



Training Services
GoodDog! Helpline






Cotton Web Training Lead
						 $ 16.99







Dog Lovers










Choose a Breed
View All
Affenpinscher
Afghan Hound
Airedale Terrier
Akita
Alaskan Malamute
American English Coonhound
American Eskimo Dog
American Staffordshire Terrier
American Water Spaniel
Anatolian Shepherd Dog
Australian Cattle Dog
Australian Shepherd
Australian Terrier
Basenji
Basset Hound
Beagle
Bearded Collie
Beauceron
Bedlington Terrier
Belgian Malinois
Belgian Sheepdog
Belgian Tervuren
Bergamasco
Berger Picard
Bernese Mountain Dog
Bichon Frise
Black and Tan Coonhound
Black Russian Terrier
Bloodhound
Bluetick Coonhound
Boerboel
Border Collie
Border Terrier
Borzoi
Boston Terrier
Bouvier des Flandres
Boxer
Boykin Spaniel
Briard
Brittany
Brussels Griffon
Bull Terrier
Bulldog
Bullmastiff
Cairn Terrier
Canaan Dog
Cane Corso
Cardigan Welsh Corgi
Cavalier King Charles Spaniel
Cesky Terrier
Chesapeake Bay Retriever
Chihuahua
Chinese Crested
Chinese Shar-Pei
Chinook
Chow Chow
Cirneci D'ell Etna
Clumber Spaniel
Cocker Spaniel
Coton de Tulear
Curly Coated Retriever
Dachshund
Dalmatian
Dandie Dinmont Terrier
Doberman Pinscher
Dogue de Bordeaux
English Cocker Spaniel
English Foxhound
English Setter
English Springer Spaniel
English Toy Spaniel
Entlebucher Mountain Dog
Field Spaniel
Finnish Lapphund
Finnish Spitz
Flat Coated Retriever
French Bulldog
German Pinscher
German Shepherd Dog
German Shorthaired Pointer
German Wirehaired Pointer
Giant Schnauzer
Glen of Imaal Terrier
Golden Retriever
Gordon Setter
Great Dane
Great Pyrenees
Greater Swiss Mountain Dog
Greyhound
Harrier
Havanese
Ibizan Hound
Icelandic Sheepdog
Irish Red & White Setter
Irish Setter
Irish Terrier
Irish Water Spaniel
Irish Wolfhound
Italian Greyhound
Japanese Chin
Keeshond
Kerry Blue Terrier
Komondor
Kuvasz
Labrador Retriever
Lakeland Terrier
Leonberger
Lhasa Apso
Lowchen
Maltese
Manchester Terrier
Mastiff
Miniature Bull Terrier
Miniature Pinscher
Miniature Schnauzer
Neapolitan Mastiff
Newfoundland
Norfolk Terrier
Norwegian Buhund
Norwegian Elkhound
Norwegian Lundehund
Norwich Terrier
Nova Scotia Duck Tolling Retriever
Old English Sheepdog
Otterhound
Papillon
Parson Russell Terrier
Pekingese
Pembroke Welsh Corgi
Petit Basset Griffon Vendéen
Pharaoh Hound
Plott
Pointer
Polish Lowland Sheepdog
Pomeranian
Poodle
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno
Portuguese Water Dog
Pug
Puli
Pyrenean Shepherd
Rat Terrier
Redbone Coonhound
Rhodesian Ridgeback
Rottweiler
Rough Collie
Russell Terrier
Saluki
Samoyed
Schipperke
Schnauzer
Scottish Deerhound
Scottish Terrier
Sealyham Terrier
Shetland Sheepdog
Shiba Inu
Shih Tzu
Siberian Husky
Silky Terrier
Skye Terrier
Smooth Collie
Smooth Fox Terrier
Soft Coated Wheaten Terrier
Spanish Water Dog
Spinone Italiano
St. Bernard
Staffordshire Bull Terrier
Standard Schnauzer
Sussex Spaniel
Swedish Vallhund
Tibetan Mastiff
Tibetan Spaniel
Tibetan Terrier
Toy Fox Terrier
Toy Manchester Terrier
Treeing Walker Coonhound
Vizsla
Weimaraner
Welsh Springer Spaniel
Welsh Terrier
West Highland White Terrier
Whippet
Wire Fox Terrier
Wirehaired Pointing Griffon
Wirehaired Vizsla
Xoloitzcuintli
Yorkshire Terrier





Mugs
Coffee Mugs 
Tumblers
Travel Mugs


Tech Cases
Phone Cases
E-Reader Sleeves


Jewelry
Charms & Pendants
Oval Jewelry
Pins


Human Apparel
Short Sleeve Shirts
Long Sleeve Shirts
Sweatshirts


Tote Bags
Printed Tote Bags
Hand Painted Totes
Graphic Tote Bags


Travel & Accessories
Umbrellas
E-Reader Sleeves
Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Beach Towels
Luggage Tags
Tote Bags
Dog Travel


Home
Wine Glasses & Bottle Stoppers
Coasters
Pillows
Kitchen
Hand Towels
Ornaments


Pet Tech 
Dog Bowls
Dog Collars


Note Cards 


Breed Guides




Collections


Puppy Essentials
Crates & Beds
Puppy Toys
Collars & Leashes
Health & Grooming
Eat & Drink



Summer Picks
Cooling Products
Travel Products
Insect Repellent Products



Gift Center
Jewelry 
Mugs
Umbrellas
Travel
Note Cards
Home
Human Apparel
Tech Cases
Tote Bags
Pet Tech



Mellow Dogs 
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear



Active Dogs
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear



Pura Naturals
Grooming
Chewing & Snoozing
Steps
Wellness



Senior Essentials
Comfort
Grooming & Wellness
Toys




AKC Professional


Breeders
Supplies
Books & DVDS
DNA Test Kit
CADET℠ Cancer Detection Tests
Registration Rules & Policies
AKC Certified Pedigrees
Breeder Reports



Exhibitors
Event Rules & Regulations
Competitor Reports
Title Patches



Judges & Clubs
Books & DVDs
Event Rules & Regulations
Registration Rules & Policies
Breed Standards
Governance & Club Resources
Dog Show Resources



Trainers
Materials for CGC Evaluators
CGC Merchandise
Tricks Training
All Training Products









Christmas in July Sale | Get 25% off when buying 2 or more breed items!





Essentials


Eat & Drink
Dog Bowls
Travel Bowls
Pet Mats


Play
Plush Toys
Fetch Toys
Tug Toys
Interactive Toys
Dog Gift Packs


Rest
Beds
Crates
Crate Mats


Walk
Collars
Leashes
Harnesses



On-The-Go


Car
Car Covers
Car Seats & Harnesses
Car Barriers


Travel
Travel Bowls
Dog Carriers


Clothing and Active Wear
Dog Jackets and Coats
Dog Sweaters 
Outdoor Adventure
Safety Wear
Dog Accessories



Grooming & Wellness


Grooming
Shampoos & Conditioners
Dog Grooming Gloves
Dog Ear & Eye Care
Dog Dental Care
Nail & Paw
Skin & Coat
Dog Grooming Kits


Wellness
Dog Stairs
Insect Protection
Cancer Detection Test



Training


Books & DVDs
Breed Specific Training
Tricks Training
Basic Training


Canine Good Citizen
Books
Materials for Evaluators
Merchandise


Training Services
GoodDog! Helpline



Dog Lovers


Mugs
Coffee Mugs 
Tumblers
Travel Mugs


Tech Cases
Phone Cases
E-Reader Sleeves


Jewelry
Charms & Pendants
Oval Jewelry
Pins


Human Apparel
Short Sleeve Shirts
Long Sleeve Shirts
Sweatshirts


Tote Bags
Printed Tote Bags
Hand Painted Totes
Graphic Tote Bags


Travel & Accessories
Umbrellas
E-Reader Sleeves
Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Beach Towels
Luggage Tags
Tote Bags
Dog Travel


Home
Wine Glasses & Bottle Stoppers
Coasters
Pillows
Kitchen
Hand Towels
Ornaments


Pet Tech 
Dog Bowls
Dog Collars


Note Cards 


Breed Guides



Collections


Puppy Essentials
Crates & Beds
Puppy Toys
Collars & Leashes
Health & Grooming
Eat & Drink


Summer Picks
Cooling Products
Travel Products
Insect Repellent Products


Gift Center
Jewelry 
Mugs
Umbrellas
Travel
Note Cards
Home
Human Apparel
Tech Cases
Tote Bags
Pet Tech


Mellow Dogs 
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear


Active Dogs
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear


Pura Naturals
Grooming
Chewing & Snoozing
Steps
Wellness


Senior Essentials
Comfort
Grooming & Wellness
Toys



AKC Professional


Breeders
Supplies
Books & DVDS
DNA Test Kit
CADET℠ Cancer Detection Tests
Registration Rules & Policies
AKC Certified Pedigrees
Breeder Reports


Exhibitors
Event Rules & Regulations
Competitor Reports
Title Patches


Judges & Clubs
Books & DVDs
Event Rules & Regulations
Registration Rules & Policies
Breed Standards
Governance & Club Resources
Dog Show Resources


Trainers
Materials for CGC Evaluators
CGC Merchandise
Tricks Training
All Training Products



AKC Experts


Dr. Mary Burch
Dr. Jerry Klein
Susan Sholar









Choose a Breed


View All
Affenpinscher
Afghan Hound
Airedale Terrier
Akita
Alaskan Malamute
American English Coonhound
American Eskimo Dog
American Staffordshire Terrier
American Water Spaniel
Anatolian Shepherd Dog
Australian Cattle Dog
Australian Shepherd
Australian Terrier
Basenji
Basset Hound
Beagle
Bearded Collie
Beauceron
Bedlington Terrier
Belgian Malinois
Belgian Sheepdog
Belgian Tervuren
Bergamasco
Berger Picard
Bernese Mountain Dog
Bichon Frise
Black and Tan Coonhound
Black Russian Terrier
Bloodhound
Bluetick Coonhound
Boerboel
Border Collie
Border Terrier
Borzoi
Boston Terrier
Bouvier des Flandres
Boxer
Boykin Spaniel
Briard
Brittany
Brussels Griffon
Bull Terrier
Bulldog
Bullmastiff
Cairn Terrier
Canaan Dog
Cane Corso
Cardigan Welsh Corgi
Cavalier King Charles Spaniel
Cesky Terrier
Chesapeake Bay Retriever
Chihuahua
Chinese Crested
Chinese Shar-Pei
Chinook
Chow Chow
Cirneci D'ell Etna
Clumber Spaniel
Cocker Spaniel
Coton de Tulear
Curly Coated Retriever
Dachshund
Dalmatian
Dandie Dinmont Terrier
Doberman Pinscher
Dogue de Bordeaux
English Cocker Spaniel
English Foxhound
English Setter
English Springer Spaniel
English Toy Spaniel
Entlebucher Mountain Dog
Field Spaniel
Finnish Lapphund
Finnish Spitz
Flat Coated Retriever
French Bulldog
German Pinscher
German Shepherd Dog
German Shorthaired Pointer
German Wirehaired Pointer
Giant Schnauzer
Glen of Imaal Terrier
Golden Retriever
Gordon Setter
Great Dane
Great Pyrenees
Greater Swiss Mountain Dog
Greyhound
Harrier
Havanese
Ibizan Hound
Icelandic Sheepdog
Irish Red & White Setter
Irish Setter
Irish Terrier
Irish Water Spaniel
Irish Wolfhound
Italian Greyhound
Japanese Chin
Keeshond
Kerry Blue Terrier
Komondor
Kuvasz
Labrador Retriever
Lakeland Terrier
Leonberger
Lhasa Apso
Lowchen
Maltese
Manchester Terrier
Mastiff
Miniature Bull Terrier
Miniature Pinscher
Miniature Schnauzer
Neapolitan Mastiff
Newfoundland
Norfolk Terrier
Norwegian Buhund
Norwegian Elkhound
Norwegian Lundehund
Norwich Terrier
Nova Scotia Duck Tolling Retriever
Old English Sheepdog
Otterhound
Papillon
Parson Russell Terrier
Pekingese
Pembroke Welsh Corgi
Petit Basset Griffon Vendéen
Pharaoh Hound
Plott
Pointer
Polish Lowland Sheepdog
Pomeranian
Poodle
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno
Portuguese Water Dog
Pug
Puli
Pyrenean Shepherd
Rat Terrier
Redbone Coonhound
Rhodesian Ridgeback
Rottweiler
Rough Collie
Russell Terrier
Saluki
Samoyed
Schipperke
Schnauzer
Scottish Deerhound
Scottish Terrier
Sealyham Terrier
Shetland Sheepdog
Shiba Inu
Shih Tzu
Siberian Husky
Silky Terrier
Skye Terrier
Smooth Collie
Smooth Fox Terrier
Soft Coated Wheaten Terrier
Spanish Water Dog
Spinone Italiano
St. Bernard
Staffordshire Bull Terrier
Standard Schnauzer
Sussex Spaniel
Swedish Vallhund
Tibetan Mastiff
Tibetan Spaniel
Tibetan Terrier
Toy Fox Terrier
Toy Manchester Terrier
Treeing Walker Coonhound
Vizsla
Weimaraner
Welsh Springer Spaniel
Welsh Terrier
West Highland White Terrier
Whippet
Wire Fox Terrier
Wirehaired Pointing Griffon
Wirehaired Vizsla
Xoloitzcuintli
Yorkshire Terrier









Home > Shop by Breed > Rhodesian Ridgeback Products


Rhodesian Ridgeback Products 










Hand-Painted Dog Breed Tote Bag - Hound Group

        
        
        $ 55.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Hand-Painted Dog Breed Tote Bag - Hound Group


































































































Afghan Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Afghan Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Afghan Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
American English Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
American English Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
American English Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
American Foxhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
American Foxhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
American Foxhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Basenji / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Basenji / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Basenji / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Basset Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Basset Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Basset Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Beagle / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Beagle / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Beagle / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Black and Tan Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Black and Tan Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Black and Tan Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Bloodhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Bloodhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Bloodhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Bluetick Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Bluetick Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Bluetick Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Borzoi / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Borzoi / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Borzoi / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Cirneco dell'Etna / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Cirneco dell'Etna / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Cirneco dell'Etna / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Longhaired / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Longhaired / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Longhaired / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Smooth / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Smooth / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Smooth / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Wirehaired / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Wirehaired / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Wirehaired / Green - $ 55.00 USD
English Foxhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
English Foxhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
English Foxhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Greyhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Greyhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Greyhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Harrier / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Harrier / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Harrier / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Ibizan Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Ibizan Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Ibizan Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Irish Wolfhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Irish Wolfhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Irish Wolfhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Norwegian Elkhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Norwegian Elkhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Norwegian Elkhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Otterhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Otterhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Otterhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Petit Basset Griffon Vendeen / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Petit Basset Griffon Vendeen / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Petit Basset Griffon Vendeen / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Pharaoh Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Pharaoh Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Pharaoh Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Plott / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Plott / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Plott / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Redbone Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Redbone Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Redbone Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Saluki / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Saluki / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Saluki / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Scottish Deerhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Scottish Deerhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Scottish Deerhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Treeing Walker Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Treeing Walker Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Treeing Walker Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Whippet / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Whippet / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Whippet / Green - $ 55.00 USD


Dog's Coat Color


Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Beverage Tumbler

        
        
        $ 18.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Beverage Tumbler






			
			$ 18.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Charm Jewelry

from
        
        $ 44.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Charm Jewelry








Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Charm (Sterling Silver) - $ 44.99 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Pendant (Sterling Silver) - $ 44.99 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Charm with Bead Bracelet Attachment (Sterling Silver) - $ 49.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug

from
        
        $ 14.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug







11 oz - $ 14.99 USD
15 oz - $ 16.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback e-Reader Sleeve

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback e-Reader Sleeve






			
			$ 24.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Figurine Cork Bottle Stopper

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Figurine Cork Bottle Stopper






			
			$ 24.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Head Cork Bottle Stopper

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Head Cork Bottle Stopper






Red - $ 24.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Note Cards

$ 31.99
from
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Note Cards







Box of 8 - $ 24.99 USD
Box of 24 - $ 45.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag






			
			$ 24.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Travel Mug

        
        
        $ 27.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Travel Mug






			
			$ 27.99
			
Add To Cart












View More Rhodesian Ridgeback Products ▸









Toys
selected for Rhodesian Ridgebacks










Flying Ice Disc Dog Toy

        
        
        $ 15.99
      


Add To Cart




Flying Ice Disc Dog Toy






			
			$ 15.99
			
Add To Cart















Stuffing Free Dog Toy

        
        
        $ 14.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Stuffing Free Dog Toy








Goose - $ 14.99 USD
Mallard Duck - $ 14.99 USD

			Pheasant - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart















Boomerang Toy with Tennis Ball

        
        
        $ 18.99
      


Add To Cart




Boomerang Toy with Tennis Ball






			
			$ 18.99
			
Add To Cart















Soft Rubber Dummy Duck Toy

        
        
        $ 20.99
      


Add To Cart




Soft Rubber Dummy Duck Toy






			
			$ 20.99
			
Add To Cart















BFF Dog Gift Pack

        
        
        $ 37.99
      


View




Choose options for
BFF Dog Gift Pack







Small/Medium Sized Dog - $ 37.99 USD
Medium/Large Sized Dog - $ 37.99 USD


Dog Name



Dog Breed


Add To Cart















Silly Dog Tounge Toy

from
        
        $ 9.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Silly Dog Tounge Toy







Small - $ 9.99 USD
Large - $ 10.99 USD

Add To Cart















Ice Ball Dog Toy

        
        
        $ 17.99
      


Add To Cart




Ice Ball Dog Toy






			
			$ 17.99
			
Add To Cart















Country Critter Faballs

from
        
        $ 13.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Country Critter Faballs

















Small / Hedgehog - $ 13.99 USD

			Medium / Hedgehog - Sold Out
			

			Small / Pig - Sold Out
			

			Medium / Pig - Sold Out
			
Small / Raccoon - $ 13.99 USD
Medium / Raccoon - $ 14.99 USD
Small / Cow - $ 13.99 USD

			Medium / Cow - Sold Out
			
Small / Mouse - $ 13.99 USD
Medium / Mouse - $ 14.99 USD
Small / Beaver - $ 13.99 USD

			Medium / Beaver - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart












View More Sight Hounds ▸



Outdoor Gear
selected for Rhodesian Ridgebacks










Packaway Argyle Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Argyle Dog Raincoat

















Navy / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / S - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / M - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / L - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / XL - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / XXL - $ 27.00 USD
Yellow / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / S - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / M - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / L - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / XL - $ 25.00 USD

			Yellow / XXL - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart















Chunky Turtleneck Dog Sweater

from
        
        $ 45.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Chunky Turtleneck Dog Sweater


















































Red / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Red / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Red / 24" - $ 47.00 USD
Oatmeal / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Oatmeal / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Oatmeal / 24" - $ 47.00 USD
Camel / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 16" - $ 45.00 USD

			Camel / 18" - Sold Out
			
Camel / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Camel / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Camel / 24" - $ 47.00 USD
Navy / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Navy / 22" - $ 47.00 USD

			Navy / 24" - Sold Out
			
Olive / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Olive / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Olive / 24" - $ 47.00 USD

Add To Cart















Water Resistant Dog Parka

from
        
        $ 65.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Water Resistant Dog Parka
































Navy / 8" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 10" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 12" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 14" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 16" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 18" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 20" - $ 70.00 USD
Navy / 22" - $ 70.00 USD
Navy / 24" - $ 70.00 USD
Olive / 8" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 10" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 12" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 14" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 16" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 18" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 20" - $ 70.00 USD
Olive / 22" - $ 70.00 USD
Olive / 24" - $ 70.00 USD
Red / 8" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 10" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 12" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 14" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 16" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 18" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 20" - $ 70.00 USD
Red / 22" - $ 70.00 USD
Red / 24" - $ 70.00 USD

Add To Cart















Packaway Crab Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Crab Dog Raincoat

















Orange / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Orange / S - $ 25.00 USD
Orange / M - $ 25.00 USD

			Orange / L - Sold Out
			

			Orange / XL - Sold Out
			
Orange / XXL - $ 27.00 USD
Hot Pink / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / S - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / M - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / L - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / XL - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / XXL - $ 27.00 USD

Add To Cart















Wool & Shearling Plaid Dog Jacket

from
        
        $ 60.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Wool & Shearling Plaid Dog Jacket









































Black Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 12" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Black Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Black Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD

			Olive Plaid / 12" - Sold Out
			
Olive Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD
Red Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 12" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Red Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Red Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 12" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD

Add To Cart















Packaway Alligator Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Alligator Dog Raincoat











XS - $ 25.00 USD
S - $ 25.00 USD
M - $ 25.00 USD
L - $ 25.00 USD
XL - $ 25.00 USD
XXL - $ 27.00 USD

Add To Cart















Quilted Dog Puffer Jacket

from
        
        $ 58.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Quilted Dog Puffer Jacket









































Black / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 12" - $ 58.00 USD

			Black / 14" - Sold Out
			
Black / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 20" - $ 63.00 USD

			Black / 22" - Sold Out
			
Black / 24" - $ 63.00 USD
Olive / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 12" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 14" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 20" - $ 63.00 USD
Olive / 22" - $ 63.00 USD
Olive / 24" - $ 63.00 USD
Burgundy / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 12" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 14" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 20" - $ 63.00 USD
Burgundy / 22" - $ 63.00 USD
Burgundy / 24" - $ 63.00 USD
Navy / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 12" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 14" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 20" - $ 63.00 USD

			Navy / 22" - Sold Out
			
Navy / 24" - $ 63.00 USD

Add To Cart















Waxed Utility Coat

from
        
        $ 48.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Waxed Utility Coat
































8 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
10 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
12 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
14 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
16 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
18 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
20 / Taupe - $ 53.00 USD
22 / Taupe - $ 53.00 USD
24 / Taupe - $ 53.00 USD
8 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
10 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
12 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
14 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
16 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
18 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
20 / Slate - $ 53.00 USD

			22 / Slate - Sold Out
			
24 / Slate - $ 53.00 USD
8 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
10 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
12 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
14 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
16 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
18 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
20 / Black - $ 53.00 USD

			22 / Black - Sold Out
			
24 / Black - $ 53.00 USD

Add To Cart















Reversible Peace Sign Dog Puffer

from
        
        $ 48.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Reversible Peace Sign Dog Puffer
























			8" / Purple/Black - Sold Out
			
8" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD

			12" / Purple/Black - Sold Out
			
12" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
14" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
14" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
16" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
16" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
18" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
18" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
20" / Purple/Black - $ 53.00 USD
20" / Orange/Brown - $ 53.00 USD
22" / Purple/Black - $ 53.00 USD
22" / Orange/Brown - $ 53.00 USD
24" / Purple/Black - $ 53.00 USD
24" / Orange/Brown - $ 53.00 USD

Add To Cart















Packaway Cherry Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Cherry Dog Raincoat











XS - $ 25.00 USD
S - $ 25.00 USD

			M - Sold Out
			
L - $ 25.00 USD
XL - $ 25.00 USD
XXL - $ 27.00 USD

Add To Cart















Reversible Bone Dog Puffer

from
        
        $ 48.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Reversible Bone Dog Puffer























8" / Navy/Red - $ 48.00 USD
8" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Navy/Red - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 48.00 USD

			12" / Navy/Red - Sold Out
			

			12" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			

			14" / Navy/Red - Sold Out
			

			14" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			

			16" / Navy/Red - Sold Out
			

			16" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			
18" / Navy/Red - $ 48.00 USD
18" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 48.00 USD
20" / Navy/Red - $ 53.00 USD
20" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 53.00 USD
22" / Navy/Red - $ 53.00 USD

			22" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			
24" / Navy/Red - $ 53.00 USD
24" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 53.00 USD

Add To Cart















Torrent Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 79.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Torrent Dog Raincoat








































8 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
10 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
12 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
14 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
16 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
18 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD

			20 in / Raven - Sold Out
			
22 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
24 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
26 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
28 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
32 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
35 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
8 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
10 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
12 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
14 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
16 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
18 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
20 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
22 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
24 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
26 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
28 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
32 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
35 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
12 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
14 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
16 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
18 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
20 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
22 in / Orange - $ 84.99 USD
24 in / Orange - $ 84.99 USD
26 in / Orange - $ 84.99 USD

			28 in / Orange - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart












View More Sight Hounds ▸



Essentials
selected for Rhodesian Ridgebacks










All-Natural Ear Cleansing System for Dogs

        
        
        $ 19.99
      


Add To Cart




All-Natural Ear Cleansing System for Dogs






			
			$ 19.99
			
Add To Cart















Crash-Tested Car Safety Harness

from
        
        $ 80.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Crash-Tested Car Safety Harness





















Small / Black - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Black - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Black - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Black - $ 89.99 USD
Small / Orange - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Orange - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Orange - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Orange - $ 89.99 USD
Small / Red - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Red - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Red - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Red - $ 89.99 USD
Small / Robin - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Robin - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Robin - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Robin - $ 89.99 USD

Add To Cart















Cotton Web Training Lead

from
        
        $ 16.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Cotton Web Training Lead

























Black / 6 FT - $ 16.99 USD
Black / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD
Black / 20 FT - $ 21.99 USD

			Black / 30 FT - Sold Out
			

			Black / 50 FT - Sold Out
			
Blue / 6 FT - $ 16.99 USD
Blue / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD

			Blue / 20 FT - Sold Out
			
Blue / 30 FT - $ 23.99 USD

			Blue / 50 FT - Sold Out
			

			Green / 6 FT - Sold Out
			
Green / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD

			Green / 20 FT - Sold Out
			
Green / 30 FT - $ 23.99 USD
Green / 50 FT - $ 25.99 USD
Red / 6 FT - $ 16.99 USD
Red / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD

			Red / 20 FT - Sold Out
			
Red / 30 FT - $ 23.99 USD
Red / 50 FT - $ 25.99 USD

Add To Cart















The LINK AKC Smart Collar

$ 199.00
        
        
        $ 179.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
The LINK AKC Smart Collar









Small  (9"-14") - $ 179.00 USD
Medium (14" - 17.5") - $ 179.00 USD
Large (17" - 20.5") - $ 179.00 USD
XL (21" - 25") - $ 179.00 USD

Add To Cart















Teeth Cleansing System

        
        
        $ 19.99
      


Add To Cart




Teeth Cleansing System






			
			$ 19.99
			
Add To Cart















Perfect Cooling Pad for Dogs

from
        
        $ 54.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Perfect Cooling Pad for Dogs






































Charcoal / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Crimson / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Crimson / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Crimson / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Crimson / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Crimson / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Denim / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Denim / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Denim / Medium (21"x31") - $ 99.99 USD
Denim / Large (23"x36") - $ 119.99 USD
Denim / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 149.99 USD
Ivory / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Ivory / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Ivory / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Ivory / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Ivory / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Latte / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Latte / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Latte / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Latte / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD

			Latte / Extra Large (28"x42") - Sold Out
			
Oregano / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Oregano / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Oregano / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Oregano / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Oregano / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Silver / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Silver / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Silver / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Silver / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Silver / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Charcoal / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Charcoal / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD

Add To Cart















Super Heavy Non-Tip Bowls

from
        
        $ 11.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Super Heavy Non-Tip Bowls












8 oz - $ 11.99 USD
16 oz - $ 12.99 USD
24 oz - $ 13.99 USD
32 oz - $ 14.99 USD
64 oz - $ 15.99 USD
96 oz - $ 16.99 USD
160 oz - $ 29.99 USD

Add To Cart















Organic Dog Shampoo

        
        
        $ 14.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Organic Dog Shampoo








Tea Tree & Mint - $ 14.99 USD
Lavender - $ 14.99 USD
Unscented - $ 14.99 USD

Add To Cart















Active Harness

from
        
        $ 44.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Active Harness




















16-18 in / Raven - $ 44.99 USD
18-24 in / Raven - $ 44.99 USD

			24-32 in / Raven - Sold Out
			

			32-39 in / Raven - Sold Out
			
39-47 in / Raven - $ 49.99 USD
16-18 in / Cherry - $ 44.99 USD
18-24 in / Cherry - $ 44.99 USD
24-32 in / Cherry - $ 49.99 USD
32-39 in / Cherry - $ 49.99 USD
39-47 in / Cherry - $ 49.99 USD
16-18 in / Juniper - $ 44.99 USD
18-24 in / Juniper - $ 44.99 USD

			24-32 in / Juniper - Sold Out
			
32-39 in / Juniper - $ 49.99 USD
39-47 in / Juniper - $ 49.99 USD

Add To Cart















Classic Wire Dog Crate

from
        
        $ 39.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Classic Wire Dog Crate











XS - $ 39.99 USD
S - $ 55.99 USD
M - $ 66.99 USD

			M/L - Sold Out
			
L - $ 119.99 USD
XL - $ 144.99 USD

Add To Cart















Slowfeeder Dog Bowl

from
        
        $ 18.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Slowfeeder Dog Bowl









5.5" / Blue - $ 18.99 USD
7" / Blue - $ 23.99 USD
5.5" / Pink - $ 18.99 USD
7" / Pink - $ 23.99 USD

Add To Cart















Padded Y-Harness

        
        
        $ 34.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Padded Y-Harness




















			14 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			18 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			24 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			28 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			32 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			35 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			39 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			14 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			18 in / Birch - Sold Out
			
24 in / Birch - $ 34.99 USD

			28 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			32 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			35 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			39 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart












View More Sight Hounds ▸








Recently Viewed










































































Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts and Merchandise



















 



 


Home
Login
My Cart
Checkout
My Account
 







Advanced Search

 





 


 








Catalog » Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts and Merchandise 











Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts and Merchandise






Shop for unique Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts & Merchandise, Items and Products including Rhodesian Ridgeback Flags, Jewelry, Clothing, Rhodesian Ridgeback Signs and much more...









Displaying 1 to 20 (of 57 products)
Result Pages:  1  2  3  [Next >>] 




  
 Product Name 
 Price 
 Buy Now 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Business Card Holder 
 $16.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Can Covers (Set of 2) 
 $11.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Coasters (Set of 4) 
 $11.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Dog Treat Cookie Jar 
 $42.00 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Embroidered Denim Shirt 
 $39.00 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Garden Stake 
 $44.00 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Hat ~ Embroidered 
 $19.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Hat ~ Embroidered II 
 $19.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Knit Cap ~ Embroidered 
 $19.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Leash Holder 
 $49.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback License Plate - Woof 
 $15.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Luggage Tags (Set of 2) 
 $13.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Luggage Tags II (Set of 2) 
 $13.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Mousepad 
 $10.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Mousepad II 
 $10.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Polo Shirt ~ Embroidered 
 $35.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Pot Holders (Pair) 
 $19.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Sign ~ Entrance 
 $54.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Sweatshirt - Embroidered 
 $34.95 
 


  
 Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag ~ Embroidered 
 $26.95 
 




Displaying 1 to 20 (of 57 products)
Result Pages:  1  2  3  [Next >>] 














 







Dog Breeds  AffenpinscherAfghan HoundAiredale TerrierAkitaAlaskan MalamuteAm. Staffordshire TerrierAmerican BulldogAmerican EskimoAustralian Cattle DogAustralian ShepherdAustralian TerrierBasenjiBasset HoundBeagleBearded CollieBedlington TerrierBelgian MalinoisBelgian SheepdogBelgian TervurenBernese Mountain DogBichon FriseBloodhoundBorder CollieBorder TerrierBorzoiBoston TerrierBouvier Des FlandresBoxerBriardBrittanyBrussels GriffonBull TerrierBulldogBullmastiffCairn TerrierCavalier SpanielChesapeake Bay RetrieverChihuahuaChinese CrestedChow ChowClumber SpanielCocker SpanielCollieCorgiCoton de TulearCurly Coated RetrieverDachshundDalmatianDandie DinmontDoberman PinscherDogue de BordeauxEnglish SetterEnglish Springer SpanielFlat Coated RetrieverFox TerrierFrench BulldogGerman ShepherdGerman Shorthair PointerGerman Wirehair PointerGlen of ImaalGolden RetrieverGoldendoodleGordon SetterGreat DaneGreat PyreneesGreater Swiss Mountain DogGreyhoundHavaneseIbizan HoundIrish SetterIrish TerrierIrish WolfhoundItalian GreyhoundJack Russell TerrierJapanese ChinKeeshondKerry Blue TerrierKomondorKuvaszLabrador RetrieverLeonbergerLhasa ApsoLowchenMalteseMastiffMiniature PinscherNeapolitan MastiffNewfoundlandNorfolk TerrierNorwegian ElkhoundNorwich TerrierNova Scotia Duck TollerOld English SheepdogPapillonPBGVPekingesePharaoh HoundPitbull TerrierPointerPomeranianPoodlePortuguese Water DogPugPugglePuliRat TerrierRhodesian RidgebackRottweilerSaint BernardSalukiSamoyedSchipperkeSchnauzerScottish TerrierSealyham TerrierShar PeiShetland SheepdogShiba InuShih TzuSiberian HuskySilky TerrierSkye TerrierSoft Coated WheatenStaffordshire Bull TerrierTibetan SpanielTibetan TerrierVizslaWeimaranerWelsh TerrierWest Highland TerrierWhippetYorkshire TerrierDog Flags
Products  Please SelectAprons & BibsBusiness Card Holder..Christmas StockingsCoastersCookie JarsCross Stitch Pattern..Denim ShirtsDog FlagsDrink Covers - Can -..Garden StakesHatsJewelryLeash Holders and Le..License PlatesLuggage TagsMail Box CoversMatsMousepadsOrnaments - HolidayPolo ShirtsPot HoldersSweatshirtsTote BagsWall DecorWelcome Signs





Cart Items   






0 items










Store Info  Shipping & ReturnsPayment InfoPrivacy NoticeContact Us
&nbsp&nbsp   




























 



  
 



Home |
                      Login |
                    My Cart |
          Checkout


Friday 28 July, 2017  ◊  Copyright © 2015 DogShoppe.net
 













 



Rhodesian Ridgeback Products | AKC Shop











































Christmas in July Sale | Get 25% off when buying 2 or more breed items!


















$ 0.00





 AKC.ORG



AKC Experts

	  Login
	
Register























CART $ 0.00














Essentials


Eat & Drink
Dog Bowls
Travel Bowls
Pet Mats



Play
Plush Toys
Fetch Toys
Tug Toys
Interactive Toys
Dog Gift Packs



Rest
Beds
Crates
Crate Mats



Walk
Collars
Leashes
Harnesses






BFF Dog Gift Pack
						 $ 37.99







On-The-Go


Car
Car Covers
Car Seats & Harnesses
Car Barriers



Travel
Travel Bowls
Dog Carriers



Clothing and Active Wear
Dog Jackets and Coats
Dog Sweaters 
Outdoor Adventure
Safety Wear
Dog Accessories






Dog Life Savior Jacket
						 $ 79.99







Grooming & Wellness


Grooming
Shampoos & Conditioners
Dog Grooming Gloves
Dog Ear & Eye Care
Dog Dental Care
Nail & Paw
Skin & Coat
Dog Grooming Kits



Wellness
Dog Stairs
Insect Protection
Cancer Detection Test






Natural Flea and Tick Spray for Dogs
						 $ 12.99







Training


Books & DVDs
Breed Specific Training
Tricks Training
Basic Training



Canine Good Citizen
Books
Materials for Evaluators
Merchandise



Training Services
GoodDog! Helpline






Cotton Web Training Lead
						 $ 16.99







Dog Lovers










Choose a Breed
View All
Affenpinscher
Afghan Hound
Airedale Terrier
Akita
Alaskan Malamute
American English Coonhound
American Eskimo Dog
American Staffordshire Terrier
American Water Spaniel
Anatolian Shepherd Dog
Australian Cattle Dog
Australian Shepherd
Australian Terrier
Basenji
Basset Hound
Beagle
Bearded Collie
Beauceron
Bedlington Terrier
Belgian Malinois
Belgian Sheepdog
Belgian Tervuren
Bergamasco
Berger Picard
Bernese Mountain Dog
Bichon Frise
Black and Tan Coonhound
Black Russian Terrier
Bloodhound
Bluetick Coonhound
Boerboel
Border Collie
Border Terrier
Borzoi
Boston Terrier
Bouvier des Flandres
Boxer
Boykin Spaniel
Briard
Brittany
Brussels Griffon
Bull Terrier
Bulldog
Bullmastiff
Cairn Terrier
Canaan Dog
Cane Corso
Cardigan Welsh Corgi
Cavalier King Charles Spaniel
Cesky Terrier
Chesapeake Bay Retriever
Chihuahua
Chinese Crested
Chinese Shar-Pei
Chinook
Chow Chow
Cirneci D'ell Etna
Clumber Spaniel
Cocker Spaniel
Coton de Tulear
Curly Coated Retriever
Dachshund
Dalmatian
Dandie Dinmont Terrier
Doberman Pinscher
Dogue de Bordeaux
English Cocker Spaniel
English Foxhound
English Setter
English Springer Spaniel
English Toy Spaniel
Entlebucher Mountain Dog
Field Spaniel
Finnish Lapphund
Finnish Spitz
Flat Coated Retriever
French Bulldog
German Pinscher
German Shepherd Dog
German Shorthaired Pointer
German Wirehaired Pointer
Giant Schnauzer
Glen of Imaal Terrier
Golden Retriever
Gordon Setter
Great Dane
Great Pyrenees
Greater Swiss Mountain Dog
Greyhound
Harrier
Havanese
Ibizan Hound
Icelandic Sheepdog
Irish Red & White Setter
Irish Setter
Irish Terrier
Irish Water Spaniel
Irish Wolfhound
Italian Greyhound
Japanese Chin
Keeshond
Kerry Blue Terrier
Komondor
Kuvasz
Labrador Retriever
Lakeland Terrier
Leonberger
Lhasa Apso
Lowchen
Maltese
Manchester Terrier
Mastiff
Miniature Bull Terrier
Miniature Pinscher
Miniature Schnauzer
Neapolitan Mastiff
Newfoundland
Norfolk Terrier
Norwegian Buhund
Norwegian Elkhound
Norwegian Lundehund
Norwich Terrier
Nova Scotia Duck Tolling Retriever
Old English Sheepdog
Otterhound
Papillon
Parson Russell Terrier
Pekingese
Pembroke Welsh Corgi
Petit Basset Griffon Vendéen
Pharaoh Hound
Plott
Pointer
Polish Lowland Sheepdog
Pomeranian
Poodle
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno
Portuguese Water Dog
Pug
Puli
Pyrenean Shepherd
Rat Terrier
Redbone Coonhound
Rhodesian Ridgeback
Rottweiler
Rough Collie
Russell Terrier
Saluki
Samoyed
Schipperke
Schnauzer
Scottish Deerhound
Scottish Terrier
Sealyham Terrier
Shetland Sheepdog
Shiba Inu
Shih Tzu
Siberian Husky
Silky Terrier
Skye Terrier
Smooth Collie
Smooth Fox Terrier
Soft Coated Wheaten Terrier
Spanish Water Dog
Spinone Italiano
St. Bernard
Staffordshire Bull Terrier
Standard Schnauzer
Sussex Spaniel
Swedish Vallhund
Tibetan Mastiff
Tibetan Spaniel
Tibetan Terrier
Toy Fox Terrier
Toy Manchester Terrier
Treeing Walker Coonhound
Vizsla
Weimaraner
Welsh Springer Spaniel
Welsh Terrier
West Highland White Terrier
Whippet
Wire Fox Terrier
Wirehaired Pointing Griffon
Wirehaired Vizsla
Xoloitzcuintli
Yorkshire Terrier





Mugs
Coffee Mugs 
Tumblers
Travel Mugs


Tech Cases
Phone Cases
E-Reader Sleeves


Jewelry
Charms & Pendants
Oval Jewelry
Pins


Human Apparel
Short Sleeve Shirts
Long Sleeve Shirts
Sweatshirts


Tote Bags
Printed Tote Bags
Hand Painted Totes
Graphic Tote Bags


Travel & Accessories
Umbrellas
E-Reader Sleeves
Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Beach Towels
Luggage Tags
Tote Bags
Dog Travel


Home
Wine Glasses & Bottle Stoppers
Coasters
Pillows
Kitchen
Hand Towels
Ornaments


Pet Tech 
Dog Bowls
Dog Collars


Note Cards 


Breed Guides




Collections


Puppy Essentials
Crates & Beds
Puppy Toys
Collars & Leashes
Health & Grooming
Eat & Drink



Summer Picks
Cooling Products
Travel Products
Insect Repellent Products



Gift Center
Jewelry 
Mugs
Umbrellas
Travel
Note Cards
Home
Human Apparel
Tech Cases
Tote Bags
Pet Tech



Mellow Dogs 
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear



Active Dogs
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear



Pura Naturals
Grooming
Chewing & Snoozing
Steps
Wellness



Senior Essentials
Comfort
Grooming & Wellness
Toys




AKC Professional


Breeders
Supplies
Books & DVDS
DNA Test Kit
CADET℠ Cancer Detection Tests
Registration Rules & Policies
AKC Certified Pedigrees
Breeder Reports



Exhibitors
Event Rules & Regulations
Competitor Reports
Title Patches



Judges & Clubs
Books & DVDs
Event Rules & Regulations
Registration Rules & Policies
Breed Standards
Governance & Club Resources
Dog Show Resources



Trainers
Materials for CGC Evaluators
CGC Merchandise
Tricks Training
All Training Products









Christmas in July Sale | Get 25% off when buying 2 or more breed items!





Essentials


Eat & Drink
Dog Bowls
Travel Bowls
Pet Mats


Play
Plush Toys
Fetch Toys
Tug Toys
Interactive Toys
Dog Gift Packs


Rest
Beds
Crates
Crate Mats


Walk
Collars
Leashes
Harnesses



On-The-Go


Car
Car Covers
Car Seats & Harnesses
Car Barriers


Travel
Travel Bowls
Dog Carriers


Clothing and Active Wear
Dog Jackets and Coats
Dog Sweaters 
Outdoor Adventure
Safety Wear
Dog Accessories



Grooming & Wellness


Grooming
Shampoos & Conditioners
Dog Grooming Gloves
Dog Ear & Eye Care
Dog Dental Care
Nail & Paw
Skin & Coat
Dog Grooming Kits


Wellness
Dog Stairs
Insect Protection
Cancer Detection Test



Training


Books & DVDs
Breed Specific Training
Tricks Training
Basic Training


Canine Good Citizen
Books
Materials for Evaluators
Merchandise


Training Services
GoodDog! Helpline



Dog Lovers


Mugs
Coffee Mugs 
Tumblers
Travel Mugs


Tech Cases
Phone Cases
E-Reader Sleeves


Jewelry
Charms & Pendants
Oval Jewelry
Pins


Human Apparel
Short Sleeve Shirts
Long Sleeve Shirts
Sweatshirts


Tote Bags
Printed Tote Bags
Hand Painted Totes
Graphic Tote Bags


Travel & Accessories
Umbrellas
E-Reader Sleeves
Travel Mugs & Tumblers
Beach Towels
Luggage Tags
Tote Bags
Dog Travel


Home
Wine Glasses & Bottle Stoppers
Coasters
Pillows
Kitchen
Hand Towels
Ornaments


Pet Tech 
Dog Bowls
Dog Collars


Note Cards 


Breed Guides



Collections


Puppy Essentials
Crates & Beds
Puppy Toys
Collars & Leashes
Health & Grooming
Eat & Drink


Summer Picks
Cooling Products
Travel Products
Insect Repellent Products


Gift Center
Jewelry 
Mugs
Umbrellas
Travel
Note Cards
Home
Human Apparel
Tech Cases
Tote Bags
Pet Tech


Mellow Dogs 
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear


Active Dogs
Sleep
Play
Walk
Wear


Pura Naturals
Grooming
Chewing & Snoozing
Steps
Wellness


Senior Essentials
Comfort
Grooming & Wellness
Toys



AKC Professional


Breeders
Supplies
Books & DVDS
DNA Test Kit
CADET℠ Cancer Detection Tests
Registration Rules & Policies
AKC Certified Pedigrees
Breeder Reports


Exhibitors
Event Rules & Regulations
Competitor Reports
Title Patches


Judges & Clubs
Books & DVDs
Event Rules & Regulations
Registration Rules & Policies
Breed Standards
Governance & Club Resources
Dog Show Resources


Trainers
Materials for CGC Evaluators
CGC Merchandise
Tricks Training
All Training Products



AKC Experts


Dr. Mary Burch
Dr. Jerry Klein
Susan Sholar









Choose a Breed


View All
Affenpinscher
Afghan Hound
Airedale Terrier
Akita
Alaskan Malamute
American English Coonhound
American Eskimo Dog
American Staffordshire Terrier
American Water Spaniel
Anatolian Shepherd Dog
Australian Cattle Dog
Australian Shepherd
Australian Terrier
Basenji
Basset Hound
Beagle
Bearded Collie
Beauceron
Bedlington Terrier
Belgian Malinois
Belgian Sheepdog
Belgian Tervuren
Bergamasco
Berger Picard
Bernese Mountain Dog
Bichon Frise
Black and Tan Coonhound
Black Russian Terrier
Bloodhound
Bluetick Coonhound
Boerboel
Border Collie
Border Terrier
Borzoi
Boston Terrier
Bouvier des Flandres
Boxer
Boykin Spaniel
Briard
Brittany
Brussels Griffon
Bull Terrier
Bulldog
Bullmastiff
Cairn Terrier
Canaan Dog
Cane Corso
Cardigan Welsh Corgi
Cavalier King Charles Spaniel
Cesky Terrier
Chesapeake Bay Retriever
Chihuahua
Chinese Crested
Chinese Shar-Pei
Chinook
Chow Chow
Cirneci D'ell Etna
Clumber Spaniel
Cocker Spaniel
Coton de Tulear
Curly Coated Retriever
Dachshund
Dalmatian
Dandie Dinmont Terrier
Doberman Pinscher
Dogue de Bordeaux
English Cocker Spaniel
English Foxhound
English Setter
English Springer Spaniel
English Toy Spaniel
Entlebucher Mountain Dog
Field Spaniel
Finnish Lapphund
Finnish Spitz
Flat Coated Retriever
French Bulldog
German Pinscher
German Shepherd Dog
German Shorthaired Pointer
German Wirehaired Pointer
Giant Schnauzer
Glen of Imaal Terrier
Golden Retriever
Gordon Setter
Great Dane
Great Pyrenees
Greater Swiss Mountain Dog
Greyhound
Harrier
Havanese
Ibizan Hound
Icelandic Sheepdog
Irish Red & White Setter
Irish Setter
Irish Terrier
Irish Water Spaniel
Irish Wolfhound
Italian Greyhound
Japanese Chin
Keeshond
Kerry Blue Terrier
Komondor
Kuvasz
Labrador Retriever
Lakeland Terrier
Leonberger
Lhasa Apso
Lowchen
Maltese
Manchester Terrier
Mastiff
Miniature Bull Terrier
Miniature Pinscher
Miniature Schnauzer
Neapolitan Mastiff
Newfoundland
Norfolk Terrier
Norwegian Buhund
Norwegian Elkhound
Norwegian Lundehund
Norwich Terrier
Nova Scotia Duck Tolling Retriever
Old English Sheepdog
Otterhound
Papillon
Parson Russell Terrier
Pekingese
Pembroke Welsh Corgi
Petit Basset Griffon Vendéen
Pharaoh Hound
Plott
Pointer
Polish Lowland Sheepdog
Pomeranian
Poodle
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno
Portuguese Water Dog
Pug
Puli
Pyrenean Shepherd
Rat Terrier
Redbone Coonhound
Rhodesian Ridgeback
Rottweiler
Rough Collie
Russell Terrier
Saluki
Samoyed
Schipperke
Schnauzer
Scottish Deerhound
Scottish Terrier
Sealyham Terrier
Shetland Sheepdog
Shiba Inu
Shih Tzu
Siberian Husky
Silky Terrier
Skye Terrier
Smooth Collie
Smooth Fox Terrier
Soft Coated Wheaten Terrier
Spanish Water Dog
Spinone Italiano
St. Bernard
Staffordshire Bull Terrier
Standard Schnauzer
Sussex Spaniel
Swedish Vallhund
Tibetan Mastiff
Tibetan Spaniel
Tibetan Terrier
Toy Fox Terrier
Toy Manchester Terrier
Treeing Walker Coonhound
Vizsla
Weimaraner
Welsh Springer Spaniel
Welsh Terrier
West Highland White Terrier
Whippet
Wire Fox Terrier
Wirehaired Pointing Griffon
Wirehaired Vizsla
Xoloitzcuintli
Yorkshire Terrier









Home > Shop by Breed > Rhodesian Ridgeback Products


Rhodesian Ridgeback Products 










Hand-Painted Dog Breed Tote Bag - Hound Group

        
        
        $ 55.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Hand-Painted Dog Breed Tote Bag - Hound Group


































































































Afghan Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Afghan Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Afghan Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
American English Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
American English Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
American English Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
American Foxhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
American Foxhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
American Foxhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Basenji / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Basenji / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Basenji / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Basset Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Basset Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Basset Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Beagle / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Beagle / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Beagle / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Black and Tan Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Black and Tan Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Black and Tan Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Bloodhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Bloodhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Bloodhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Bluetick Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Bluetick Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Bluetick Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Borzoi / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Borzoi / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Borzoi / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Cirneco dell'Etna / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Cirneco dell'Etna / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Cirneco dell'Etna / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Longhaired / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Longhaired / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Longhaired / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Smooth / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Smooth / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Smooth / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Wirehaired / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Wirehaired / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Dachshund - Wirehaired / Green - $ 55.00 USD
English Foxhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
English Foxhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
English Foxhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Greyhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Greyhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Greyhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Harrier / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Harrier / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Harrier / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Ibizan Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Ibizan Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Ibizan Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Irish Wolfhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Irish Wolfhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Irish Wolfhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Norwegian Elkhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Norwegian Elkhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Norwegian Elkhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Otterhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Otterhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Otterhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Petit Basset Griffon Vendeen / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Petit Basset Griffon Vendeen / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Petit Basset Griffon Vendeen / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Pharaoh Hound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Pharaoh Hound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Pharaoh Hound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Plott / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Plott / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Plott / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Portuguese Podengo Pequeno / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Redbone Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Redbone Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Redbone Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Saluki / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Saluki / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Saluki / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Scottish Deerhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Scottish Deerhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Scottish Deerhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Treeing Walker Coonhound / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Treeing Walker Coonhound / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Treeing Walker Coonhound / Green - $ 55.00 USD
Whippet / Red - $ 55.00 USD
Whippet / Blue - $ 55.00 USD
Whippet / Green - $ 55.00 USD


Dog's Coat Color


Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Beverage Tumbler

        
        
        $ 18.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Beverage Tumbler






			
			$ 18.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Charm Jewelry

from
        
        $ 44.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Charm Jewelry








Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Charm (Sterling Silver) - $ 44.99 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Pendant (Sterling Silver) - $ 44.99 USD
Rhodesian Ridgeback Breed Charm with Bead Bracelet Attachment (Sterling Silver) - $ 49.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug

from
        
        $ 14.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Coffee Mug







11 oz - $ 14.99 USD
15 oz - $ 16.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback e-Reader Sleeve

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback e-Reader Sleeve






			
			$ 24.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Figurine Cork Bottle Stopper

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Figurine Cork Bottle Stopper






			
			$ 24.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Head Cork Bottle Stopper

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Head Cork Bottle Stopper






Red - $ 24.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Note Cards

$ 31.99
from
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Rhodesian Ridgeback Note Cards







Box of 8 - $ 24.99 USD
Box of 24 - $ 45.99 USD

Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag

        
        
        $ 24.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Tote Bag






			
			$ 24.99
			
Add To Cart















Rhodesian Ridgeback Travel Mug

        
        
        $ 27.99
      


Add To Cart




Rhodesian Ridgeback Travel Mug






			
			$ 27.99
			
Add To Cart












View More Rhodesian Ridgeback Products ▸









Toys
selected for Rhodesian Ridgebacks










Flying Ice Disc Dog Toy

        
        
        $ 15.99
      


Add To Cart




Flying Ice Disc Dog Toy






			
			$ 15.99
			
Add To Cart















Stuffing Free Dog Toy

        
        
        $ 14.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Stuffing Free Dog Toy








Goose - $ 14.99 USD
Mallard Duck - $ 14.99 USD

			Pheasant - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart















Boomerang Toy with Tennis Ball

        
        
        $ 18.99
      


Add To Cart




Boomerang Toy with Tennis Ball






			
			$ 18.99
			
Add To Cart















Soft Rubber Dummy Duck Toy

        
        
        $ 20.99
      


Add To Cart




Soft Rubber Dummy Duck Toy






			
			$ 20.99
			
Add To Cart















BFF Dog Gift Pack

        
        
        $ 37.99
      


View




Choose options for
BFF Dog Gift Pack







Small/Medium Sized Dog - $ 37.99 USD
Medium/Large Sized Dog - $ 37.99 USD


Dog Name



Dog Breed


Add To Cart















Silly Dog Tounge Toy

from
        
        $ 9.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Silly Dog Tounge Toy







Small - $ 9.99 USD
Large - $ 10.99 USD

Add To Cart















Ice Ball Dog Toy

        
        
        $ 17.99
      


Add To Cart




Ice Ball Dog Toy






			
			$ 17.99
			
Add To Cart















Country Critter Faballs

from
        
        $ 13.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Country Critter Faballs

















Small / Hedgehog - $ 13.99 USD

			Medium / Hedgehog - Sold Out
			

			Small / Pig - Sold Out
			

			Medium / Pig - Sold Out
			
Small / Raccoon - $ 13.99 USD
Medium / Raccoon - $ 14.99 USD
Small / Cow - $ 13.99 USD

			Medium / Cow - Sold Out
			
Small / Mouse - $ 13.99 USD
Medium / Mouse - $ 14.99 USD
Small / Beaver - $ 13.99 USD

			Medium / Beaver - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart












View More Sight Hounds ▸



Outdoor Gear
selected for Rhodesian Ridgebacks










Packaway Argyle Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Argyle Dog Raincoat

















Navy / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / S - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / M - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / L - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / XL - $ 25.00 USD
Navy / XXL - $ 27.00 USD
Yellow / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / S - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / M - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / L - $ 25.00 USD
Yellow / XL - $ 25.00 USD

			Yellow / XXL - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart















Chunky Turtleneck Dog Sweater

from
        
        $ 45.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Chunky Turtleneck Dog Sweater


















































Red / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Red / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Red / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Red / 24" - $ 47.00 USD
Oatmeal / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Oatmeal / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Oatmeal / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Oatmeal / 24" - $ 47.00 USD
Camel / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Camel / 16" - $ 45.00 USD

			Camel / 18" - Sold Out
			
Camel / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Camel / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Camel / 24" - $ 47.00 USD
Navy / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Navy / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Navy / 22" - $ 47.00 USD

			Navy / 24" - Sold Out
			
Olive / 8" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 10" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 12" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 14" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 16" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 18" - $ 45.00 USD
Olive / 20" - $ 47.00 USD
Olive / 22" - $ 47.00 USD
Olive / 24" - $ 47.00 USD

Add To Cart















Water Resistant Dog Parka

from
        
        $ 65.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Water Resistant Dog Parka
































Navy / 8" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 10" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 12" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 14" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 16" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 18" - $ 65.00 USD
Navy / 20" - $ 70.00 USD
Navy / 22" - $ 70.00 USD
Navy / 24" - $ 70.00 USD
Olive / 8" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 10" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 12" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 14" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 16" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 18" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive / 20" - $ 70.00 USD
Olive / 22" - $ 70.00 USD
Olive / 24" - $ 70.00 USD
Red / 8" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 10" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 12" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 14" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 16" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 18" - $ 65.00 USD
Red / 20" - $ 70.00 USD
Red / 22" - $ 70.00 USD
Red / 24" - $ 70.00 USD

Add To Cart















Packaway Crab Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Crab Dog Raincoat

















Orange / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Orange / S - $ 25.00 USD
Orange / M - $ 25.00 USD

			Orange / L - Sold Out
			

			Orange / XL - Sold Out
			
Orange / XXL - $ 27.00 USD
Hot Pink / XS - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / S - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / M - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / L - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / XL - $ 25.00 USD
Hot Pink / XXL - $ 27.00 USD

Add To Cart















Wool & Shearling Plaid Dog Jacket

from
        
        $ 60.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Wool & Shearling Plaid Dog Jacket









































Black Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 12" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Black Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Black Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Black Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD

			Olive Plaid / 12" - Sold Out
			
Olive Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Olive Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD
Red Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 12" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Red Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Red Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Red Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 8" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 10" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 12" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 14" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 16" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 18" - $ 60.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 20" - $ 65.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 22" - $ 65.00 USD
Camel Plaid / 24" - $ 65.00 USD

Add To Cart















Packaway Alligator Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Alligator Dog Raincoat











XS - $ 25.00 USD
S - $ 25.00 USD
M - $ 25.00 USD
L - $ 25.00 USD
XL - $ 25.00 USD
XXL - $ 27.00 USD

Add To Cart















Quilted Dog Puffer Jacket

from
        
        $ 58.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Quilted Dog Puffer Jacket









































Black / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 12" - $ 58.00 USD

			Black / 14" - Sold Out
			
Black / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Black / 20" - $ 63.00 USD

			Black / 22" - Sold Out
			
Black / 24" - $ 63.00 USD
Olive / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 12" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 14" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Olive / 20" - $ 63.00 USD
Olive / 22" - $ 63.00 USD
Olive / 24" - $ 63.00 USD
Burgundy / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 12" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 14" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Burgundy / 20" - $ 63.00 USD
Burgundy / 22" - $ 63.00 USD
Burgundy / 24" - $ 63.00 USD
Navy / 8" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 10" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 12" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 14" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 16" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 18" - $ 58.00 USD
Navy / 20" - $ 63.00 USD

			Navy / 22" - Sold Out
			
Navy / 24" - $ 63.00 USD

Add To Cart















Waxed Utility Coat

from
        
        $ 48.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Waxed Utility Coat
































8 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
10 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
12 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
14 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
16 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
18 / Taupe - $ 48.00 USD
20 / Taupe - $ 53.00 USD
22 / Taupe - $ 53.00 USD
24 / Taupe - $ 53.00 USD
8 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
10 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
12 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
14 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
16 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
18 / Slate - $ 48.00 USD
20 / Slate - $ 53.00 USD

			22 / Slate - Sold Out
			
24 / Slate - $ 53.00 USD
8 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
10 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
12 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
14 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
16 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
18 / Black - $ 48.00 USD
20 / Black - $ 53.00 USD

			22 / Black - Sold Out
			
24 / Black - $ 53.00 USD

Add To Cart















Reversible Peace Sign Dog Puffer

from
        
        $ 48.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Reversible Peace Sign Dog Puffer
























			8" / Purple/Black - Sold Out
			
8" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD

			12" / Purple/Black - Sold Out
			
12" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
14" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
14" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
16" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
16" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
18" / Purple/Black - $ 48.00 USD
18" / Orange/Brown - $ 48.00 USD
20" / Purple/Black - $ 53.00 USD
20" / Orange/Brown - $ 53.00 USD
22" / Purple/Black - $ 53.00 USD
22" / Orange/Brown - $ 53.00 USD
24" / Purple/Black - $ 53.00 USD
24" / Orange/Brown - $ 53.00 USD

Add To Cart















Packaway Cherry Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 25.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Packaway Cherry Dog Raincoat











XS - $ 25.00 USD
S - $ 25.00 USD

			M - Sold Out
			
L - $ 25.00 USD
XL - $ 25.00 USD
XXL - $ 27.00 USD

Add To Cart















Reversible Bone Dog Puffer

from
        
        $ 48.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Reversible Bone Dog Puffer























8" / Navy/Red - $ 48.00 USD
8" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Navy/Red - $ 48.00 USD
10" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 48.00 USD

			12" / Navy/Red - Sold Out
			

			12" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			

			14" / Navy/Red - Sold Out
			

			14" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			

			16" / Navy/Red - Sold Out
			

			16" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			
18" / Navy/Red - $ 48.00 USD
18" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 48.00 USD
20" / Navy/Red - $ 53.00 USD
20" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 53.00 USD
22" / Navy/Red - $ 53.00 USD

			22" / Pink/Hot Pink - Sold Out
			
24" / Navy/Red - $ 53.00 USD
24" / Pink/Hot Pink - $ 53.00 USD

Add To Cart















Torrent Dog Raincoat

from
        
        $ 79.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Torrent Dog Raincoat








































8 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
10 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
12 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
14 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
16 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD
18 in / Raven - $ 79.99 USD

			20 in / Raven - Sold Out
			
22 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
24 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
26 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
28 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
32 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
35 in / Raven - $ 84.99 USD
8 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
10 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
12 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
14 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
16 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
18 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
20 in / Cherry - $ 79.99 USD
22 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
24 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
26 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
28 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
32 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
35 in / Cherry - $ 84.99 USD
12 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
14 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
16 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
18 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
20 in / Orange - $ 79.99 USD
22 in / Orange - $ 84.99 USD
24 in / Orange - $ 84.99 USD
26 in / Orange - $ 84.99 USD

			28 in / Orange - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart












View More Sight Hounds ▸



Essentials
selected for Rhodesian Ridgebacks










All-Natural Ear Cleansing System for Dogs

        
        
        $ 19.99
      


Add To Cart




All-Natural Ear Cleansing System for Dogs






			
			$ 19.99
			
Add To Cart















Crash-Tested Car Safety Harness

from
        
        $ 80.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Crash-Tested Car Safety Harness





















Small / Black - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Black - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Black - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Black - $ 89.99 USD
Small / Orange - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Orange - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Orange - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Orange - $ 89.99 USD
Small / Red - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Red - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Red - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Red - $ 89.99 USD
Small / Robin - $ 80.99 USD
Medium / Robin - $ 80.99 USD
Large / Robin - $ 85.99 USD
Extra-Large / Robin - $ 89.99 USD

Add To Cart















Cotton Web Training Lead

from
        
        $ 16.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Cotton Web Training Lead

























Black / 6 FT - $ 16.99 USD
Black / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD
Black / 20 FT - $ 21.99 USD

			Black / 30 FT - Sold Out
			

			Black / 50 FT - Sold Out
			
Blue / 6 FT - $ 16.99 USD
Blue / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD

			Blue / 20 FT - Sold Out
			
Blue / 30 FT - $ 23.99 USD

			Blue / 50 FT - Sold Out
			

			Green / 6 FT - Sold Out
			
Green / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD

			Green / 20 FT - Sold Out
			
Green / 30 FT - $ 23.99 USD
Green / 50 FT - $ 25.99 USD
Red / 6 FT - $ 16.99 USD
Red / 15 FT - $ 19.99 USD

			Red / 20 FT - Sold Out
			
Red / 30 FT - $ 23.99 USD
Red / 50 FT - $ 25.99 USD

Add To Cart















The LINK AKC Smart Collar

$ 199.00
        
        
        $ 179.00
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
The LINK AKC Smart Collar









Small  (9"-14") - $ 179.00 USD
Medium (14" - 17.5") - $ 179.00 USD
Large (17" - 20.5") - $ 179.00 USD
XL (21" - 25") - $ 179.00 USD

Add To Cart















Teeth Cleansing System

        
        
        $ 19.99
      


Add To Cart




Teeth Cleansing System






			
			$ 19.99
			
Add To Cart















Perfect Cooling Pad for Dogs

from
        
        $ 54.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Perfect Cooling Pad for Dogs






































Charcoal / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Crimson / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Crimson / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Crimson / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Crimson / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Crimson / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Denim / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Denim / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Denim / Medium (21"x31") - $ 99.99 USD
Denim / Large (23"x36") - $ 119.99 USD
Denim / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 149.99 USD
Ivory / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Ivory / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Ivory / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Ivory / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Ivory / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Latte / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Latte / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Latte / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Latte / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD

			Latte / Extra Large (28"x42") - Sold Out
			
Oregano / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Oregano / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Oregano / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Oregano / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Oregano / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Silver / Extra Small (15"x20") - $ 54.99 USD
Silver / Small (19"x24") - $ 69.99 USD
Silver / Medium (21"x31") - $ 89.99 USD
Silver / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Silver / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD
Charcoal / Large (23"x36") - $ 99.99 USD
Charcoal / Extra Large (28"x42") - $ 159.99 USD

Add To Cart















Super Heavy Non-Tip Bowls

from
        
        $ 11.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Super Heavy Non-Tip Bowls












8 oz - $ 11.99 USD
16 oz - $ 12.99 USD
24 oz - $ 13.99 USD
32 oz - $ 14.99 USD
64 oz - $ 15.99 USD
96 oz - $ 16.99 USD
160 oz - $ 29.99 USD

Add To Cart















Organic Dog Shampoo

        
        
        $ 14.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Organic Dog Shampoo








Tea Tree & Mint - $ 14.99 USD
Lavender - $ 14.99 USD
Unscented - $ 14.99 USD

Add To Cart















Active Harness

from
        
        $ 44.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Active Harness




















16-18 in / Raven - $ 44.99 USD
18-24 in / Raven - $ 44.99 USD

			24-32 in / Raven - Sold Out
			

			32-39 in / Raven - Sold Out
			
39-47 in / Raven - $ 49.99 USD
16-18 in / Cherry - $ 44.99 USD
18-24 in / Cherry - $ 44.99 USD
24-32 in / Cherry - $ 49.99 USD
32-39 in / Cherry - $ 49.99 USD
39-47 in / Cherry - $ 49.99 USD
16-18 in / Juniper - $ 44.99 USD
18-24 in / Juniper - $ 44.99 USD

			24-32 in / Juniper - Sold Out
			
32-39 in / Juniper - $ 49.99 USD
39-47 in / Juniper - $ 49.99 USD

Add To Cart















Classic Wire Dog Crate

from
        
        $ 39.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Classic Wire Dog Crate











XS - $ 39.99 USD
S - $ 55.99 USD
M - $ 66.99 USD

			M/L - Sold Out
			
L - $ 119.99 USD
XL - $ 144.99 USD

Add To Cart















Slowfeeder Dog Bowl

from
        
        $ 18.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Slowfeeder Dog Bowl









5.5" / Blue - $ 18.99 USD
7" / Blue - $ 23.99 USD
5.5" / Pink - $ 18.99 USD
7" / Pink - $ 23.99 USD

Add To Cart















Padded Y-Harness

        
        
        $ 34.99
      


Add To Cart




Choose options for
Padded Y-Harness




















			14 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			18 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			24 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			28 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			32 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			35 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			39 in / Raspberry - Sold Out
			

			14 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			18 in / Birch - Sold Out
			
24 in / Birch - $ 34.99 USD

			28 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			32 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			35 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

			39 in / Birch - Sold Out
			

Add To Cart












View More Sight Hounds ▸








Recently Viewed







































































Memories of Rhodesia - Legal IssuesMemories of Rhodesia, Inc.Legal Issues
Trademark List - January 2013       
The following is a list of Memories of Rhodesia, Inc's trademarks and service marks.          
When using the marks in publications that will be distributed only in the United States, include the appropriate TM ,SM , or ® symbol on first use. For publications that will be distributed outside the United States, do not include trademark symbols. Instead use the appropriate trademark attribution notice, for example: Memories of Rhodesia (and its derivates) and Helping Keep the Memories Alive Through Film & Book are trademarks of Memories of Rhodesia, Inc., registered in the U.S. and other countries.          The list also includes one or more suggested generic terms for each trademark. For all publications, include an appropriate generic term after the trademark the first time it appears. Thereafter, the generic term should appear frequently with the trademark. (Note: These generic terms are only suggestions, and there may be other words that are equally appropriate. Remember that trademarks are adjectives, and cannot be made plural or possessive.            
For more information on how to use Memories of Rhodesia, Inc's trademarks contact the Trademark Department by e-mail at info@memoriesofrhodesia.com The absence of a product or service name or logo from this list does not constitute a waiver of Memories of Rhodesia, Inc's trademark or other intellectual property rights concerning that name or logo. 
Memories of Rhodesia ® is filed with the United States Trademark Office (Serial No. 77-056,035, Reg No 3,377,125)
OTHER MEMORIES OF RHODESIA PRODUCT OR SERVICE NAMES 
If a product or service name is not listed under Memories of Rhodesia, Inc's Trademarks or Memories of Rhodesia, Inc's Service Marks, it should not be followed by a TM or SM notation and should not be included in credit lines. However, if a product or service name includes Memories of Rhodesia®, or another Memories of Rhodesia™ mark listed in this trademark list, do apply the correct trademark symbol TM or ® to that portion of the name for U.S. publications only. In addition, all Memories of Rhodesia® trademarks need to be given the correct attribution in the credit section of all U.S. and international publications. 
Memories of Rhodesia ® corporations include MEMORIES OF RHODESIA, INC. (A Delaware, USA, Corporation), MEMORIES OF RHODESIA TRADING (PTY) LTD (A South African Corporation) and MEMORIES OF RHODESIA LTD (A U.K. Corporation) 
MEMORIES OF RHODESIA, INC. TRADEMARK LISTS:           
MEMORIES OF RHODESIA  ® and its deriviates. HELPING TO KEEP THE MEMORIES ALIVE THROUGH FILM & BOOK MEMORIES OF ZIMBABWE            THE WARRIORS OF RHODESIA™A NATION AT WAR™THE WINDS OF CHANGE™RHODESIA 1890-1980™THE SAINTS™THE ELITE™RHODESIA AT WAR™DOWN MEMORY LANE™ THE ZAMBESI SERIES™ 
  THE LAST RHODESIAN ™

Each DVD & CD title produced is also claimed as a Trademark by Memories of Rhodesia, Inc.  OTHER TRADEMARKS            RADIO RHODESIA™ , RHODESIAN TELEVISION™,THE RHODESIAN BROADCASTING CORPORATION™, THE NEW R.B.C.™ and RHODIE POD-TV™ are the registered trademarks of The Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation. Used by permission.            A copyright is a property right in an original work of authorship. Copyright is recognized in most countries of the world by statutory copyright laws. Copyright exists in the expression of an idea, but not the idea itself. Copyrightable expressions can take many forms but are usually categorized as literary, musical, dramatic, pantomime and choreography, pictorial, graphic,sculptural, computer programs, motion pictures, and sound recordings. Rights and Permissions               
If you have any questions concerning the usage or licensing of Memories of Rhodesia, Inc. copyrighted materials, for example, photographs, video footage, Memories of Rhodesia ® advertisements or other Memories of Rhodesia ® materials, please submit your detailed request in writing.
Requests may be emailed to info@memoriesofrhodesia.com , faxed to Rights and Permissions at (302) 998-4622, or mailed to Memories of Rhodesia, Inc., Attention:Rights and Permissions, PO Box 5891, Wilmington, DE 19808.            Original footage and material used in our products is supplied courtesy of The Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation™ (A Delaware Corporation) and are used by permission. Memories of Rhodesia, Inc does not itself hold title to any source material.Claim of Violations of Copyright, Trademarks etc. 
Memories of Rhodesia, Inc. (A Delaware Corporation) is solely responsible for all content material, editing decisions and production of movie, audio and written works. None of it's subsidiaries or affiliates have any editorial control or influence over what is produced and are merely licensed distribution agents of the finished products. Accordingly, any questions concerning copyright or trademark issues, claims of infringement or other matters should only be referred to Memories of Rhodesia, Inc (A Delaware Corporation) in the United States of America. 
Claims of violations of copyrights, trademarks etc. by Memories of Rhodesia, Inc., should be addressed in writing; stating in details the alleged infringement, the work infringed, the dates and should be supported by copies of all legal forms, filing and other documents that establish the claimants rights to the work alleged to be infringed.
The complaint should be compliant with section 512(c)(3) of the Digital Millenium Copyright Act, namely:

A physical or electronic signature of a person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is allegedly infringed.
Identification of the copyrighted work claimed to have been infringed or, if multiple copyrighted works at a single online site are covered by a single notification, a representative list of such works at that site.
Identification of the material that is claimed to be infringing or to be the subject of infringing activity and that is to be removed or access to which is to be disabled, and information reasonably sufficient to permit the service provider to locate the material. Providing URLs in the body of an email is the best way to help us locate content quickly.
Information reasonably sufficient to permit the service provider to contact the complaining party, such as an address, telephone number, and, if available, an electronic mail address at which the complaining party may be contacted.
A statement that the complaining party has a good faith belief that use of the material in the manner complained of is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law.
A statement that the information in the notification is accurate and, under penalty of perjury, that the complaining party is authorized to act on behalf of the owner of an exclusive right that is allegedly infringed.

The written documents and supporting facts should be mailed by Registered Mail to 
Memories of Rhodesia, Inc.
  PO Box 5891
  Wilmington, Delaware 19808
  United States of America. 
An interim complaint can be filed by sending all such documents by email to info@memoriesofrhodesia.com. However, formal notice shall be construed on receipt of the documents by Registered Mail.
All original footage and material used by Memories of Rhodesia, Inc. are the property of The Rhodesian Media Group, (a UK Corporation)  and is used by permission. Memories of Rhodesia, Inc., does not own title to any original film, video or audio source material. 
Warranties and Disclaimers 
Memories of Rhodesia, Inc., and its subsidiaries, intends for the information and data contained in the Memories of Rhodesia ® web site to be accurate and reliable, however, since the information and data have been compiled by Memories of Rhodesia ® from a variety of sources, it is provided "as is."            
MEMORIES OF RHODESIA, INC AND IT'S SUBSIDIARIES  EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES AND/OR CONDITIONS, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, AS TO ANY MATTER WHATSOEVER RELATING TO OR REFERENCED BY THE MEMORIES OF RHODESIA, INC. WEB SITE, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES AND/OR CONDITIONS OF MERCHANTABILITY OR SATISFACTORY QUALITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON INFRINGEMENT.            
Memories of Rhodesia ® provides access to Memories of Rhodesia ® international data and, therefore, may contain references or cross references to Memories of Rhodesia ® products, programs and services that are not announced in your country. Such reference does not imply that Memories of Rhodesia ® in your country intends to announce such products, programs or services. 
RETURN TO MAIN PAGE   Memories of Rhodesia, Inc. Telephone: (302) 981-7138, FAX (302) 998-4622, e-mail:info@memoriesofrhodesia.com 
© 2003-2013. Memories of Rhodesia, Inc. All Rights Reserved., 


Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts, Merchandise and Collectibles












 



















Login / Register

My Cart (Empty)
























 









Categories




 Gift Certificates



Gifts By Breed






 
Cat Gifts






 
Abyssinian





 
Birman





 
Black





 
Black and White





 
Bombay





 
Burmese





 
Cat





 
Cornish Rex





 
Himalayan





 
Japanese Bobtail





 
Kitten





 
Maine Coon





 
Manx





 
Oriental Shorthair





 
Persian





 
Ragdoll





 
Scottish Fold





 
Siamese





 
Tabby






 
 Dog Gifts
 





 
Affenpinscher





 
Afghan Hound





 
Airedale Terrier





 
Akita





 
Alaskan Malamute





 
American Eskimo





 
American Foxhound





 
American Staffordshire





 
Anatolian Shepherd





 
Australian Cattle





 
Australian Kelpie





 
Australian Shepherd





 
Australian Terrier





 
Basenji





 
Basset Hound





 
Beagle





 
Bearded Collie





 
Bedlington Terrier





 
Belgian Malinois





 
Belgian Sheepdog





 
Belgian Tervuren





 
Bernese Mtn. Dog





 
Bichon Frise





 
Bloodhound





 
Border Collie





 
Border Terrier





 
Borzoi





 
Boston Terrier





 
Bouvier





 
Boxer (Cropped)





 
Boxer (Uncropped)





 
Briard





 
Brittany





 
Brussels Griffon





 
Bull Terrier





 
Bulldog





 
Bullmastiff





 
Cairn Terrier





 
Cavalier King Charles Spaniel





 
Chesapeake Bay Retriever





 
Chihuahua





 
Chinese Crested





 
Chow





 
Clumber Spaniel





 
Cockapoo





 
Cocker Spaniel





 
Collie





 
Coonhound





 
Dachshund (Longhaired)





 
Dachshund (Smooth Haired)





 
Dachshund (Wirehaired)





 
Dalmatian





 
Dandie Dinmont





 
Doberman Pinscher





 
Dogue De Bordeaux





 
English Cocker Spaniel





 
English Setter





 
English Springer Spaniel





 
English Toy Spaniel





 
Finnish Spitz





 
Flat-Coated Retriever





 
Fox Terrier





 
Foxhound





 
French Bulldog





 
German Shepherd





 
German Shorthaired Pointer





 
German Wirehaired Pointer





 
Giant Schnauzer





 
Golden Retriever





 
Goldendoodle





 
Gordon Setter





 
Great Dane





 
Great Pyrenees





 
Greater Swiss Mountain Dog





 
Greyhound





 
Havanese





 
Irish Setter





 
Irish Terrier





 
Irish Water Spaniel





 
Irish Wolfhound





 
Italian Greyhound





 
Jack Russell Terrier





 
Japanese Chin





 
Keeshond





 
Kerry Blue Terrier





 
Komondor





 
Kuvasz





 
Lab (Black)





 
Lab (Chocolate)





 
Lab (Yellow)





 
Labradoodle





 
Landseer





 
Leonberger





 
Lhasa Apso





 
Lurcher





 
Maltese





 
Mastiff





 
Miniature Pinscher





 
Neapolitan Mastiff





 
Newfoundland





 
Norfolk Terrier





 
Norwegian Elkhound





 
Norwich Terrier





 
Old English Sheepdog





 
Papillon





 
Pekingese





 
Petit Basset Griffon





 
Pharaoh Hound





 
Pit Bull Terrier





 
Pointer





 
Pomeranian





 
Poodle





 
Portuguese Wtr





 
Pug





 
Puggle





 
Puli





 
Queensland Healer





 
Rat Terrier





 
 Rhodesian Ridgeback
 




 
Rottweiler





 
Saint Bernard





 
Saluki





 
Samoyed





 
Schipperke





 
Schnauzer





 
Scottish Deerhound





 
Scottish Terrier





 
Sealyham Terrier





 
Shar-Pei





 
Shetland Sheepdog





 
Shiba Inu





 
Shih Tzu





 
Siberian Husky





 
Silky Terrier





 
Skye Terrier





 
Soft Coated Wheaten





 
Spinone Italiano





 
Staffordshire Bull





 
Tibetan Spaniel





 
Tibetan Terrier





 
Vizsla





 
Weimaraner





 
Welsh Corgi (Cardigan)





 
Welsh Corgi (Pembroke)





 
Welsh Springer





 
Welsh Terrier





 
West Highland





 
Whippet





 
Wire Fox Terrier





 
Yorkipoo





 
Yorkshire Terrier






 
Horse Gifts






 
American Saddlebred





 
Andalusian





 
Appaloosa





 
Arabian





 
Clydesdale





 
Donkey





 
Horse





 
Morgan





 
Mule





 
Paint





 
Palomino





 
Percheron





 
Pinto





 
Pony





 
Quarter





 
Shire





 
Tennessee Walking





 
Thoroughbred






 
Other Animal Gifts






 
African Grey





 
Alligator





 
Alpaca





 
Armadillo





 
Badger





 
Bear





 
Beaver





 
Bobcat





 
Budgerigar





 
Buffalo





 
Butterfly





 
Camel





 
Cheetah





 
Chicken





 
Chimpanzee





 
Chipmunk





 
Cobra





 
Cockatiel





 
Cockatoo





 
Conure





 
Cougar





 
Cow





 
Coyote





 
Deer





 
Dolphin





 
Donkey





 
Duck





 
Eagle





 
Elephant





 
Elk





 
Ferret





 
Flamingo





 
Fox





 
Frog





 
Giraffe





 
Goat





 
Goose





 
Gorilla





 
Grizzly Bear





 
Guernsey Bull





 
Guernsey Cow





 
Guinea Pig





 
Hamster





 
Hedgehog





 
Holstein Bull





 
Holstein Cow





 
Hummingbird





 
Iguana





 
Jackass





 
Jaguar





 
Kangaroo





 
Koala





 
Leopard





 
Lion





 
Lizard





 
Llama





 
Long Horn Steer





 
Love Bird





 
Macaw





 
Mallard Duck





 
Manatee





 
Mandrill





 
Monkey





 
Moose





 
Mountain Lion





 
Mule





 
Okapi





 
Orangutan





 
Orca





 
Otter





 
Owl





 
Panda





 
Panther





 
Parrot





 
Pelican





 
Penguin





 
Pig





 
Polar Bear





 
Porcupine





 
Rabbit





 
Raccoon





 
Rhinoceros





 
Rooster





 
Seal





 
Shark





 
Skunk





 
Snake





 
Spider





 
Squirrel





 
Tiger





 
Turkey





 
Turtle





 
Whale





 
Wolf





 
Zebra








Gifts By Product






 
Sale + Clearance





 
Apparel + Accessories






 
Baseball Cap





 
Denim Shirt





 
Floppy Sun Hat





 
High Tec Vest





 
Ladies Socks





 
Necktie





 
New Englander Rain Jacket





 
Tapestry Tote Bag





 
TB T-Shirts





 
Umbrella





 
Unisex Waffle Weave Robe





 
Walking Stick






 
Dog Calendars + Animal Calendars






 
Cat & Kitten Calendars





 
Dog & Puppy Calendars





 
Dog Breed Calendars A - B





 
Dog Breed Calendars C - F





 
Dog Breed Calendars G - K





 
Dog Breed Calendars L - O





 
Dog Breed Calendars P - R





 
Dog Breed Calendars S - V





 
Dog Breed Calendars W - Y





 
Domesticated Animal Calendars





 
Horse Calendars





 
Pet Calendars





 
Wildlife Calendars






 
Dog Figurines






 
Angel





 
Bottle Stopper





 
Candy Cane Ornament





 
Christmas Tree Ornament





 
Christmas Tree Toppers





 
Desk Pen Set





 
Devil





 
Figurine





 
Figurines by Hevener





 
Gift Box Ornament





 
Gingerbread House





 
Large Dog Sculptures





 
Life Size Dog Sculptures





 
Mom & Pups





 
My Dog





 
Sleigh Ride Ornament





 
Special Edition





 
Tea Cup





 
Tiny One






 
Home + Garden






 
Art Print





 
Beach Towel





 
Bird Feeder/House





 
Bone Hang Ups





 
Bookends





 
Bumper Sticker





 
Business Card Holder





 
Car Mats - Burnett





 
Car Mats - Van Vliet





 
Chalkboard





 
Cheese Boards





 
Coat Rack





 
Custom License Plate





 
DIG Topper





 
Door Topper





 
Flags





 
Flags - Birthday





 
Fleece Blankets





 
Floor Mats





 
Garden Stake





 
Greeting Cards





 
Head Study





 
Intarsia Wood Carving





 
Key Rack





 
Lap Square Blankets





 
License Plate Frame





 
License Plates





 
Luggage Tags





 
Mailbox Covers





 
Memorial Dog Urns





 
Metal Garden Stakes





 
Metal Ornaments & Garden Stakes





 
Mousepad





 
Pet Fire Protection Decal





 
Photo Pillow





 
Picture Frame Mattes





 
Planter Boxes





 
Plush





 
Satin Pillow





 
Sherpa Throw Blanket





 
Stained Art Glass





 
Stained Art Glass 10" Suncatcher





 
Sun Catcher





 
Switch Plates





 
Tapestry Pillow





 
Treat Jars





 
Wall Clocks





 
Wall Hanging-Throw Blanket





 
Weathervanes





 
Wine Racks





 
Wood Memorial Urn






 
Jewelry + Watches






 
14K Gold Jewelry





 
Earrings - Hanging





 
Necklace





 
Sterling Silver Jewelry





 
Watches





 
Open Heart Necklace





 
Silver & Gold Rings





 
Silver Pins & Charms






 
Signs






 
2.8 Seconds Signs





 
Aluminum Xing Sign





 
Caution Sign





 
DIG Welcome Sign





 
Welcome Sign





 
Welcome Stake













Signup for our newsletter


			
				Email Address : 
				

Click here to unsubscribe







Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts, Merchandise and Collectibles

Home 
			/ Gifts By Breed
			/ Dog Gifts
			/ Rhodesian Ridgeback



Shopping for Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts? Welcome to PetPro's unique Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts section, we carry a great selection of gifts including, jewelry, calendars, figurines and Rhodesian Ridgeback products, flags, signs and many many other Rhodesian Ridgeback gifts, merchandise, collectibles. We are confident you will find the perfect gift item for the Rhodesian Ridgeback lover in your life




	 











				Sort By:
			


-
Newest to System
Alphabetical
Price (Highest to Lowest)
Price (Lowest to Highest)



				View:
			


Text
Thumb-Single Column
Thumb-Double Column
Two Column
Two Column Box
Thumb-Three Columns










	64 Item(s) 
	Page 1 of 3 | 
	  1  2  3 
			 
										Next >>


 






Angel Wing Paw Print Sterling Silver Open Heart Necklace
												
												Product ID : OHN0010

$39.99 
											Sale Price: $36.99



Click to view













Fire Protection Pet Alert Decals (Pack of 2 + FREE SHIPPING)

												
												Product ID : pet alert

$7.99 
											Sale Price: $3.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback  Bottle Stopper
												
												Product ID : 24967

Price: $12.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback  Devil
												
												Product ID : 25344

Price: $14.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback (Owned By) License Plate Frame
												
												Product ID : ecm235

Price: $19.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback - Tamara Burnett Fall Leaves Floor Mat
												
												Product ID : TB40088

$29.99 
											Sale Price: $24.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback - Tomoyo Pitcher Welcome Flowers Flag
												
												Product ID : TP63088A

Price: $15.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback 10" Stained Art Glass Suncatcher
												
												Product ID : Y-150

Price: $59.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback 2.8 Seconds Sign
												
												Product ID : 53124

Price: $9.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Aluminum Xing Sign
												
												Product ID : NB600

$29.99 
											Sale Price: $24.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Angel Ornament
												
												Product ID : 24175

Price: $12.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print - Coffee Bean
												
												Product ID : RRCB028

Price: $32.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print - Draft House
												
												Product ID : RRDH028

Price: $32.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Art Print - Life Is Better
												
												Product ID : RRLIB028

Price: $32.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Baseball Cap
												
												Product ID : YB0962

Price: $29.95



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Business Card Holder
												
												Product ID : 72815

Price: $55.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar 2018
												
												Product ID : BT41531

Price: $14.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Calendar 2018
												
												Product ID : PP52445

Price: $15.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Candy Cane Ornament
												
												Product ID : DCC78

Price: $12.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Caution Sign
												
												Product ID : 52692

Price: $9.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Chalkboard
												
												Product ID : VC60080

Price: $59.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Christmas Tree Ornament
												
												Product ID : 28672

Price: $9.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Custom Watch
												
												Product ID : 68286

$59.99 
											Sale Price: $49.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Denim Shirt
												
												Product ID : 57947

Price: $49.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Doogie Collection Angel Tree
												
												Product ID : NXTT78

Price: $24.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Door Topper
												
												Product ID : 73582

Price: $34.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Earrings Hanging
												
												Product ID : 20600

$14.99 
											Sale Price: $12.99



Click to view






  






Rhodesian Ridgeback Figurine
												
												Product ID : 17932

Price: $19.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Flag
												
												Product ID : 57583

Price: $15.99



Click to view













Rhodesian Ridgeback Gingerbread House Ornament
												
												Product ID : GBHD78

Price: $14.99



Click to view






 

	64 Item(s) 
	Page 1 of 3 | 
	  1  2  3 
			 
										Next >>











Home
Site Map
About PetPro
Contact Us
Affiliate Program
F. A. Q.
Payment Methods
Return Refund Policy
Shipping
Testimonials









		 
		  Powered by ClaimTheWeb Cart - Shopping Cart Software  
	




















Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts









































 









HOME
HELP
GUARANTEE
CUSTOMER SERVICE
VIEW CARTQuestions? Call Us!(360) 574-9040(360) 574-9040No Hassle ReturnsFree Gift with Every Order!100% Satisfaction Guaranteed



☰Dog GiftsCat GiftsBarnyardBirdsBugsFreshwaterMarine LifeReptiles\AmphibiansSmall CrittersWildlifeClose WindowPOPULAR CATEGORIESRhodesian Ridgeback Bumper StickersRhodesian Ridgeback Christmas OrnamentsRhodesian Ridgeback JewelryRhodesian Ridgeback Note HoldersRhodesian Ridgeback SignsRhodesian Ridgeback T-Shirts & SweatshirtsRhodesian Ridgeback Towels & PotholdersHome  »  Dog Gifts  »  Rhodesian Ridgeback

Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts, Merchandise & ProductsGreat Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts, Merchandise & Products for Rhodesian Ridgeback lovers.  We have one of the largest selections of unique Rhodesian Ridgeback Gift Items.  Some of our most popular include T-Shirts, Calendars, Signs, Address Labels, Socks, Earrings, Christmas Ornaments, License Plate Frames, Keychains, Mousepads, Pins, Coasters, Blankets, Figurines, Mugs, Charms, Hats, Note Holders, Magnets, Pillows, Bottle Stoppers, Cookie Jars, Dish Towels, Umbrellas, Memo Holders, Collar & Leash, Hand Towels, Pen Holders, Tote Bags, Necklaces, etc.  Simply click on your favorite Rhodesian Ridgeback Gifts below to see more details.Other Dog ProductsBasic Obedience Video$17.00Sale Price: $7.95








Coaster Holder: For Sandstone Coasters$8.00








Dog 2.8 Seconds Sign$11.00








Dog Bone Christmas Stocking$29.95








Dog Days Calendar 2018$14.99








Dog Hold-a-Note$12.00Sale Price: $6.95








Dog License Plate Frame$17.00Sale Price: $8.95








Dog Merchandise & Supplies Category$0.00








Dog Security Force Sign$11.00








Dog Selfies 2018 Calendar 2018$14.99








Dog T Shirt Beach Bums$17.95








Dog T Shirt Puppy Tan$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - #1... Deal With It$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Back Off$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Breed of Champions$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Certified Person$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Colorful Cuties$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Dog Person$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - I love my Dog$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Love Country Music$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Love My Dog$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Other Angels$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - Photo$17.95








Dog T-Shirt - The Club$17.95








Dog T-Shirt Crazy$17.95








Dog Tricks Video$17.00








Dog Tricks Video 2$17.00








Dog Weathervane$59.95








Dogs License Plate Frame$17.00Sale Price: $12.95








Dogs O'Christmas Tree Christmas Cards$14.95








Dogs Snow Babies Christmas Cards$14.95








Flag Pole Bracket 2 Position$9.95








Garden Flag Holder for Window$3.00








Garden Flag Holder In Ground$12.95








Leave Me Alone Dog T Shirt  (Best for Darker Shirts)$17.95








Mutt 2.8 Seconds Sign$11.00








Mutt, Bad Ass 2.8 Seconds Sign$11.00








Pet Memorial Perennials$24.95








Puppies Calendar 2018$14.99








Puppy Hold-a-Note$12.00Sale Price: $8.95








Puppy Training Video$17.00








Underwater Dogs Calendar 2018$14.99








Underwater Puppies Calendar 2018$14.99








Wood Flag Pole 5 Foot$12.95








Yoga Dogs Calendar 2018$14.99









CUSTOMER SERVICE
WE'RE HERE TO HELP360-574-9040
Shipping
Returns
Contact Us
Sign up for Email
Site Map


DEPARTMENTS
Barnyard
Birds
Bugs
Cats
Dogs
Freshwater
Marine Life
Reptiles/Amph
Small Critters
Wildlife


OUR COMPANY
About Us
Testimonials
Privacy & Legal
Affiliate Program
TESTIMONIALS
NEWSLETTER


JOIN THE CLUB & BE FIRST TO KNOW ABOUT SALES & DISCOUNTS! 

































Site Map | Home | Contact Us | (360) 574-9040




  



  
